VOL. II. 2
LOCAL TRADITIONS.
The
common people of Spain have an oriental
passion for story-telling and are fond of the
marvellous
.
They will gather round the doors of
their cottages in summer evenings, or in the
great cavernous chimney corners of their ventas
in the winter, and listen with insatiable delight
to miraculous legends of saints, perilous
adventures
of travellers, and daring exploits of robbers
and contrabandistas. The wild and solitary
nature
of a great part of Spain; the imperfect state
of knowledge; the scantiness of general topics
of conversation, and the romantic, adventurous
life that every one leads in a land where
travelling
is yet in its primitive state, all contribute
to cherish this love of oral narration, and to
produce
a strong expression of the extravagant and
wonderful. There is no theme, however, more
prevalent or popular than that of treasures buried
by the Moors. It pervades the whole country.
In traversing the wild Sierras, the scenes of
ancient
prey and exploit, you cannot see a Moorish
atalaya or watch-tower perched among the cliffs,
or beetling above its rock-built village, but your
muleteer, on being closely questioned, will
suspend
the smoking of his cigarillo to tell some tale
of Moslem gold buried beneath its foundations;
nor is there a ruined alcazar in a city, but has
its golden tradition, handed down, from
generation
to generation, among the poor people of the
neighbourhood.
These, like most popular fictions, have had
some groundwork in fact. During the wars
between Moor and Christian, which distracted
the country for centuries, towns and castles were
liable frequently and suddenly to change owners;
and the inhabitants, during sieges and assaults,
were fain to bury their money and jewels in the
earth, or hide them in vaults and wells, as is often
done at the present day in the despotic and
belligerent
countries of the East. At the time of
the expulsion of the Moors, also, many of them
concealed their most precious effects, hoping that
their exile would be but temporary, and that they
would be enabled to return and retrieve their
treasures at some future day. It is certain that,
from time to time, hoards of gold and silver coin
have been accidentally digged up, after a lapse of
centuries, from among the ruins of Moorish
fortresses
and habitations, and it requires but a few
facts of the kind to give birth to a thousand
fictions.
The stories thus originating have generally
something of an oriental tinge, and are marked
with that mixture of the Arabic and Gothic
which seems to me to characterize every thing in
Spain; and especially in its southern provinces.
The hidden wealth is always laid under magic
spell, and secured by charm and talisman.
Sometimes
it is guarded by uncouth monsters, or fiery
dragons; sometimes by enchanted Moors, who
sit by it in armour, with drawn swords, but
motionless
as statues, maintaining a sleepless watch
for ages.
The Alhambra, of course, from the peculiar
circumstances of its history, is a strong hold for
popular fictions of the kind, and curious reliques,
dug up from time to time, have contributed to
strengthen them. At one time, an earthen vessel
was found, containing Moorish coins and the
skeleton
of a cock, which, according to the opinion
of shrewd inspectors, must have been buried
alive. At another time, a vessel was digged up,
containing a great scarabus, or beetle, of baked
clay, covered with Arabic inscriptions, which
was pronounced a prodigious amulet of occult
virtues
.
In this way the wits of the ragged brood
who inhabit the Alhambra have been set wool
gathering, until there is not a hall, or tower, or
vault, of the old fortress that has not been made
the scene of some marvellous tradition.
I have already given brief notices of some
related
to me by the authentic Mateo Ximenes,
and now subjoin one wrought out from various
particulars gathered among the gossips of the
fortress.
2 *
LEGEND
OF THE MOOR'S LEGACY.
Just
within the fortress of the Alhambra, in
front of the royal palace, is a broad open
esplanade
,
called the place or square of the cisterns,
(la plaza de los algibes) so called from being
undermined
by reservoirs of water, hidden from
sight, and which have existed from the time of
the Moors. At one corner of this esplanade is a
Moorish well, cut through the living rock to a
great depth, the water of which is cold as ice
and clear as crystal. The wells made by the
Moors are always in repute, for it is well known
what pains they took to penetrate to the purest
and sweetest springs and fountains. The one we
are speaking of is famous throughout Granada,
insomuch that the water-carriers, some bearing
great water-jars on their shoulders, others
driving
asses before them, laden with earthen vessels,
are ascending and descending the steep woody
avenues of the Alhambra from early dawn until
a late hour of the night.
Fountains and wells, ever since the scriptural
days, have been noted gossiping places in hot
climates, and at the well in question there is a
kind of perpetual club kept up during the
livelong
day, by the invalids, old women, and other
curious, do-nothing folk of the fortress, who sit
here on the stone benches under an awning spread
over the well to shelter the toll-gatherer from
the sun, and dawdle over the gossip of the
fortress
,
and question any water-carrier that arrives,
about the news of the city, and make long
comments
on every thing they hear and see. Not
an hour of the day but loitering housewives
and idle maid-servants may be seen, lingering
with pitcher on head or in hand, to hear the last
of the endless tattle of these worthies.
Among the water-carriers who once resorted
to this well there was a sturdy, strong-backed,
bandy-legged little fellow, named Pedro Gil, but
called Peregil for shortness. Being a
water-carrier
,
he was a Gallego, or native of Gallicia, of
course. Nature seems to have formed races of
men as she has of animals for different kinds of
drudgery. In France the shoeblacks are all
Savoyards, the porters of hotels all Swiss, and in
the days of hoops and hair powder in England,
no man could give the regular swing to a sedan
chair but a bog-trotting Irishman. So in Spain
the carriers of water and bearers of burdens are
all sturdy little natives of Gallicia. No man says,
get me a porter, but, call a Gallego.
To return from this digression. Peregil the
Gallego had begun business with merely a great
earthen jar, which he carried upon his shoulder; by
degrees he rose in the world, and was enabled to
purchase an assistant, of a correspondent class of
animals, being a stout shaggy-haired donkey. On
each side of this his long eared aid-de-camp, in a
kind of pannier, were slung his water-jars
covered
with fig leaves to protect them from the sun.
There was not a more industrious water-carrier
in all Granada, nor one more merry withal.
The streets rang with his cheerful voice as he
trudged after his donkey, singing forth the usual
summer note that resounds through the Spanish
towns:
quien quiere aguaagua mas fria
que la nieve
.Who wants waterwater colder
than snowwho wants water from the well of
the Alhambracold as ice and clear as
crystal
?
When he served a customer with a
sparkling
glass, it was always with a pleasant word
that caused a smile, and if, perchance, it was a
comely dame, or dimpling damsel, it was always
with a sly leer and a compliment to her beauty
that was irresistible. Thus Peregil the Gallego
was noted throughout all Granada for being one
of the civilest, pleasantest, and happiest of
mortals
.
Yet it is not he who sings loudest and jokes
most that has the lightest heart. Under all this
air of merriment, honest Peregil had his cares
and troubles. He had a large family of ragged
children to support, who were hungry and
clamorous
as a nest of young swallows, and beset
him with their outcries for food whenever he
came home of an evening. He had a help-mate
too, who was any thing but a help to him. She
had been a village beauty before marriage, noted
for her skill in dancing the bolero and rattling
the castanets, and she still retained her early
propensities
,
spending the hard earnings of honest
Peregil in frippery, and laying the very donkey
under requisition for junketting parties into the
country on Sundays, and saints days, and those
innumerable holydays which are rather more
numerous
in Spain than the days of the week. With
all this she was a little of a slattern, something
more of a lie-a-bed, and, above all, a gossip of
the first water; neglecting house, household and
every thing else, to loiter slip-shod in the houses
of her gossip neighbours.
He, however, who tempers the wind to the
shorn lamb, accommodates the yoke of
matrimony
to the submissive neck. Peregil bore all the
heavy dispensations of wife and children with as
meek a spirit as his donkey bore the water jars;
and, however he might shake his ears in private,
never ventured to question the household
virtues
of his slattern spouse.
He loved his children too, even as an owl loves
its owlets, seeing in them his own image
multiplied
and perpetuated, for they were a sturdy,
long-backed, bandylegged little brood. The
great pleasure of honest Peregil was, whenever
he could afford himself a scanty holyday and
had a handful of maravedies to spare, to take the
whole litter forth with him, some in his arms,
some tugging at his skirts, and some trudging
at his heels, and to treat them to a gambol among
the orchards of the Vega, while his wife was
dancing with her holyday friends in the
Angosturas
of the Darro.
It was a late hour one summer night, and most
of the water-carriers had desisted from their
toils. The day had been uncommonly sultry;
the night was one of those delicious moonlights,
which tempt the inhabitants of those southern
climes to indemnify themselves for the heat and
inaction of the day, by lingering in the open air
and enjoying its tempered sweetness until after
midnight. Customers for water were therefore
still abroad. Peregil, like a considerate,
painstaking
little father, thought of his hungry
children
.
One more journey to the well, said he
to himself, to earn a good Sunday's puchero
for the little ones. So saying, he trudged
rapidly
up the steep avenue of the Alhambra,
singing
as he went, and now and then bestowing a
hearty thwack with a cudgel on the flanks of his
donkey, either by way of cadence to the song,
or refreshment to the animal; for dry blows
serve in lieu for provender in Spain, for all
beasts of burden.
When arrived at the well, he found it
deserted
by every one except a solitary stranger in
Moorish garb, seated on the stone bench in the
moonlight. Peregil paused at first, and regarded
him with surprise, not unmixed with awe, but
the Moor feebly beckoned him to approach.
I am faint and ill, said he; aid me to
return
to the city, and I will pay thee double what
thou couldst gain by thy jars of water.
The honest heart of the little water-carrier was
touched with compassion at the appeal of the
stranger. God forbid, said he, that I
should ask fee or reward for doing a common
act of humanity.
He accordingly helped the Moor on his
donkey
,
and set off slowly for Granada, the poor
Moslem being so weak that it was necessary to
hold him on the animal to keep him from falling
to the earth.
When they entered the city, the water-carrier
demanded whither he should conduct him.
Alas! said the Moor, faintly, I have neither
home nor habitation. I am a stranger in the
land. Suffer me to lay my head this night
beneath
thy roof, and thou shalt be amply repaid.
Honest Peregil thus saw himself unexpectedly
saddled with an infidel guest, but he was too
humane
to refuse a night's shelter to a fellow being
in so forlorn a plight; so he conducted the Moor
to his dwelling. The children, who had sallied
forth, open mouthed as usual, on hearing the
tramp of the donkey, rank back with affright,
when they beheld the turbaned stranger, and
hid themselves behind their mother. The latter
stepped forth intrepidly, like a ruffling hen
before
her brood, when a vagrant dog approaches.
What infidel companion, cried she, is
this you have brought home at this late hour, to
draw upon us the eyes of the Inquisition?
Be quiet, wife, replied the Gallego, here
is a poor sick stranger, without friend or home:
wouldst thou turn him forth to perish in the
streets?
The wife would still have remonstrated, for,
though she lived in a hovel, she was a furious
stickler for the credit of her house; the little
water-carrier
,
however, for once was stiff-necked,
and refused to bend beneath the yoke. He
assisted the poor Moslem to alight, and spread a
mat and a sheepskin for him, on the ground, in
the coolest part of the house; being the only
kind of bed that his poverty afforded.
In a little while the Moor was seized with
violent convulsions, which defied all the
ministering
skill of the simple water-carrier. The
VOL. II. 3
eye of the poor patient acknowledged his
kindness
.
During an interval of his fits he called
him to his side, and addressing him in a low
voice; My end, said he, I fear is at hand.
If I die I bequeath you this box as a reward
for your charity. So saying, he opened his
albornoz or cloak, and showed a small box of
sandal wood, strapped round his body.
God grant, my friend, replied the worthy
little Gallego, that you may live many years to
enjoy your treasure, whatever it may be.
The Moor shook his head; he laid his hand
upon the box, and would have said something
more concerning it, but his convulsions returned
with increased violence, and in a little while he
expired.
The water-carrier's wife was now as one
distracted
.
This comes, said she, of your
foolish
good nature, always running into scrapes to
oblige others. What will become of us when
this corpse is found in our house? We shall be
sent to prison as murderers; and if we escape
with our lives, shall be ruined by notaries and
alguazils.
Poor Peregil was in equal tribulation, and
almost
repented himself of having done a good
deed. At length a thought struck him. It is
not yet day, said he. I can convey the dead
body out of the city and bury it in the sands on
the banks of the Xenil. No one saw the Moor
enter our dwelling, and no one will know any
thing of his death. So said, so done. The
wife aided him: they rolled the body of the
unfortunate
Moslem in the mat on which he had
expired, laid it across the ass, and Mattias set out
with it for the banks of the river.
As ill luck would have it, there lived opposite
to the water-carrier a barber, named Pedrillo
Pedrugo, one of the most prying, tattling,
mischief-making
,
of his gossip tribe. He was a
weasel-faced, spider-legged varlet, supple and
insinuating; the famous Barber of Seville could
not surpass him for his universal knowledge of
the affairs of others, and he had no more power
of retention than a sieve. It was said that he
slept with but one eye at a time, and kept one
ear uncovered, so that, even in his sleep, he
might see and hear all that was going on.
Certain
it is, he was a sort of scandalous chronicle
for the quidnuncs of Granada, and had more
customers than all the rest of his fraternity.
This meddlesome barber heard Peregil arrive
at an unusual hour of night, and the exclamations
of his wife and children. His head was
instantly
popped out of a little window which served
him as a look out, and he saw his neighbour
assist
a man in a Moorish garb into his dwelling.
This was so strange an occurrence, that Pedrillo
Pedrugo slept not a wink that nightevery five
minutes he was at his loop-hole, watching the
lights that gleamed through the chinks of his
neighbour's door, and before daylight he beheld
Peregil sally forth with his donkey unusually
laden.
The inquisitive barber was in a fidget; he
slipped
on his clothes, and, stealing forth silently,
followed
the water-carrier at a distance, until he
saw him dig a hole in the sandy bank of the
Xenil
,
and bury something that had the appearance
of a dead body.
The barber hied him home and fidgeted about
his shop, setting every thing upside down, until
sunrise. He then took basin under his arm,
and sallied forth to the house of his daily
customer
the Alcalde.
The Alcalde was just risen. Pedrillo Pedrugo
seated him in a chair, threw a napkin round his
neck, put a basin of hot water under his chin,
and began to mollify his beard with his fingers.
Strange doings, said Pedrugo, who played
barber and newsmonger at the same time.
Strange doings! Robbery, and murder, and
burial, all in one night!
Hey? how! What is it you say? cried the
Alcalde.
I say, replied the barber, rubbing a piece
of soap over the nose and mouth of the dignitary,
for a Spanish barber disdains to employ a brush:
I say that Peregil the Gallego has robbed and
murdered a Morrish Musselman, and buried him
this blessed night,
maldita sea la noche
,
accursed
be the night for the same!
But how do you know all this? demanded
the Alcalde.
Be patient, Seor, and you shall hear all
about it, replied Pedrillo, taking him by the
nose and sliding a razor over his cheek. He
then recounted all that he had seen, going through
both operations at the same time, shaving his
beard, washing his chin, and wiping him dry
with a dirty napkin, while he was robbing,
murdering
,
and burying the Moslem.
3 *
Now so it happened that this Alcalde was one
of the most overbearing, and at the same time
most griping and corrupt curmudgeons in all
Granada. It could not be denied, however, that
he set a high value upon justice, for he sold it at
its weight in gold. He presumed the case in
point to be one of murder and robbery; doubtless
there must be rich spoil; how was it to be
secured
into the legitimate hands of the law? for as
to merely entrapping the delinquentthat would
be feeding the gallows; but entrapping the booty
that would be enriching the judge; and such,
according to his creed, was the great end of justice.
So thinking, he summoned to his presence his
trustiest alguazil; a gaunt hungry looking varlet,
clad, according to the custom of his order, in the
ancient Spanish garba broad black beaver,
turned
up at the sides; a quaint ruff, a small black cloak
dangling from his shoulders; rusty black under
clothes that set off his spare wiry form; while
in his hand he bore a slender white wand, the
dreaded insignia of his office. Such was the
legal
blood-hound of the ancient Spanish breed,
that he put upon the traces of the unlucky
water-carrier
;
and such was his speed and certainty
that he was upon the haunches of poor Peregil
before he had returned to his dwelling, and
brought both him and his donkey before the
dispenser
of justice.
The Alcalde bent upon him one of his most
terrific frowns. Hark ye, culprit, roared he
in a voice that made the knees of the little
Gallego
smite together,Hark ye, culprit! there
is no need of denying thy guilt: every thing is
known to me. A gallows is the proper reward
for the crime thou hast committed, but I am
merciful, and readily listen to reason. The man
that has been murdered in thy house was a
Moor, an infidel, the enemy of our faith. It
was doubtless in a fit of religious zeal that
thou hast slain him. I will be indulgent,
therefore
;
render up the property of which thou hast
robbed him, and we will hush the matter up.
The poor water-carrier called upon all the
saints to witness his innocence; alas! not one
of them appeared, and if there had, the Alcalde
would have disbelieved the whole kalendar.
The water-carrier related the whole story of the
dying Moor with the straight forward
simplicity
of truth, but it was all in vain: Wilt thou
persist in saying, demanded the judge, that
this Moslem had neither gold nor jewels, which
were the object of thy cupidity?
As I hope to be saved, your worship,
replied
the water-carrier, he had nothing but a
small box of sandal wood, which he bequeathed
to me in reward of my services.
A box of sandal wood! a box of sandal
wood! exclaimed the Alcalde, his eyes
sparkling
at the idea of precious jewels, and where
is this box? where have you concealed it?
An'it please your grace, replied the
water-carrier
,
it is in one of the panniers of my mule,
and heartily at the service of your worship.
He had hardly spoken the words when the
keen alguazil darted off and reappeared in an
instant
with the mysterious box of sandal wood.
The Alcalde opened it with an eager and
trembling
hand, all pressed forward to gaze upon the
treasures it was expected to contain; when, to
their disappointment, nothing appeared within
but a parchment scroll, covered with Arabic
characters, and an end of a waxen taper!
When there is nothing to be gained by the
conviction of a prisoner, justice, even in Spain,
is apt to be impartial. The Alcalde, having
recovered
from his disappointment and found
there was really no booty in the case, now
listened
dispassionately to the explanation of the
water-carrier, which was corroborated by the
testimony of his wife. Being convinced,
therefore
,
of his innocence, he discharged him from
arrest; nay more, he permitted him to carry off
the Moor's legacy, the box of sandal wood and
its contents, as the well merited reward of his
humanity; but he retained his donkey in
payment
of cost and charges.
Behold the unfortunate little Gallego reduced
once more to the necessity of being his own
water-carrier
,
and trudging up to the well of the
Alhambra with a great earthen jar upon his
shoulder. As he toiled up the hill in the heat
of a summer noon his usual good-humour
forsook
him. Dog of an Alcalde! would he
cry, to rob a poor man of the means of his
subsistenceof the best friend he had in the
world! And then at the remembrance of the
beloved companion of his labours all the
kindness
of his nature would break forth. Ah
donkey of my heart! would he exclaim, resting
his burden on a stone, and wiping the sweat
from his brow, Ah donkey of my heart! I
warrant me thou thinkest of thy old master! I
warrant me thou missest the water jars:poor
beast!
To add to his afflictions his wife received him,
on his return home, with whimperings and
repinings
;
she had clearly the vantage-ground of
him, having warned him not to commit the
egregious
act of hospitality that had brought on him
all these misfortunes, and like a knowing
woman
,
she took every occasion to throw her
superior
sagacity in his teeth. If ever her
children
lacked food, or needed a new garment, she
would answer with a sneer, Go to your father;
he's heir to king Chico of the Alhambra. Ask
him to help you out of the Moor's strong box.
Was ever poor mortal more soundly punished,
for having done a good action! The unlucky
Peregil was grieved in flesh and spirit, but still
he bore meekly with the railings of his spouse.
At length one evening, when, after a hot day's
toil, she taunted him in the usual manner, he
lost all patience. He did not venture to retort
upon her, but his eye rested upon the box of
sandal wood, which lay on a shelf with lid half
open, as if laughing in mockery of his vexation.
Siezing it up he dashed it with indignation on
the floor. Unlucky was the day that I ever
set eyes on thee, he cried, or sheltered thy
master beneath my roof.
As the box struck the floor the lid flew wide
open, and the parchment scroll rolled forth.
Peregil sat regarding the scroll for some time
in moody silence. At length rallying his ideas,
Who knows, thought he, but this writing
may be of some importance, as the Moor seems
to have guarded it with such care. Picking it
up, therefore, he put it in his bosom, and the
next morning, as he was crying water through
the streets, he stopped at the shop of a Moor, a
native of Tangiers, who sold trinkets and
perfumery
in the Zacatin, and asked him to explain
the contents.
The Moor read the scroll attentively, then
stroked his beard and smiled. This
manuscript
,
said he, is a form of incantation for
the recovery of hidden treasure, that is under
the power of enchantment. It is said to have
such virtue that the strongest bolts and bars, nay
the adamantine rock itself will yield before it.
Bah! cried the little Gallego, what is all
that to me. I am no enchanter, and know
nothing of buried treasure. So saying he
shouldered his water jar, left the scroll in the
hands of the Moor, and trudged forward on his
daily rounds.
That evening, however, as he rested himself
about twilight at the well of the Alhambra, he
found a number of gossips assembled at the place,
and their conversation, as is not unusual at that
shadowy hour, turned upon old tales and
traditions
of a supernatural nature. Being all poor as
rats, they dwelt with peculiar fondness upon the
popular theme of enchanted riches left by the
Moors in various parts of the Alhambra. Above
all, they concurred in the belief that there were
great treasures buried deep in the earth under
the tower of the Seven Floors.
These stories made an unusual impression on
the mind of honest Peregil, and they sank deeper
and deeper into his thoughts as he returned alone
down the darkling avenues. If, after all, there
should be treasure hid beneath that towerand if
the scroll I left with the Moor should enable me
to get at it! In the sudden ecstasy of the thought
he had well nigh let fall his water jar.
That night he tumbled and tossed, and could
scarcely get a wink of sleep for the thoughts that
were bewildering his brain. In the morning,
bright and early, he repaired to the shop of the
Moor, and told him all that was passing in his
mind. You can read Arabic, said he,
suppose
we go together to the tower and try the
effect
of the charm; if it fails we are no worse off
than before, but if it succeeds we will share
equally
all the treasure we may discover.
Hold, replied the Moslem, this writing
is not sufficient of itself; it must be read at
mid-night
,
by the light of a taper singularly
compounded
and prepared, the ingredients of which
are not within my reach. Without such taper
the scroll is of no avail.
Say no more! cried the little Gallego. I
have such a taper at hand and will bring it here
in a moment. So saying he hastened home,
and soon returned with the end of a yellow wax
taper that he had found in the box of sandal
wood.
The Moor felt it, and smelt to it. Here are
rare and costly perfumes, said he, combined
with this yellow wax. This is the kind of taper
specified in the scroll. While this burns, the
strongest walls and most secret caverns will
VOL. II. 4
remain open; woe to him, however, who lingers
within until it be extinguished. He will remain
enchanted with the treasure.
It was now agreed between them to try the
charm that very night. At a late hour, therefore,
when nothing was stirring but bats and owls,
they ascended the woody hill of the Alhambra,
and approached that awful tower, shrouded by
trees and rendered formidable by so many
traditionary
tales.
By the light of a lantern, they groped their
way through bushes, and over fallen stones, to
the door of a vault beneath the tower. With fear
and trembling they descended a flight of steps
cut into the rock. It led to an empty chamber,
damp and drear, from which another flight of
steps led to a deeper vault. In this way they
descended
four several flights, leading into as many
vaults, one below the other, but the floor of the
fourth was solid, and though, according to
tradition
,
there remained three vaults still below, it
was said to be impossible to penetrate further, the
residue being shut up by strong enchantment.
The air of this vault was damp and chilly, and
had an earthy smell, and the light scarce cast forth
any rays. They paused here for a time in
breathless
suspense, until they faintly heard the clock
of the watch tower strike midnight; upon this
they lit the waxen taper, which diffused an odour
of myrrh, and frankincense, and storax.
The Moor began to read in a hurried voice.
He had scarce finished, when there was a noise
as of subterraneous thunder. The earth shook,
and the floor yawning open disclosed a flight of
steps. Trembling with awe they descended, and
by the light of the lantern found themselves in
another vault, covered with Arabic inscriptions.
In the centre stood a great chest, secured with
seven bands of steel, at each end of which sat an
enchanted Moor in armour, but motionless as a
statue, being controlled by the power of the
incantation
.
Before the chest were several jars
filled with gold and silver and precious stones.
In the largest of these they thrust their arms up
to the elbow, and at every dip hauled forth
handsfull
of broad yellow pieces of Moorish gold, or
bracelets and ornaments of the same precious
metal, while occasionally a necklace of oriental
pearl would stick to their fingers. Still they
trembled and breathed short while cramming
their pockets with the spoils; and cast many a
fearful glance at the two enchanted Moors, who
sat grim and motionless, glaring upon them with
unwinking eyes. At length, struck with a sudden
panic at some fancied noise, they both rushed up
the staircase, tumbled over one another into the
upper apartment, overturned and extinguished
the waxen taper, and the pavement again closed
with a thundering sound.
Filled with dismay, they did not pause until they
had groped their way out of the tower, and
beheld
the stars shining through the trees. Then
seating themselves upon the grass they divided the
spoil, determining to content themselves for the
present, with this mere skimming of the jars, but
to return on some future night and drain them to
the bottom. To make sure of each other's good
faith, also, they divided the talismans between
them, one retaining the scroll and the other the
taper; this done, they set off with light hearts
and well lined pockets for Granada.
As they wended their way down the hill, the
shrewd Moor whispered a word of council in the
ear of the simple little water-carrier.
Friend Peregil, said he, all this affair must
be kept a profound secret until we have secured
the treasure and conveyed it out of harm's way.
If a whisper of it gets to the ear of the Alcalde
we are undone!
Certainly! replied the Gallego; nothing
can be more true.
Friend Peregil, said the Moor, you are a
discreet man, and I make no doubt can keep a
secret
;
butyou have a wife
She shall not know a word of it! replied
the little water-carrier sturdily.
Enough, said the Moor, I depend upon
thy discretion and thy promise.
Never was promise more positive and sincere;
but alas! what man can keep a secret from his
wife? Certainly not such a one as Peregil the
water-carrier
,
who was one of the most loving and
tractable of husbands. On his return home he
found his wife moping in a corner.
Mighty well! cried she, as he entered;
you've come at last; after rambling about
until
this hour of the night. I wonder you have not
brought home another Moor as a housemate.
Then bursting into tears she began to wring her
hands and smite her breast. Unhappy woman
that I am! exclaimed she, what will become of
me! My house stripped and plundered by
lawyers
4 *
and alguazils; my husband a do-no-good
that no longer brings home bread for his family,
but goes rambling about, day and night, with
infidel
Moors. Oh my children! my children!
what will become of us; we shall all have to beg
in the streets!
Honest Peregil was so moved by the distress
of his spouse, that he could not help whimpering
also. His heart was as full as his pocket, and
not to be restrained. Thrusting his hand into the
latter he hauled forth three or four broad gold
pieces and slipped them into her bosom. The
poor woman stared with astonishment, and could
not understand the meaning of this golden
shower
.
Before she could recover her surprise, the
little Gallego drew forth a chain of gold and
dangled
it before her, capering with exultation, his
mouth distended from ear to ear.
Holy Virgin protect us! exclaimed the wife.
What hast thou been doing, Peregil? Surely
thou hast not been committing murder and
robbery
!
The idea scarce entered the brain of the poor
woman than it became a certainty with her. She
saw a prison and a gallows in the distance, and
a little bandy-legged Gallego dangling pendant
from it; and, overcome by the horrors conjured
up by her imagination, fell into violent hyterics.
What could the poor man do? He had no other
means of pacifying his wife and dispelling the
phantoms of her fancy, than by relating the
whole story of his good fortune. This, however,
he did not do until he had exacted from her the
most solemn promise to keep it a profound
secret
from every living being.
To describe her joy would be impossible. She
flung her arms round the neck of her husband,
and almost strangled him with her caresses.
Now, wife! exclaimed the little man with
honest
exultation, what say you now to the Moor's
legacy? Henceforth never abuse me for helping a
fellow creature in distress.
The honest Gallego retired to his sheepskin
mat, and slept as soundly as if on a bed of down.
Not so his wife.She emptied the whole
contents
of his pockets upon the mat, and sat all
night counting gold pieces of Arabic coin,
trying
on necklaces and ear-rings, and fancying
the figure she should one day make when
permitted
to enjoy her riches.
On the following morning the honest Gallego
took a broad golden coin, and repaired with it to
a jeweller's shop in the Zacatin to offer it for sale;
pretending to have found it among the ruins of
the Alhambra. The jeweller saw that it had an
Arabic inscription and was of the purest gold; he
offered, however, but a third of its value, with
which the water-carrier was perfectly content.
Peregil now bought new clothes for his little
flock, and all kinds of toys, together with ample
provisions for a hearty meal, and returning to
his dwelling set all his children dancing around
him, while he capered in the midst, the happiest
of fathers.
The wife of the water-carrier kept her promise
of secrecy with surprising strictness. For a whole
day and a half she went about with a look of
mystery and a heart swelling almost to bursting,
yet she held her peace, though surrounded by
her gossips. It is true she could not help giving
herself a few airs, apologized for her ragged
dress, and talked of ordering a new basquina all
trimmed with gold lace and bugles, and a new
lace mantilla. She threw out hints of her
husband's
intention of leaving off his trade of
water-carrying
,
as it did not altogether agree with
his health. In fact she thought they should all
retire to the country for the summer, that the
children might have the benefit of the mountain
air, for there was no living in the city in this
sultry
season.
The neighbours stared at each other, and
thought the poor woman had lost her wits, and
her airs and graces and elegant pretensions were
the theme of universal scoffing and merriment
among her friends, the moment her back was
turned.
If she restrained herself abroad, however, she
indemnified herself at home, and, putting a string
of rich oriental pearls round her neck, Moorish
bracelets on her arms; an aigrette of diamonds
on her head, sailed backwards and forwards in
her slattern rags about the room, now and then
stopping to admire herself in a piece of broken
mirror. Nay, in the impulse of her simple
vanity
,
she could not resist on one occasion
showing
herself at the window, to enjoy the effect of
her finery on the passers by.
As the fates would have it, Pedrillo Pedrugo,
the meddlesome barber, was at this moment
sitting
idly in his shop on the opposite side of the
street, when his ever watchful eye caught the
sparkle of a diamond. In an instant he was at
his loop-hole reconnoitering the slattern spouse of
the water-carrier, decorated with the splendour
of an eastern bride. No sooner had he taken an
accurate inventory of her ornaments than he
posted
off with all speed to the Alcalde. In a little
while the hungry alguazil was again on the scent,
and before the day was over, the unfortunate
Peregil was again dragged into the presence of
the judge.
How is this, villain! cried the Alcalde in
a furious voice. You told me that the infidel
who died in your house left nothing behind but
an empty coffer, and now I hear of your wife
flaunting in her rags decked out with pearls and
diamonds. Wretch that thou art! prepare to
render up the spoils of thy miserable victim,
and to swing on the gallows that is already tired
of waiting for thee.
The terrified water-carrier fell on his knees,
and made a full relation of the marvellous
manner
in which he had gained his wealth. The
Alcalde, the alguazil, and the inquisitive barber
listened with greedy ears to this Arabian tale of
enchanted treasure. The alguazil was despatched
to bring the Moor who had assisted in the
incantation
.
The Moslem entered half frightened out
of his wits at finding himself in the hands of the
harpies of the law. When he beheld the
water-carrier
standing with sheepish look and
downcast
countenance, he comprehended the whole
matter. Miserable animal, said he, as he passed
near him, did I not warn thee against babbling
to thy wife?
The story of the Moor coincided exactly with
that of his colleague; but the Alcalde affected to
be slow of belief, and threw out menaces of
imprisonment
and rigorous investigation.
Softly, good Seor Alcalde, said the
Mussulman
,
who by this time had recovered his usual
shrewdness and self-possession. Let us not mar
fortune's favours in the scramble for them.
Nobody
knows any thing of this matter but
ourselves
;
let us keep the secret. There is wealth
enough in the cave to enrich us all. Promise a
fair division, and all shall be produced; refuse,
and the cave shall remain for ever closed.
The Alcalde consulted apart with the alguazil.
The latter was an old fox in his profession.
Promise
any thing, said he, until you get
possession
of the treasure. You may then seize upon
the whole, and if he and his accomplice dare to
murmur, threaten them with the faggot and the
stake as infidels and sorcerers.
The Alcalde relished the advice. Smoothing
his brow and turning to the Moor,This is a
strange story, said he, and may be true, but I
must have ocular proof of it. This very night
you must repeat the incantation in my presence.
If there be really such treasure, we will share it
amicably between us, and say nothing further of
the matter; if ye have deceived me, expect no
mercy at my hands. In the mean time you must
remain in custody.
The Moor and the water-carrier cheerfully
agreed to these conditions, satisfied that the event
would prove the truth of their words.
Towards midnight the Alcalde sallied forth
secretly
,
attended by the alguazil and the
meddlesome
barber, all strongly armed. They conducted
the Moor and the water-carrier as prisoners, and
were provided with the stout donkey of the
latter
,
to bear off the expected treasure. They
arrived
at the tower without being observed, and
tying
the donkey to a fig-tree descended into the
fourth vault of the tower.
The scroll was produced, the yellow waxen
taper
lighted, and the Moor read the form of
incantation
.
The earth trembled as before, and the
pavement opened with a thundering sound,
disclosing
the narrow flight of steps. The Alcalde,
the alguazil, and the barber were struck aghast,
and could not summon courage to descend. The
Moor and the water-carrier entered the lower
vault and found the two Moors seated as before,
silent and motionless. They removed two of
the great jars, filled with golden coin and
precious
stones. The water-carrier bore them up
one by one upon his shoulders, but though a
strong-backed little man, and accustomed to
carry
burdens, he staggered beneath their weight,
and found, when slung on each side of his
donkey
,
they were as much as the animal could
bear.
Let us be content for the present, said the
Moor; here is as much treasure as we can carry
off without being perceived, and enough to make
us all wealthy to our heart's desire.
Is there more treasure remaining behind?
demanded the Alcalde.
The greatest prize of all, said the Moor;
a huge coffer, bound with bands of steel, and
filled with pearls and precious stones.
Let us have up the coffer by all means,
cried the grasping Alcalde.
I will descend for no more, said the Moor,
VOL. II. 5
doggedly. Enough is enough for a reasonable
man; more is superfluous.
And I, said the water-carrier, will bring
up no further burthen to break the back of my
poor donkey.
Finding commands, threats, and entreaties
equally vain, the Alcalde turned to his two
adherents
.
Aid me, said he, to bring up the
coffer, and its contents shall be divided between
us. So saying he descended the steps, followed,
with trembling reluctance, by the alguazil and
the barber.
No sooner did the Moor behold them fairly
earthed than he extinguished the yellow taper:
the pavement closed with its usual crash, and the
three worthies remained buried in its womb.
He then hastened up the different flights of
steps, nor stopped until in the open air. The
little water-carrier followed him as fast as his
short legs would permit.
What hast thou done? cried Peregil, as
soon as he could recover breath. The Alcalde
and the other two are shut up in the vault!
It is the will of Allah! said the Moor
devoutly
.
And will you not release them? demanded
the Gallego.
Allah forbid! replied the Moor, smoothing
his beard. It is written in the book of fate
that they shall remain enchanted until some
future
adventurer shall come to break the charm.
The will of God be done! So saying he hurled
the end of the waxen taper far among the gloomy
thickets of the glen.
There was now no remedy; so the Moor and
the water-carrier proceeded with the richly laden
donkey towards the city: nor could honest
Peregil
refrain from hugging and kissing his
longeared
fellow labourer, thus restored to him from
the clutches of the law; and, in fact, it is doubtful
which gave the simple-hearted little man most
joy at the moment, the gaining of the treasure
or the recovery of the donkey.
The two partners in good luck divided their
spoil amicably and fairly, excepting that the
Moor, who had a little taste for trinketry, made
out to get into his heap the most of the pearls
and precious stones, and other baubles, but then
he always gave the water-carrier in lieu
magnificent
jewels of massy gold four times the size,
with which the latter was heartily content. They
took care not to linger within reach of accidents,
but made off to enjoy their wealth undisturbed in
other countries. The Moor returned into Africa,
to his native city of Tetuan, and the Gallego,
with his wife, his children and his donkey, made
the best of his way to Portugal. Here, under the
admonition and tuition of his wife, he became a
personage of some consequence, for she made the
little man array his long body and short legs in
doublet and hose, with a feather in his hat and a
sword by his side; and, laying aside the familiar
appellation of Peregil, assume the more sonorous
title of Don Pedro Gil. His progeny grew up a
thriving and merry-hearted, though short and
bandy-legged generation; while the Senora Gil,
be-fringed, be-laced, and be-tasselled from her
head to her heels, with glittering rings on every
finger, became a model of slattern fashion and
finery.
As to the Alcalde, and his adjuncts, they
remained
shut up under the great tower of the
Seven Floors, and there they remain spell bound
at the present day. Whenever there shall be a
lack in Spain of pimping barbers, sharking
alguazels
,
and corrupt Alcaldes, they may be sought
after; but if they have to wait until such time for
their deliverance, there is danger of their
enchantment
enduring until doomsday.
5 *
VISITORS TO THE ALHAMBRA.
It
is now nearly three months since I took up
my abode in the Alhambra, during which time
the progress of the season has wrought many
changes. When I first arrived every thing was
in the freshness of May; the foliage of the trees
was still tender and transparent; the
pomegranate
had not yet shed its brilliant crimson
blossoms
;
the orchards of the Xenil and the Darro
were in full bloom; the rocks were hung with
wild flowers, and Granada seemed completely
surrounded by a wilderness of roses, among
which innumerable nightingales sang, not merely
in the night, but all day long.
The advance of summer has withered the rose
and silenced the nightingale, and the distant
country
begins to look parched and sunburnt; though
a perennial verdure reigns immediately round the
city, and in the deep narrow valleys at the foot
of the snow-capped mountains.
The Alhambra possesses retreats graduated to
the heat of the weather, among which the most
peculiar is the almost subterranean apartment of
the baths. This still retains its ancient oriental
character though stamped with the touching traces
of decline. At the entrance, opening into a small
court formerly adorned with flowers, is a hall,
moderate in size, but light and graceful in
architecture
.
It is overlooked by a small gallery
supported
by marble pillars and moresco arches.
An alabaster fountain in the centre of the
pavement
still throws up a jet of water to cool the
place. On each side are deep alcoves with raised
platforms, where the bathers after their ablutions
reclined on luxurious cushions, soothed to
voluptuous
repose by the fragrance of the perfumed
air and the notes of soft music from the gallery.
Beyond this hall are the interior chambers, still
more private and retired, where no light is
admitted
but through small apertures in the vaulted
ceilings. Here was the sanctum sanctorum of
female privacy, where the beauties of the harem
indulged in the luxury of the baths. A soft
mysterious
light reigns through the place, the broken
baths are still there, and traces of ancientelegance.
The prevailing silence and obscurity have made
this a favourite resort of bats, who nestle during
the day in the dark nooks and corners, and, on
being disturbed, flit mysteriously about the
twilight
chambers, heightening in an indescribable
degree their air of desertion and decay.
In this cool and elegant though dilapidated
retreat
,
which has the freshness and seclusion of a
grotto, I have of late passed the sultry hours of
the day; emerging toward sunset, and bathing,
or rather swimming, at night in the great
reservoir
of the main court. In this way I have been
enabled in a measure to counteract the relaxing
and enervating influence of the climate.
My dream of absolute sovereignty, however, is
at an end: I was roused from it lately by the
report
of fire-arms, which reverberated among the
towers as if the castle had been taken by surprise.
On sallying forth I found an old cavalier with a
number of domestics in possession of the hall of
ambassadors. He was an ancient Count, who had
come up from his palace in Granada to pass a
short time in the Alhambra for the benefit of
purer air, and who, being a veteran and
inveterate
sportsman, was endeavouring to get an
appetite
for his breakfast by shooting at swallows
from the balconies. It was a harmless amusement,
for though, by the alertness of his attendants in
loading his pieces, he was enabled to keep up a
brisk fire, I could not accuse him of the death
of a single swallow. Nay, the birds themselves
seemed to enjoy the sport, and to deride his want
of skill, skimming in circles close to the
balconies
,
and twittering as they darted by.
The arrival of this old gentleman has in some
measure changed the aspect of affairs, but has
likewise afforded matter for agreeable
speculation
.
We have tacitly shared the empire
between
us, like the last kings of Granada,
excepting
that we maintain a most amicable
alliance
.
He reigns absolute over the court of the
Lions and its adjacent halls, while I maintain
peaceful possession of the region of the baths and
the little garden of Lindaraxa. We take our
meals together under the arcades of the court,
where the fountains cool the air, and bubbling
rills run along the channels of the marble
pavement
.
In the evening, a domestic circle gathers about
the worthy old cavalier. The countess comes up
from the city, with a favourite daughter about
sixteen years of age. Then there are the
official
dependents of the Count, his chaplain, his
lawyer, his secretary, his steward, and other
officers
and agents of his extensive possessions.
Thus he holds a kind of domestic court, where
every person seeks to contribute to his
amusement
,
without sacrificing his own pleasure or
self-respect
.
In fact, whatever may be said of
Spanish
pride, it certainly does not enter into social
or domestic life. Among no people are the
relations
between kindred more cordial, or
between
superior and dependent more frank and
genial
;
in these respects there still remains, in the
provincial life of Spain, much of the vaunted
simplicity of the olden times.
The most interesting member of this family
group, however, is the daughter of the Count,
the charming though almost infantine little
Carmen
.
Her form has not yet attained its
maturity
,
but has already the exquisite symmetry and
pliant grace so prevalent in this country. Her
blue eyes, fair complexion and light hair are
unusual
in Andalusia, and give a mildness and
gentleness
to her demeanour, in contrast to the
usual
fire of Spanish beauty, but in perfect unison
with the guileless and confiding innocence of her
manners. She has, however, all the innate
aptness
and versatility of her fascinating
country-women
,
and sings, dances, and plays the guitar
and other instruments to admiration. A few
days after taking up his residence in the
Alhambra
,
the Count gave a domestic fete on his saint's
day, assembling round him the members of his
family and household, while several old servants
came from his distant possessions to pay their
reverence
to him, and partake of the good cheer.
This patriarchal spirit which characterized the
Spanish nobility in the days of their opulence
has declined with their fortunes; but some who,
like the Count, still retain their ancient family
possessions, keep up a little of the ancient
system
,
and have their estates overrun and almost
eaten up by generations of idle retainers.
According
to this magnificent old Spanish system,
in which the national pride and generosity bore
equal parts, a superannuated servant was never
turned off, but became a charge for the rest of
his days; nay, his children, and his children's
children, and often their relations, to the right
and left, became gradually entailed upon the
family. Hence the huge palaces of the Spanish
nobility, which have such an air of empty
ostentation
from the greatness of their size compared
with the mediocrity and scantiness of their
furniture
,
were absolutely required in the golden
days of Spain by the patriarchal habits of their
possessors. They were little better than vast
barracks for the hereditary generations of
hangers-on
that battened at the expense of a Spanish
noble. The worthy Count, who has estates in
various parts of the kingdom, assures me that
some of them barely feed the hordes of
dependents
nestled upon them; who consider
themselves
entitled to be maintained upon the place,
rent free, because their forefathers have been so
for generations.
The domestic fete of the Count broke in upon
the usual still life of the Alhambra. Music and
laughter resounded through its late silent halls;
there were groups of the guests amusing
themselves
about the galleries and gardens, and
officious
servants from town hurrying through the
courts, bearing viands to the ancient kitchen,
which was again alive with the tread of cooks
and scullions, and blazed with unwonted fires.
The feast, for a Spanish set dinner is literally
a feast, was laid in the beautiful moresco hall
called la sala de las dos Hermanas, (the saloon
of the two sisters;) the table groaned with
abundance
,
and a joyous conviviality prevailed round
the board; for though the Spaniards are generally
an abstemious people, they are complete
revellers
at a banquet.
For my own part, there was something
peculiarly
interesting in thus sitting at a feast, in the
royal halls of the Alhambra, given by the
representative
of one of its most renowned conquerors;
for the venerable Count, though unwarlike
himself
,
is the lineal descendant and representative
of the Great Captain, the illustrious Gonsalvo
of Cordova, whose sword he guards in the
archives of his palace at Granada.
The banquet ended, the company adjourned
to the hall of ambassadors. Here every one
contributed
to the general amusement by exerting
some peculiar talent; singing, improvising,
telling
wonderful tales, or dancing to that all
pervading
talisman of Spanish pleasure, the guitar.
The life and charm of the whole assemblage,
however, was the gifted little Carmen. She took
her part in two or three scenes from Spanish
comedies, exhibiting a charming dramatic talent:
VOL. II. 6
she gave imitations of the popular Italian
singers
,
with singular and whimsical felicity, and a
rare quality of voice; she imitated the dialects,
dances, and ballads of the gipsies and the
neighbouring
peasantry, but did every thing with a
facility, a neatness, a grace, and an
all-pervading
prettiness, that were perfectly fascinating.
The great charm of her performances, however,
was their being free from all pretension or
ambition
of display. She seemed unconscious of the
extent of her own talents, and in fact is
accustomed
only to exert them casually, like a child,
for the amusement of the domestic circle. Her
observation and tact must be remarkably quick,
for her life is passed in the bosom of her family,
and she can only have had casual and transient
glances at the various characters and traits,
brought out
imprompiu
in moments of domestic
hilarity, like the one in question. It is pleasing
to see the fondness and admiration with which
every one of the household regards her: she is
never spoken of, even by the domestics, by any
other appellation than that of La Nia, the
child, an appellation which thus applied has
something peculiarly kind and endearing in the
Spanish language.
Never shall I think of the Alhambra without
remembering the lovely little Carmen sporting in
happy and innocent girlhood in its marble halls;
dancing to the sound of the Moorish Castanets,
or mingling the silver warbling of her voice
with the music of the fountains.
On this festive occasion several curious and
amusing legends and traditions were told; many
of which have escaped my memory; but of those
that most struck me, I will endeavour to shape
forth some entertainment for the reader.
LEGEND OF PRINCE AHMED AL KAMEL, OR THE
PILGRIM OF LOVE.
There
was once a Moorish King of Granada
who had but one son, whom he named Ahmed,
to which his courtiers added the surname of al
Kamel, or the perfect, from the indubitable signs
of super-excellence which they perceived in him
in his very infancy. The astrologers
countenanced
them in their foresight, predicting every
thing in his favour that could make a perfect
prince and a prosperous sovereign. One cloud
only rested upon his destiny, and even that was
of a roseate hue. He would be of an amorous
temperament, and run great perils from the
tender
passion. If, however, he could be kept
from the allurements of love until of mature
age, these dangers would be averted, and his life
thereafter be one uninterrupted course of felicity.
To prevent all danger of the kind, the king
wisely determined to rear the prince in a
seclusion
,
where he should never see a female face nor
hear even the name of love. For this purpose
he built a beautiful palace on the brow of a hill
above the Alhambra, in the midst of delightful
gardens, but surrounded by lofty walls; being, in
fact, the same palace known at the present day
by the name of the Generalife. In this palace the
youthful prince was shut up and entrusted to the
guardianship and instruction of Ebon Bonabbon,
one of the wisest and dryest of Arabian sages,
who had passed the greatest part of his life in
Egypt, studying hieroglyphics and making
researches
among the tombs and pyramids, and
who saw more charms in an Egyptian mummy
than in the most tempting of living beauties.
The sage was ordered to instruct the prince in
all kinds of knowledge but onehe is to be kept
utterly ignorant of loveuse every precaution
for the purpose you may think proper, said the
king, but remember, oh Ebon Bonabbon, if
my son learns aught of that forbidden
knowledge
,
while under your care, your head shall
answer
6 *
for it. A withered smile came over the
dry visage of the wise Bonabbon at the menace.
Let your majesty's heart be as easy about your
son as mine is about my head. Am I a man
likely to give lessons in the idle passion?
Under the vigilant care of the philosopher, the
prince grew up in the seclusion of the palace
and its gardens. He had black slaves to attend
upon himhideous mutes, who knew nothing of
love, or if they did, had not words to
communicate
it. His mental endowments were the
peculiar
care of Ebon Bonabbon, who sought to
initiate
him into the abstruse lore of Egypt, but in
this the prince made little progress, and it was
soon evident that he had no turn for philosophy.
He was, however, amazingly ductile for a
youthful prince; ready to follow any advice and
always guided by the last councillor. He
suppressed
his yawns, and listened patiently to the
long and learned discourses of Ebon Bonabbon,
from which he imbibed a smattering of various
kinds of knowledge, and thus happily attained
his twentieth year, a miracle of princely
wisdom
,
but totally ignorant of love.
About this time, however, a change came
over the conduct of the prince. He completely
abandoned his studies and took to strolling about
the gardens and musing by the side of the
fountains
.
He had been taught a little music among
his various accomplishments; it now engrossed a
great part of his time, and a turn for poetry
became
apparent. The sage Ebon Bonabbon took
the alarm, and endeavoured to work these idle
humours out of him by a severe course of algebra;
but the prince turned from it with distaste. I
cannot endure algebra, said he; it is an
abomination
to me. I want something that speaks
more to the heart.
The sage Ebon Bonabbon shook his dry head
at the words. Here's an end to philosophy,
thought he. The prince has discovered he
has a heart! He now kept anxious watch
upon his pupil, and saw that the latent
tenderness
of his nature was in activity, and only
wanted an object. He wandered about the
gardens
of the Generalife in an intoxication of
feelings
of which he knew not the cause.
Sometimes
he would sit plunged in a delicious reverie;
then he would seize his lute and draw from it
the most touching notes, and then throw it aside,
and break forth into sighs and ejaculations.
By degrees this loving disposition began to
extend to inanimate objects; he had his favourite
flowers which he cherished with tender
assiduity
;
then he became attached to various trees,
and there was one in particular, of a graceful
form and drooping foliage, on which he lavished
his amorous devotion, carving his name on its
bark, hanging garlands on its branches, and
singing
couplets in its praise, to the accompaniment
of his lute.
The sage Ebon Bonabbon was alarmed at this
excited state of his pupil. He saw him on the
very brink of forbidden knowledgethe least
hint might reveal to him the fatal secret.
Trembling
for the safety of the prince, and the
security
of his own head, he hastened to draw him
from the seductions of the garden, and shut him
up in the highest tower of the Generalife. It
contained beautiful apartments, and commanded
an almost boundless prospect, but was elevated
far above that atmosphere of sweets and those
witching bowers so dangerous to the feelings of
the too susceptible Ahmed.
What was to be done, however, to reconcile
him to this restraint and to beguile the tedious
hours? He had exhausted almost all kinds of
agreeable knowledge; and algebra was not to be
mentioned. Fortunately Ebon Benabbon had
been instructed, when in Egypt, in the language
of birds, by a Jewish Rabbin, who had received
it in lineal transmission from Solomon the wise,
who had been taught it by the Queen of Sheba.
At the very mention of such a study the eyes of
the prince sparkled with animation, and he
applied
himself to it with such avidity, that he
soon became as great an adept as his master.
The tower of the Generalife was no longer a
solitude; he had companions at hand with whom
he could converse. The first acquaintance he
formed was with a hawk who built his nest in a
crevice of the lofty battlements, from whence he
soared far and wide in quest of prey. The prince,
however, found little to like or esteem in him.
He was a mere pirate of the air, swaggering and
boastful, whose talk was all about rapine, and
carnage
,
and desperate exploits.
His next acquaintance was an owl, a mighty
wise looking bird, with a large head and staring
eyes, who sat blinking and goggling all day in a
hole in the wall, but roamed forth at night. He
had great pretensions to wisdom; talked
something
of astrology and the moon, and hinted at
the dark sciences, but he was grievously given to
metaphysics, and the prince found his prosings
were more ponderous than those of the sage
Ebon Bonabbon.
Then there was a bat, that hung all day by his
heels in the dark corner of a vault, but sallied
out in a slip-shod style at twilight. He,
however
,
had but twilight ideas on all subjects,
derided things of which he had taken but an
imperfect view, and seemed to take delight in
nothing.
Beside these there was a swallow, with whom
the prince was at first much taken. He was a
smart talker, but restless, bustling, and for ever
on the wing; seldom remaining long enough for
any continued conversation. He turned out in
the end to be a mere smatterer, who did but
skim over the surface of things, pretending to
know every thing, but knowing nothing
thoroughly
.
These were the only feathered associates with
whom the prince had any opportunity of
exercising
his newly acquired language; the tower was
too high for any other birds to frequent it. He
soon grew weary of his new acquaintances,
whose conversation spake so little to the head
and nothing to the heart; and gradually relapsed
into his loneliness. A winter passed away,
spring opened with all its bloom, and verdure,
and breathing sweetness, and the happy time
arrived
for birds to pair and build their nests.
Suddenly, as it were, a universal burst of song
and melody broke forth from the groves and
gardens of the Generalife, and reached the
prince in the solitude of his tower. From
every side he heard the same universal theme
lovelovelovechaunted forth and
responded
to in every variety of note and tone. The
prince listened in silence and perplexity. What
can be this love, thought he, of which the
world seems so full, and of which I know
nothing
?
He applied for information to his friend
the hawk. The ruffian bird answered in a tone
of scorn,You must apply, said he, to the
vulgar, peaceable, birds of earth, who are made
for the prey of us princes of the air. My trade is
war, and fighting my delight. In a word, I am
a warrior, and know nothing of this thing called
love.
The prince turned from him with disgust, and
sought the owl in his retreat. This is a bird,
said he, of peaceful habits, and may be able to
solve my question. So he asked the owl to tell
him what was this love about which all the birds
in the groves below were singing.
Upon this the owl put on a look of offended
dignity. My nights, said he are taken up in
study and research, and my days in ruminating
in my cell upon all that I have learnt. As to
these singing birds of whom you talk I never
listen to them. I despise them and their themes.
Allah be praised, I cannot sing. In a word, I am
a philosopher, and know nothing of this thing
called love.
The prince now repaired to the vault where his
friend the bat was hanging by the heels, and
propounded
the same question. The bat wrinkled
up his nose into a most snappish expression.
Why do you disturb me in my morning's nap
with such an idle question, said he peevishly.
I only fly by twilight when all birds are asleep,
and never trouble myself with their concerns. I
am neither bird nor beast, and I thank heaven
for it. I have found out the villainy of the
whole of them, and hate them, one and all. In a
word, I am a misanthrope, and know nothing of
this thing called love.
As a last resort, the prince now sought the
swallow, and stopped him just as he was circling
about the summit of the tower. The swallow as
usual was in a prodigious hurry, and had scarce
time to make a reply. Upon my word, said
he, I have so much public business to attend to,
and so many pursuits to follow, that I have had no
time to think on the subject. I have every day
a thousand visits to pay; a thousand affairs of
importance to examine into, that leave me not a
moment of leisure for these little sing-song
matters
.
In a word, I am a citizen of the world. I
know nothing of this thing called love. So
saying
,
the swallow dived into the valley and was
out of sight in a moment.
The prince remained disappointed and
perplexed
,
but with his curiosity still more piqued
by the difficulty of gratifying it. While in this
mood his ancient guardian entered the tower.
The prince advanced eagerly to meet him. Oh
sage Ebon Bonabbon, cried he, thou hast
revealed
to me much of the wisdom of the earth,
but there is one thing of which I remain in utter
ignorance, and would fain be informed.
My prince has but to make the inquiry, and
every thing within the limited range of his
servant's
intellect is at his command.
Tell me then, oh most profound of sages,
what is the nature of this thing called love?
The sage Ebon Bonabbon was struck as with
VOL. II. 7
a thunderbolt. He trembled and turned pale, and
felt as if his head sat but loosely on his
shoulders
.
What could suggest such a question to my
prince?where could he have learnt so idle a
word?
The prince led him to the window of the tower.
Listen, oh Ebon Bonabbon! said he. The
sage listened. The nightingale sat in a thicket
below the tower singing to his paramour the rose;
from every blossomed spray and tufted grove
arose a strain of melody, and lovelovelove,
was still the unvarying theme. Allah Achbar!
God is great! exclaimed the wise Bonabbon.
Who shall pretend to keep this secret from the
hearts of men when even the birds of the air
conspire
to betray it?
Then turning to Ahmed, Oh my prince,
cried he, shut thine ears to these seductive
strains. Close thy mind against this dangerous
knowledge. Know that this love is the cause of
half the ills of wretched mortality. It is this
which produces bitterness of strife between
brethren
and friends; which causes treacherous
murder
and desolating war. Care and sorrow, weary
days and sleepless nights, are its attendants. It
withers the bloom and blights the joys of youth,
and brings on the ills and griefs of premature old
age. Allah preserve thee, my prince, in total
ignorance of this thing called love!
The sage Ebon Bonabbon hastily retired,
leaving the prince plunged in still deeper
perplexity
.
It was in vain he attempted to dismiss
the subject from his mind; it still continued
uppermost
in his thoughts, and teased and exhausted
him with vain conjectures. Surely, said he to
himself as he listened to the tuneful strains of the
birds, there is no sorrow in those notes: every
thing seems tenderness and joy. If love be a
cause of such wretchedness and strife why are not
these birds drooping in solitude, or tearing each
other in pieces, instead of fluttering cheerfully
about the groves, or sporting with each other
among the flowers?
He lay one morning on his couch meditating
on this inexplicable matter. The window of
his chamber was open to admit the soft morning
breeze which came laden with the perfume of
orange blossoms from the valley of the Darro.
The voice of the nightingale was faintly heard,
still chanting the wonted theme. As the prince
was listening and sighing, there was a sudden
rushing noise in the air; a beautiful dove,
pursued
by a hawk, darted in at the window and
fell panting on the floor; while the pursuer,
balked
of his prey, soared off to the mountains.
The prince took up the gasping bird, smoothed
its feathers, and nestled it in his bosom. When
he had soothed it by his caresses he put it in a
golden cage, and offered it, with his own hands,
the whitest and finest of wheat and the purest of
water. The bird, however, refused food, and
sat drooping, and pining, and uttering piteous
moans.
What aileth thee? said Ahmed. Hast thou
not every thing thy heart can wish?
Alas, no! replied the dove, am I not
separated
from the partner of my heartand that
too in the happy spring-timethe very season of
love?
Of love! echoed Ahmed. I pray thee, my
pretty bird, canst thou then tell me what is
love?
Too well can I, my prince. It is the torment
of one, the felicity of two, the strife and enmity
of three. It is a charm which draws two beings
together, and unites them by delicious
sympathies
,
making it happiness to be with each other,
but misery to be apart. Is there no being to
whom you are drawn by these ties of tender
affection
?
I like my old teacher, Ebon Bonabbon, better
than any other being; but he is often tedious,
and I occasionally feel myself happier without
his society.
That is not the sympathy I mean. I speak
of love, the great mystery and principle of life;
the intoxicating revel of youth; the sober
delight
of age. Look forth, my prince, and behold
how at this blest season all nature is full of love.
Every created being has its mate; the most
insignificant
bird sings to its paramour; the very
beetle woos its lady beetle in the dust, and yon
butterflies which you see fluttering high above
the tower and toying in the air are happy in each
other's loves. Alas, my prince! hast thou spent
so many of the precious days of youth without
knowing any thing of love! Is there no gentle
being of another sex; no beautiful princess, or
lovely damsel who has ensnared your heart, and
filled your bosom with a soft tumult of pleasing
pains and tender wishes?
I begin to understand! said the prince
sighing
.
Such a tumult I have more than once
experienced
7 *
without knowing the cause; and where
should I seek for an object such as you describe
in this dismal solitude?
A little further conversation ensued, and the
first amatory lesson of the prince was complete.
Alas! said he, if love be indeed such a
delight, and its interruption such a misery, Allah
forbid that I should mar the joy of any of its
votaries
.
He opened the cage, took out the dove,
and, having fondly kissed it, carried it to the
window
.
Go, happy bird, said he, rejoice with
the partner of thy heart in the days of youth and
spring-time. Why should I make thee a fellow
prisoner in this dreary tower, where love can
never
enter?
The dove flapped its wings in rapture, gave
one vault into the air, and then swooped downward
on whistling wings to the blooming bowers of
the Darro.
The prince followed him with his eyes, and
then gave way to bitter repining. The singing
of the birds which once delighted him now added
to his bitterness. Love! love! love! Alas, poor
youth, he now understood the strain.
His eyes flashed fire when next he beheld the
sage Bonabbon. Why hast thou kept me in this
abject ignorance? cried he. Why has the great
mystery and principle of life been withheld from
me, in which I find the meanest insect is so
learned
?
Behold all nature is in a revel of delight.
Every created being rejoices with its mate. This
this is the love about which I have sought
instruction
;
why am I alone debarred its
enjoyment
?
why has so much of my youth been
wasted
without a knowledge of its raptures?
The sage Bonabbon saw that all further
reserve
was useless, for the prince had acquired
the dangerous and forbidden knowledge. He
revealed to him, therefore, the predictions of the
astrologers, and the precautions that had been
taken
in his education to avert the threatened
evils. And now, my prince, added he, my
life is in your hands. Let the king your father
discover that you have learned the passion of love
while under my guardianship, and my head must
answer for it.
The prince was as reasonable as most young
men of his age, and easily listened to the
remonstrances
of his tutor, since nothing pleaded
against them. Beside, he really was attached
to the sage Bonabbon, and being as yet but
theoretically
acquainted with the passion of love, he
consented to confine the knowledge of it to his
own bosom, rather than endanger the head of the
philosopher. His discretion was doomed,
however
,
to be put to still further proofs. A few
mornings afterwards, as he was ruminating on
the battlements of the tower, the dove which had
been released by him came hovering in the air,
and alighted fearlessly upon his shoulder.
The prince fondled it to his breast. Happy
bird, said he, who can fly, as it were, with the
wings of the morning to the uttermost parts of
the earth. Where hast thou been since we
parted?
In a far country, my prince; from whence I
bring you tidings in reward for my liberty. In
the wide compass of my flight, which extends
over plain and mountain, as I was soaring in the
air, I beheld below me a delightful garden with
all kinds of fruits and flowers. It was in a green
meadow on the banks of a meandering stream, and
in the centre of the garden was a stately palace. I
alighted in one of the bowers to repose after my
weary flight: on the green bank below me was a
youthful princess in the very sweetness and bloom
of her years. She was surrounded by female
attendants
,
young like herself, who decked her with
garlands and coronets of flowers; but no flower
of field or garden could compare with her for
loveliness. Here, however, she bloomed in
secret
,
for the garden was surrounded by high
walls, and no mortal man was permitted to enter.
When I beheld this beauteous maid thus young,
and innocent, and unspotted by the world, I
thought, here is the being formed by heaven to
inspire my prince with love.
The description was as a spark of fire to the
combustible heart of Ahmed; all the latent
amorousness
of his temperament had at once found
an object, and he conceived an immeasurable
passion
for the princess. He wrote a letter couched
in the most impassioned language, breathing his
fervent devotion, but the unhappy thraldom of his
person, which prevented him from seeking her
out, and throwing himself at her feet. He added
couplets of the most tender and moving eloquence,
for he was a poet by nature and inspired by love.
He addressed his letter, To the unknown
beauty, from the captive prince Ahmed, then
perfuming it with musk and roses, he gave it to
the dove.
A way, trustiest of messengers, said he. Fly
over mountain, and valley, and river, and plain;
rest not in bower nor set foot on earth, until thou
hast given this letter to the mistress of my
heart.
The dove soared high in air, and taking his
course darted away in one undeviating direction.
The prince followed him with his eye until he
was a mere speck on a cloud, and gradually
disappeared
behind a mountain.
Day after day he watched for the return of the
messenger of love; but he watched in vain. He
began to accuse him of forgetfulness, when
towards
sunset, one evening, the faithful bird
fluttered
into his apartment, and, falling at his feet,
expired. The arrow of some wanton archer had
pierced his breast, yet he had struggled with the
lingerings of life to execute his mission. As the
prince bent with grief over this gentle martyr to
fidelity, he beheld a chain of pearls round his
neck, attached to which, beneath his wing, was a
small enamelled picture. It represented a lovely
princess in the very flower of her years. It was,
doubtless, the unknown beauty of the garden:
but who and where was shehow had she
received
his letterand was this picture sent as a
token of an approval of his passion?
Unfortunately
,
the death of the faithful dove left every
thing in mystery and doubt.
The prince gazed on the picture till his eyes
swam with tears. He pressed it to his lips and
to his heart; he sat for hours contemplating it
in an almost agony of tenderness. Beautiful
image! said he. Alas, thou art but an image.
Yet thy dewy eyes beam tenderly upon me;
those rosy lips look as though they would speak
encouragement. Vain fancies! Have they not
looked the same on some more happy rival? But
where in this wide world shall I hope to find the
original? Who knows what mountains, what
realms may separate us? What adverse chances
may intervene? Perhaps now, even now, lovers
may be crowding around her, while I sit here, a
prisoner in a tower, wasting my time in
adoration
of a painted shadow.
The resolution of prince Ahmed was taken.
I will fly from this palace, said he, which
has become an odious prison, and, a pilgrim of
love, will seek this unknown princess throughout
the world.
To escape from the tower in the day, when
every one was awake, might be a difficult matter;
but at night the palace was slightly guarded, for
no one apprehended any attempt of the kind
from the prince, who had always been so passive
in his captivity. How was he to guide himself,
however, in his darkling flight, being ignorant of
the country. He bethought him of the owl, who
was accustomed to roam at night, and must know
every by-lane and secret pass. Seeking him in
his hermitage, he questioned him touching his
knowledge of the land. Upon this the owl put
on a mighty self-important look.
You must know, O prince, said he, that
we owls are of a very ancient and extensive
family
,
though rather fallen to decay, and possess
ruinous castles and palaces in all parts of Spain.
There is scarcely a tower of the mountains, or
fortress of the plains, or an old citadel of a city
but has some brother, or uncle, or cousin
quartered
in it; and in going the rounds to visit these my
numerous kindred I have pryed into every nook
and corner, and made myself acquainted with
every secret of the land.
The prince was overjoyed to find the owl so
deeply versed in topography, and now informed
him, in confidence, of his tender passion and his
intended elopement, urging him to be his
companion
and counsellor.
Go to! said the owl, with a look of
displeasure
.
Am I a bird to engage in a love affair; I
whose whole time is devoted to meditation and
the moon!
Be not offended, most solemn owl! replied
the prince. Abstract thyself for a time from
meditation and the moon, and aid me in my flight,
and thou shalt have whatever heart can wish.
I have that already, said the owl. A few
mice are sufficient for my frugal table, and this
hole in the wall is spacious enough for my studies,
and what more does a philosopher like myself
desire
?
Bethink thee, most wise owl, that while
moping in thy cell and gazing at the moon all thy
talents arel ost to the world. I shall one day be a
sovereign prince, and may advance thee to some
post of honour and dignity.
The owl, though a philosopher and above the
ordinary wants of life, was not above ambition,
so he was finally prevailed upon to elope with
the prince, and be his guide and Mentor in his
pilgrimage.
The plans of a lover are promptly executed.
The prince collected all his jewels and concealed
them about his person as travelling funds. That
very night he lowered himself by his scarf from
a balcony of the tower, clambered over the outer
VOL. II. 8
walls of the Generalife, and guided by the owl,
made good his escape before morning to the
mountains
.
He now held a council with his Mentor as to
his future course.
Might I advise, said the owl, I would
recommend
you to repair to Seville. You must
know that many years since I was on a visit to
an uncle, an owl of great dignity and power, who
lived in a ruined wing of the Alcazar of that place.
In my hoverings at night over the city I
frequently
remarked a light burning in a lonely tower.
At length I alighted on the battlements, and found
it to proceed from the lamp of an Arabian
magician
.
He was surrounded by his magic books,
and on his shoulder was perched his familiar, an
ancient raven, who had come with him from
Egypt. I became acquainted with that raven,
and owe to him a great part of the knowledge I
possess. The magician is since dead, but the
raven
still inhabits the tower, for these birds are of
wonderful long life. I would advise you, O
prince, to seek that raven, for he is a soothsayer
and a conjurer, and deals in the black art, for
which all ravens, and especially those of Egypt,
are renowned.
The prince was struck with the wisdom of this
advice, and accordingly bent his course toward
Seville. He travelled only in the night, to
accommodate
his companion, and lay by during the day
in some dark cavern or mouldering watch-tower,
for the owl knew every hiding hole of the kind
in the country, and had a most antiquarian taste
for ruins.
At length, one morning at day-break they
reached the city of Seville, where the owl, who
hated the glare and bustle of crowded streets,
halted without the gate, and took up his quarters
in a hollow tree.
The prince entered the gate and readily found
the magic tower, which rose above the houses of
the city as a palm tree rises above the shrubs of
the desert. It was, in fact, the same tower known
at the present day as the Giralda, the famous
Moorish tower of Seville.
The prince ascended by a great winding
staircase
to the summit of the tower, where he found
the cabalistic raven, an old, mysterious,
grey-headed
bird, ragged in feather, with a film over
one eye that gave him the glare of a spectre. He
was perched on one leg, with his head turned on
one side, and poring with his remaining eye on a
diagram described on the pavement.
The prince approached him with the awe and
reverence naturally inspired by his venerable
appearance
and supernatural wisdom. Pardon me,
most ancient and darkly wise raven, exclaimed
he, if for a moment I interrupt those studies
which are the wonder of the world. You
behold
before you a votary of love, who would
fain seek council how to obtain the object of his
passion.
In other words, said the raven with a
significant
look, you seek to try my skill in
palmistry
.
Come, show me your hand, and let me
decipher
the mysterious lines of fortune.
Excuse me, said the prince, I come not
to pry into the decrees of fate, which are hidden
by Allah from the eyes of mortals. I am a
pilgrim
of love, and seek but to find a clue to the
object
of my pilgrimage.
And can you be at any loss for an object in
amorous Andalusia, said the old raven, leering
upon him with his single eye. Above all, can
you be at a loss in wanton Seville, where
black-eyed
damsels dance the zambra under every
orange grove?
The prince blushed and was somewhat
shocked
at hearing an old bird, with one foot in the
grave, talk thus loosely. Believe me, said he
gravely, I am on none such light and vagrant
errand as thou dost insinuate. The black-eyed
damsels of Andalusia who dance among the
orange groves of the Guadalquiver, are as naught
to me. I seek one unknown but immaculate
beauty
,
the original of this picture, and I beseech
thee, most potent raven, if it be within the scope
of thy knowledge, or the reach of thy art, inform
me where she may be found.
The gray-headed raven was rebuked by the
gravity of the prince. What know I, replied
he dryly, of youth and beauty? My visits are
to the old and withered, not the young and fair.
The harbinger of fate am I, who croak bodings of
death from the chimney top, and flap my wings
at the sick man's window. You must seek
elsewhere
for tidings of your unknown beauty.
And where am I to seek, if not among the
sons of wisdom, versed in the book of destiny. A
royal prince am I, fated by the stars and sent on a
mysterious enterprise, on which may hang the
destiny of empires.
When the raven heard that it was a matter of
vast moment, in which the stars took interest,
he changed his tone and manner, and listened
with profound attention to the story of the prince.
8*
When it was concluded he replied, Touching
this princess, I can give thee no information of
myself, for my flight is not among gardens or
around ladies' bowers; but hie thee to Cordova,
seek the palm-tree of the great Abderahman,
which stands in the court of the principal mosque,
at the foot of it you will find a great traveller,
who has visited all countries and courts, and been
a favourite with queens and princesses. He will
give you tidings of the object of your search.
Many thanks for this precious information,
said the prince. Farewell, most venerable
conjurer
.
Farewell, pilgrim of love, said the raven
dryly, and again fell to pondering on the
diagram
.
The prince sallied forth from Seville, sought
his fellow traveller the owl, who was still dozing
in the hollow tree, and set off for Cordova.
He approached it along hanging gardens, and
orange and citron groves overlooking the fair
valley
of the Guadalquiver. When arrived at its
gates the owl flew up to a dark hole in the wall,
and the prince proceeded in quest of the
palm-tree
planted in days of yore by the great
Abderahman. It stood in the midst of the great
court of the Mosque, towering from amidst
orange and cypress trees. Dervises and Faquirs
were seated in groups under the cloisters of the
court, and many of the faithful were
performing
their ablutions at the fountains, before
entering
the Mosque.
At the foot of the palm-tree was a crowd
listening
to the words of one who appeared to be
talking
with great volubility. This, said the prince
to himself, must be the great traveller who is to
give me tidings of the unknown princess. He
mingled in the crowd, but was astonished to
perceive
that they were all listening to a parrot, who,
with his bright green coat, pragmatical eye, and
consequential topknot, had the air of a bird on
excellent terms with himself.
How is this, said the prince to one of the
by-standers
,
that so many grave persons can be
delighted
with the garrulity of a chattering bird?
You know not of whom you speak, said the
other; this parrot is a descendant of the famous
parrot of Persia, renowned for his story-telling
talent. He has all the learning of the East at the
tip of his tongue, and can quote poetry as fast as
he can talk. He has visited foreign courts,
where he has been considered an oracle of
erudition
.
He has been a universal favourite also with
the fair sex, who have a vast admiration for
erudite
parrots that can quote poetry.
Enough, said the prince, I will have
some private talk with this distinguished
traveller
.
He sought a private interview, and expounded
the nature of his errand. He had scarcely
mentioned
it when the parrot burst into a fit of dry
rickety laughter, that absolutely brought tears in
his eyes. Excuse my mirth, said he, but
the mere mention of love always sets me
laughing
.
The prince was shocked at this ill-timed
merriment
.
Is not love, said he, the great
mystery
of nature,the secret principle of life,the
universal bond of sympathy?
A fig's end! cried the parrot, interrupting
him. Pry'thee where hast thou learnt this
sentimental
jargon? Trust me, love is quite out of
vogue; one never hears of it in the company of
wits and people of refinement.
The prince sighed as he recalled the different
language of his friend the dove. But this parrot,
thought he, has lived about court, he affects the
wit and the fine gentleman; he knows nothing of
the thing called love.
Unwilling to provoke any more ridicule of the
sentiment which filled his heart, he now directed
his inquiries to the immediate purport of his
visit.
Tell me, said he, most accomplished
parrot
,
thou who hast every where been admitted to
the most secret bowers of beauty, hast thou in
the course of thy travels met with the original of
this portrait?
The parrot took the picture in his claw,
turned
his head from side to side, and examined it
curiously with either eye. Upon my honour,
said he, a very pretty face; very pretty. But
then one sees so many pretty women in one's
travels that one can hardlybut holdbless me!
now I look at it againsure enough, this is the
princess Aldegonda: how could I forget one that
is so prodigious a favourite with me?
The princess Aldegonda! echoed the prince,
and where is she to be found?
Softlysoftly, said the parrot, easier to be
found than gained. She is the only daughter of
the Christian king who reigns at Toledo, and is
shut up from the world until her seventeenth
birth-day, on account of some prediction of those
meddlesome fellows the astrologers. You'll not
get a sight of her, no mortal man can see her.
I was admitted to her presence to entertain her,
and I assure you, on the word of a parrot who
has seen the world, I have conversed with much
sillier princesses in my time.
A word in confidence, my dear parrot, said
the prince. I am heir to a kingdom, and shall
one day sit upon a throne. I see that you are a
bird of parts, and understand the world. Help
me to gain possession of this princess and I will
advance you to some distinguished post about
court.
With all my heart, said the parrot; but
let it be a sinecure if possible, for we wits have a
great dislike to labour.
Arrangements were promptly made; the prince
sallied forth from Cordova through the same gate
by which he had entered; called the owl down
from the hole in the wall, introduced him to his
new travelling companion as a brother savant,
and away they set off on their journey.
They travelled much more slowly than
accorded
with the impatience of the prince, but the
parrot was accustomed to high life, and did not
like to be disturbed early in the morning. The
owl, on the other hand, was for sleeping at
mid-day
,
and lost a great deal of time by his long
siestas. His antiquarian taste also was in the
way; for he insisted on pausing and inspecting
every ruin, and had long legendary tales to tell
about every old tower and castle in the country.
The prince had supposed that he and the parrot,
being both birds of learning, could delight in
each other's society, but never had he been more
mistaken. They were eternally bickering. The
one was a wit, the other a philosopher. The
parrot
quoted poetry, was critical on new readings,
and eloquent on small points of erudition; the
owl treated all such knowledge as trifling, and
relished nothing but metaphysics. Then the
parrot would sing songs and repeat bon mots, and
crack jokes upon his solemn neighbour, and laugh
outrageously at his own wit; all which the owl
considered a grievous invasion of his dignity, and
would scowl, and sulk, and swell, and sit silent
for a whole day together.
The prince heeded not the wranglings of his
companions, being wrapped up in the dreams of
his own fancy, and the contemplation of the
portrait
of the beautiful princess. In this way they
journeyed through the stern passes of the Sierra
Morena, across the sunburnt plains of La Mancha
and Castile, and along the banks of the Golden
Tagus, which winds its wizard mazes over one
half of Spain and Portugal. At length, they
came in sight of a strong city with walls and
towers, built on a rocky promontory, round the
foot of which the Tagus circled with brawling
violence.
Behold, exclaimed the owl, the ancient
and renowned city of Toledo; a city famous for
its antiquities. Behold those venerable domes
and towers, hoary with time, and clothed with
legendary grandeur; in which so many of my
ancestors have meditated
Pish, cried the parrot, interrupting his
solemn
antiquarian rapture, what have we to do
with antiquities, and legends, and your ancestors?
Behold, what is more to the purpose, behold the
abode of youth and beauty,behold, at length, oh
prince, the abode of your long sought princess.
The prince looked in the direction indicated
by the parrot, and beheld, in a delightful green
meadow on the banks of the Tagus, a stately
palace
rising from amidst the bowers of a delicious
garden. It was just such a place as had been
described by the dove as the residence of the
original
of the picture. He gazed at it with a
throbbing heart: Perhaps at this moment,
thought he, the beautiful princess is sporting
beneath
those shady bowers, or pacing with delicate
step those stately terraces, or reposing beneath
those lofty roofs! As he looked more
narrowly
,
he perceived that the walls of the garden were
of great height, so as to defy access, while
numbers
of armed guards patrolled around them.
The prince turned to the parrot. Oh most
accomplished of birds, said he, thou hast the
gift of human speech. Hie thee to yon garden;
seek the idol of my soul, and tell her that prince
Ahmed, a pilgrim of love, and guided by the
stars, has arrived in quest of her on the flowery
banks of the Tagus.
The parrot, proud of his embassy, flew away
to the garden, mounted above its lofty walls, and,
after soaring for a time over the lawns and groves,
alighted on the balcony of a pavilion that
over-hung
the river. Here, looking in at the casement,
he beheld the princess reclining on a couch, with
her eyes fixed on a paper, while tears gently stole
after each other down her pallid cheek.
Pluming his wings for a moment, adjusting his
bright green coat, and elevating his topknot, the
parrot perched himself beside her with a gallant
air; then assuming a tenderness of tone,
VOL. II. 9
Dry thy tears, most beautiful of princesses,
said he, I come to bring solace to thy heart.
The princess was startled on hearing a voice,
but turning and seeing nothing but a little
green-coated
bird bobbing and bowing before her:
Alas! what solace canst thou yield, said she,
seeing thou art but a parrot!
The parrot was nettled at the question. I have
consoled many beautiful ladies in my time, said
he; but let that pass. At present, I come
ambassador
from a royal prince. Know that Ahmed,
the prince of Granada, has arrived in quest of
thee, and is encamped even now on the flowery
banks of the Tagus.
The eyes of the beautiful princess sparkled at
these words, even brighter than the diamonds in
her coronet. O sweetest of parrots, cried she,
joyful indeed are thy tidings; for I was faint,
and weary, and sick almost unto death, with
doubt of the constancy of Ahmed. Hie thee
back, and tell him that the words of his letter are
engraven in my heart, and his poetry has been
the food of my soul. Tell him, however, that
he must prepare to prove his love by force of
arms; to-morrow is my seventeenth birth-day,
when the king, my father, holds a great
tournament
;
several princes are to enter the lists, and
my hand is to be the prize of the victor.
The parrot again took wing, and, rustling
through the groves, flew back to where the
prince awaited his return. The rapture of
Ahmed on finding the original of his adored
portrait, and finding her kind and true, can only
be conceived by those favoured mortals, who
have had the good fortune to realize day dreams,
and turn shadows into substance. Still there
was one thing that alloyed his transport,this
impending tournament. In fact, the banks of the
Tagus were already glittering with arms, and
resounding
with trumpets of the various knights,
who with proud retinues were prancing on
towards Toledo, to attend the ceremonial. The
same star that had controlled the destiny of the
prince, had governed that of the princess, and
until
her seventeenth birth-day, she had been shut
up from the world, to guard her from the tender
passion. The fame of her charms, however, had
been enhanced, rather than obscured by this
seclusion
.
Several powerful princes had contended
for her alliance, and her father, who was a king
of wondrous shrewdness, to avoid making
enemies
by showing partiality, had referred them to
the arbitrament of arms. Among the rival
candidates
,
were several renowned for strength and
prowess. What a predicament for the unfortunate
Ahmed, unprovided as he was with weapons,
and unskilled in the exercises of chivalry.
Luckless prince that I am! said he, to have
been brought up in seclusion, under the eye of a
philosopher! of what avail are algebra and
philosophy
in affairs of love! alas, Ebon Bonabbon,
why hast thou neglected to instruct me in the
management of arms? Upon this the owl broke
silence, prefacing his harangue with a pious
ejaculation, for he was a devout Mussulman:
Allah Achbar! `God is great,' exclaimed
he; in his hands are all secret things, he alone
governs the destiny of princes! Know, O prince,
that this land is full of mysteries, hidden from all
but those who, like myself, can grope after
knowledge
in the dark. Know that in the
neighbouring
mountains there is a cave, and in that cave
there is an iron table, and on that table lies a suit
of magic armour, and beside that table stands a
spell-bound steed, which have been shut up there
for many generations.
The prince stared with wonder, while the owl
blinking his huge round eyes and erecting his
horns proceeded:
Many years since, I accompanied my father
to these parts on a tour of his estates, and we
sojourned
in that cave, and thus became I
acquainted
with the mystery. It is a tradition in our
family, which I have heard from my grandfather
when I was yet but a very little owlet, that this
armour belonged to a Moorish magician, who
took refuge in this cavern when Toledo was
captured
by the Christians, and died here, leaving
his steed and weapons under a mystic spell, never
to be used but by a Moslem, and by him only
from sunrise to mid-day. In that interval,
whoever
uses them, will overthrow every opponent.
Enough, let us seek this cave, exclaimed
Ahmed.
Guided by his legendary Mentor, the prince
found the cavern, which was in one of the
wildest
recesses of those rocky cliffs which rose
around Toledo: none but the mousing eye of an
owl or an antiquary could have discovered the
entrance to it. A sepulchral lamp of everlasting
oil, shed a solemn light through the place. On an
iron table in the centre of the cavern lay the
magic
armour, against it leaned the lance, and
beside
it stood an Arabian steed, caparisoned for the
field, but motionless as a statue. The armour was
bright and unsullied, as it had gleamed in days of
9 *
old; the steed in as good condition as if just from
the pasture, and when Ahmed laid his hand upon
his neck, he pawed the ground and gave a loud
neigh of joy that shook the walls of the cavern.
Thus provided with horse to ride and weapon to
wear, the prince determined to defy the field at
the impending tourney.
The eventful morning arrived. The lists for
the combat were prepared in the Vega or plain
just below the cliff-built walls of Toledo.
Here were erected stages and galleries for
the spectators, covered with rich tapestry and
sheltered from the sun by silken awnings. All
the beauties of the land were assembled in those
galleries, while below pranced plumed knights
with their pages and esquires, among whom
figured
conspicuously the princes who were to
contend
in the tournev. All the beauties of the land,
however, were eclipsed, when the princess
Aldegonda
appeared in the royal pavilion, and for the
first time broke forth upon the gaze of an
admiring
world. A murmur of wonder ran through
the crowd at her transcendant loveliness: and the
princes who were candidates for her hand merely
on the faith of her reported charms, now felt
ten-fold
ardour for the conflict.
The princess, however, had a troubled look.
The colour came and went from her cheek, and
her eye wandered with a restless and unsatisfied
expression over the plumed throng of knights.
The trumpets were about sounding for the
encounter
when a herald announced the arrival of a
stranger knight, and Ahmed rode into the field.
A steeled helmet studded with gems rose above
his turban; his cuirass was embossed with gold;
his scimetar and dagger were of the
workmanship
of Fay, and flamed with precious stones. A
round shield was at his shoulder, and in his hand
he bore the lance of charmed virtue. The
caparison
of his Arabian was richly embroidered, and
swept the ground; and the proud animal pranced
and snuffed the air, and neighed with joy at once
more beholding the array of arms. The lofty and
graceful demeanor of the prince struck every eye,
and when his appellation was announced, The
pilgrim of love, a universal flutter and agitation
prevailed among the fair dames in the galleries.
When Ahmed presented himself at the lists,
however, they were closed against him; none but
princes, he was told, were admitted to the
contest
.
He declared his name and rank. Still worse,
he was a Moslem, and could not engage in a
tourney
where the hand of a Christian princess was
the prize.
The rival princes surrounded him with
haughty
and menacing aspects, and one of insolent
demeanor
and Herculean frame sneered at his light
and youthful form, and scoffed at his amorous
appellation
.
The ire of the prince was roused; he
defied his rival to the encounter. They took
distance
,
wheeled, and charged; at the first touch
of the magic lance the brawny scoffer was tilted
from his saddle. Here the prince would have
paused, but alas! he had to deal with a demoniac
horse and armour: once in action, nothing could
control them. The Arabian steed charged into
the thickest of the throng: the lance overturned
every thing that presented; the gentle prince
was carried pell-mell about the field, strewing it
with high and low, gentle and simple, and
grieving
at his own involuntary exploits. The king
stormed and raged at this outrage on his subjects
and his guests. He ordered out all his guards
they were unhorsed as fast as they came up. The
king threw off his robes, grasped buckler and
lance, and rode forth to awe the stranger with the
presence of majesty itself. Alas, majesty fared no
better than the vulgar; the steed and lance were
no respecters of persons; to the dismay of
Ahmed
,
he was borne full tilt against the king, and
in a moment the royal heels were in the air, and
the crown was rolling in the dust.
At this moment the sun reached the meridian;
the magic spell resumed its power. The
Arabian
steed scoured across the plain, leaped the
barrier, plunged into the Tagus, swam its raging
current, bore the prince, breathless and amazed,
to the cavern, and resumed his station like a
statue beside the iron table. The prince
dismounted
right gladly, and replaced the armour,
to abide the further decrees of fate. Then seating
himself in the cavern, he ruminated on the
desperate
state to which this bedeviled steed and
armour had reduced him. Never should he dare
to show his face at Toledo, after inflicting such
disgrace upon its chivalry, and such an outrage
on its king. What too would the princess think
of so rude and riotous an achievement. Full of
anxiety, he sent forth his winged messengers to
gather tidings. The parrot resorted to all the
public places and crowded resorts of the city,
and soon returned with a world of gossip. All
Toledo was in consternation. The princess had
been borne off senesless to the palace; the
tournament
had ended in confusion; every one was
talking of the sudden apparition, prodigious
exploits
and strange disappearance of the Moslem
knight. Some pronounced him a Moorish
magician
;
others thought him a demon who had
assumed
a human shape; while others related
traditions
of enchanted warriors hidden in the caves
of the mountains, and thought it might be one of
these, who had made a sudden irruption from his
den. All agreed that no mere ordinary mortal
could have wrought such wonders, or unhorsed
such accomplished and stalwart Christian
warriors
.
The owl flew forth at night, and hovered about
the dusky city, perching on the roofs and
chimneys
.
He then wheeled his flight up to the royal
palace, which stood on the rocky summit of
Toledo
,
and went prowling about its terraces and
battlements
,
eaves-dropping at every cranny, and
glaring in with his big goggling eyes at every
window where there was a light, so as to throw
two or three maids of honour into fits. It was
not until the grey dawn began to peer above the
mountains that he returned from his mousing
expedition
,
and related to the prince what he had
seen.
As I was prying about one of the loftiest
towers of the palace, said he, I beheld through
a casement a beautiful princess. She was
reclining
on a couch, with attendants and physicians
around her, but she would none of their ministry
and relief. When they retired, I beheld her
draw forth a letter from her bosom, and read,
and kiss it, and give way to loud lamentations;
at which, philosopher as I am, I could not but be
greatly moved.
The tender heart of Ahmed was distressed at
these tidings. Too true were thy words, oh
sage Ebon Bonabbon! cried he. Care and
sorrow, and sleepless nights are the lot of lovers.
Allah preserve the princess from the blighting
influence
of this thing called love.
Further intelligence from Toledo corroborated
the report of the owl. The city was a prey to
uneasiness and alarm. The princess was
conveyed
to the highest tower of the palace, every
avenue
to which was strongly guarded. In the mean
time, a devouring melancholy had seized upon
her, of which no one could divine the cause. She
refused food, and turned a deaf ear to every
consolation
.
The most skilful physicians had
essayed
their art in vain; it was thought some magic
spell had been practised upon her, and the king
made proclamation, declaring that whoever should
effect her cure, should receive the richest jewel
in the royal treasury.
When the owl, who was dozing in a
corner
,
heard of this proclamation, he rolled his
large eyes and looked more mysterious than
ever.
Allah Achbar! exclaimed he.
Happy
the man that shall effect that cure, should
he but know what to choose from the royal
treasury
.
What mean you, most reverend owl? said
Ahmed.
Hearken, O prince, to what I shall relate.
We owls, you must know, are a learned body,
and much given to dark and dusty research.
During my late prowling at night about the
domes and turrets of Toledo, I discovered a
college
of antiquarian owls, who hold their meetings
in a great vaulted tower where the royal treasury
is deposited. Here they were discussing the
forms and inscriptions, and designs of ancient
gems and jewels, and of golden and silver vessels,
heaped up in the treasury, the fashion of every
country and age: but mostly they were
interested
about certain reliques and talismans, that have
remained in the treasury since the time of
Roderick
the Goth. Among these, was a box of
shittim wood, secured by bands of steel of
oriental
workmanship, and inscribed with mystic
characters known only to the learned few. This
box and its inscription had occupied the college
for several sessions, and had caused much long
and grave dispute. At the time of my visit, a
very ancient owl, who had recently arrived from
Egypt, was seated on the lid of the box
lecturing
upon the inscription, and proved from it, that
the coffer contained the silken carpet of the
throne of Solomon the wise: which doubtless
had been brought to Toledo by the Jews, who
took refuge there after the downfall of
Jerusalem
.
When the owl had concluded his antiquarian
harangue, the prince remained for a time absorbed
in thought. I have heard, said he, from the
sage Ebon Bonabbon, of the wonderful
properties
of that talisman, which disappeared at the
fall of Jerusalem, and was supposed to be lost to
mankind. Doubtless it remains a sealed
mystery
VOL. II. 10
to the Christians of Toledo. If I can get
possession of that carpet, my fortune is
secure
.
The next day the prince laid aside his rich
attire
,
and arrayed himself in the simple garb of
an Arab of the desert. He dyed his complexion
to a tawny hue, and no one could have
recognized
in him the splendid warrior who had caused
such admiration and dismay at the tournament.
With staff in hand and scrip by his side, and a
small pastoral reed, he repaired to Toledo, and
presenting himself at the gate of the royal palace,
announced himself as a candidate for the reward
offered for the cure of the princess. The guards
would have driven him away with blows: What
can a vagrant Arab like thyself pretend to do,
said they, in a case where the most learned of
the land have failed? The king, however,
over-heard
the tumult, and ordered the Arab to be
brought into his presence.
Most potent king, said Ahmed, you
behold
before you a Bedouin Arab, the greater part
of whose life has been passed in the solitudes of
the desert. Those solitudes, it is well known,
are the haunts of demons and evil spirits, who
beset
us poor shepherds in our lonely watchings,
enter into and possess our flocks and herds, and
sometimes render even the patient camel furious.
Against these, our countercharm is music; and
we have legendary airs handed down from
generation
to generation, that we chant and pipe to
cast forth these evil spirits. I am of a gifted line,
and possess this power in its fullest force. If it
be any evil influence of the kind that holds a
spell over thy daughter, I pledge my head to free
her from its sway.
The king, who was a man of understanding,
and knew the wonderful secrets possessed by the
Arabs, was inspired with hope by the confident
language of the prince. He conducted him
immediately
to the lofty tower secured by several
doors, in the summit of which was the chamber
of the princess. The windows opened upon a
terrace with balustrades, commanding a view
over Toledo and all the surrounding country.
The windows were darkened, for the princess
lay within, a prey to a devouring grief that
refused
all alleviation.
The prince seated himself on the terrace, and
performed several wild Arabian airs on his
pastoral
pipe, which he had learnt from his
attendants
in the Generalife at Grenada. The princess
continued insensible, and the doctors, who were
present, shook their heads, and smiled with
incredibility
and contempt. At length the prince
laid aside the reed, and, to a simple melody,
chanted the amatory verses of the letter which
had declared his passion.
The princess recognized the strain. A
fluttering
joy stole to her heart; she raised her head
and listened; tears rushed to her eyes and
streamed
down her cheeks; her bosom rose and fell
with a tumult of emotions. She would have
asked
for the minstrel to be brought into her
presence
,
but maiden coyness held her silent. The
king read her wishes, and at his command
Ahmed
was conducted into the chamber. The
lovers
were discreet: they but exchanged glances,
yet those glances spoke volumes. Never was
triumph of music more complete. The rose had
returned to the soft cheek of the princess, the
freshness to her lip, and the dewy light to her
languishing eye.
All the physicians present stared at each other
with astonishment. The king regarded the Arab
minstrel with admiration, mixt with awe.
Wonderful
youth, exclaimed he, thou shalt
henceforth
be the first physician of my court, and no
other prescription will I take but thy melody.
For the present, receive thy reward, the most
precious jewel in my treasury.
O king, replied Ahmed, I care not for
silver
,
or gold, or precious stones. One relique
hast thou in thy treasury, handed down from the
Moslems who once owned Toledo. A box of
sandal wood containing a silken carpet. Give me
that box, and I am content.
All present were surprised at the moderation
of the Arab; and still more, when the box of
sandal
wood was brought and the carpet drawn forth.
It was of fine green silk, covered with Hebrew
and Chaldaic characters. The court physicians
looked at each other, shrugged their shoulders,
and smiled at the simplicity of this new
practitioner
,
who could be content with so paltry a
fee.
This carpet, said the prince, once covered
the throne of Solomon the wise; it is worthy of
being placed beneath the feet of beauty.
So saying, he spread it on the terrace
beneath
an ottoman that had been brought forth
for the princess; then seating himself at her
feet,
Who, said he, shall counteract what is
10 *
written in the book of fate? Behold the
prediction
of the astrologers verified. Know, oh king,
that your daughter and I have long loved each
other in secret. Behold in me the pilgrim of
love.
These words were scarcely from his lips, when
the carpet rose in the air, bearing off the prince
and princess. The king and the physicians
gazed after it with open mouths and straining
eyes, until it became a little speck on the white
bosom of a cloud, and then disappeared in the
blue vault of heaven.
The king in a rage summoned his
treasurer
.
How is this, said he, that thou hast
suffered an infidel to get possession of such a
talisman
?
Alas! sire, we knew not its nature, nor could
we decipher the inscription of the box. If it be
indeed the carpet of the throne of the wise
Solomon
,
it is possessed of magic power, and can
transport its owner from place to place through
the air.
The king assembled a mighty army, and set
off for Granada in pursuit of the fugitives. His
march was long and toilsome. Encamping
in the Vega, he sent a herald to demand
restitution
of his daughter. The king himself
came forth with all his court to meet him. In
the king, he beheld the Arab minstrel, for
Ahmed
had succeeded to the throne on the death
of his father, and the beautiful Aldegonda was his
Sultana.
The Christian king was easily pacified, when
he found that his daughter was suffered to
continue
in her faith: not that he was particularly
pious; but religion is always a point of pride
and etiquette with princes. Instead of bloody
battles, there was a succession of feasts and
rejoicings; after which, the king returned well
pleased to Toledo, and the youthful couple
continued
to reign as happily as wisely, in the
Alhambra
.
It is proper to add, that the owl and the
parrot
had severally followed the prince by easy
stages to Granada: the former travelling by
night, and stopping at the various hereditary
possessions of his family; the latter figuring in
the gay circles of every town and city on his
route.
Ahmed gratefully requited the services which
they had rendered him on his pilgrimage. He
appointed the owl his prime minister; the
parrot
his master of ceremonies. It is needless
to say, that never was a realm more sagely
administered
,
or a court conducted with more exact
punctilio.
THE LEGEND
OF
THE ROSE OF THE ALHAMBRA,
OR THE PAGE AND THE GER-FALCON.
For
some time after the surrender of Granada
by the Moors, that delightful city was a frequent
and favourite residence of the Spanish sovereigns,
until they were frightened away by successive
shocks of earthquakes, which toppled down
various
houses and made the old Moslem towers
rock to their foundation.
Many, many years then rolled away, during
which, Granada was rarely honoured by a royal
guest. The palaces of the nobility remained
silent
and shut up; and the Alhambra, like a
slighted
beauty, sat in mournful desolation among her
neglected gardens. The tower of the Infantas,
once the residence of the three beautiful Moorish
princesses, partook of the general desolation; and
the spider spun her web athwart the gilded vault,
and bats and owls nestled in those chambers that
had been graced by the presence of Zayda,
Zorayda
,
and Zorahayda. The neglect of the tower
may partly have been owing to some superstitious
notions of the neighbours. It was rumoured that
the spirit of the youthful Zorahayda, who had
perished in that tower, was often seen by
moonlight
seated beside the fountain in the hall, or
moaning about the battlements, and that the notes
of her silver lute would be heard at midnight by
wayfarers passing along the glen.
At length, the city of Granada was once more
enlivened by the royal presence. All the world
knows that Philip V. was the first Bourbon that
swayed the Spanish sceptre. All the world
knows that he married, in second nuptials,
Elizabetta
or Isabella, (for they are the same,) the
beautiful princess of Parma: and all the world
knows, that by this chain of contingencies, a
French prince and an Italian princess were seated
together on the Spanish throne. For the reception
of this illustrious pair, the Alhambra was
repaired
and fitted up with all possible expedition. The
arrival of the court changed the whole aspect of
the lately deserted place. The clangour of drum
and trumpet, the tramp of steed about the
avenues
and outer court, the glitter of arms and
display
of banners about barbican and battlement,
recalled the ancient and warlike glories of the
fortress. A softer spirit, however, reigned
within
the royal palace. There was the rustling of
robes, and the cautious tread and murmuring
voice of reverential courtiers about the
antichambers
;
a loitering of pages and maids of honour
about the gardens, and the sound of music
stealing
from open casements.
Among those who attended in the train of the
monarchs, was a favourite page of the queen,
named Ruyz de Alarcon. To say that he was a
favourite page of the queen, was at once to speak
his eulogium, for every one in the suite of the
stately Elizabetta, was chosen for grace, and
beauty, and accomplishments. He was just
turned of eighteen, light and little of form, and
graceful as a young Antinous. To the queen, he
he was all deference and respect, yet he was at
heart a roguish stripling, petted and spoiled by
the ladies about the court, and experienced in the
ways of women far beyond his years.
This loitering page was one morning rambling
about the groves of the Generalife, which
over-look
the grounds of the Alhambra. He had
taken
with him for his amusement, a favourite
ger-falcon
of the queen. In the course of his
rambles
,
seeing a bird rising from a thicket, he
unhooded
the hawk and let him fly. The falcon
towered high in the air, made a swoop at his
quarry, but missing it, soared away regardless of
the calls of the page. The latter followed the
truant bird with his eye in its capricious flight,
until he saw it alight upon the battlements of a
remote and lonely tower, in the outer wall of the
Alhambra, built on the edge of a ravine that
separated
the royal fortress from the grounds of the
Generalife. It was, in fact, the tower of the
Princesses.
The page descended into the ravine, and
approached
the tower, but it had no entrance from
the glen, and its lofty height rendered any
attempt
to scale it fruitless. Seeking one of the
gates of the fortress, therefore, he made a wide
circuit to that side of the tower facing within the
VOL. II. 11
walls. A small garden enclosed by a trellis work
of reeds overhung with myrtle lay before the
tower. Opening a wicket, the page passed
between
beds of flowers and thickets of roses to the
door. It was closed and bolted. A crevice in
the door gave him a peep into the interior.
There was a small Moorish hall, with fretted
walls, light marble columns, and an alabaster
fountain
surrounded with flowers. In the centre
hung a gilt cage containing a singing bird,
beneath
it, on a chair, lay a tortoise-shell cat among
reels of silk and other articles of female labour,
and a guitar, decorated with ribands, leaned
against the fountain.
Ruyz de Alarcon was struck with these traces
of female taste and elegance in a lonely, and, as he
had supposed, deserted tower. They reminded
him of the tales of enchanted halls, current in the
Alhambra; and the tortoise-shell cat might be
some spell-bound princess.
He knocked gently at the door,a beautiful
face peeped out from a little window above, but
was instantly withdrawn. He waited, expecting
that the door would be opened; but he waited in
vain: no footstep was to be heard within, all was
silent. Had his senses deceived him, or was this
beautiful apparition the fairy of the tower? He
knocked again, and more loudly. After a little
while, the beaming face once more peeped forth:
it was that of a blooming damsel of fifteen.
The page immediately doffed his plumed
bonnet
,
and entreated in the most courteous accents
to be permitted to ascend the tower in pursuit of
his falcon.
I dare not open the door, Seor, replied the
little damsel, blushing; my aunt has forbidden
it.
I do beseech you, fair maid; it is the
favourite
falcon of the queen; I dare not return to the
palace without it.
Are you, then, one of the cavaliers of the
court?
I am, fair maid; but I shall lose the queen's
favour and my place if I lose this hawk.
Santa Maria! It is against you cavaliers of
the court that my aunt has charged me especially
to bar the door.
Against wicked cavaliers, doubtless; but I
am none of those, but a simple, harmless page,
who will be ruined and undone if you deny me
this small request.
The heart of the little damsel was touched by
the distress of the page. It was a thousand pities
he should be ruined for the want of so trifling a
boon. Surely, too, he could not be one of those
dangerous beings whom her aunt had described
as a species of cannibal, ever on the prowl to
make prey of thoughtless damsels; he was gentle
and modest, and stood so entreatingly with cap
in hand, and looked so charming. The sly page
saw that the garrison began to waver, and redoubled his entreaties in such moving terms, that it
was not in the nature of mortal maiden to deny
him: so, the blushing little warder of the tower
descended and opened the door with a trembling
hand; and if the page had been charmed by a
mere glimpse of her countenance from the
window
,
he was ravished by the full length portrait
now revealed to him.
Her Andalusian boddice and trim basquina set
off the round but delicate symmetry of her form,
which was as yet scarce verging into
womanhood
.
Her glossy hair was parted on her
forehead
with scrupulous exactness, and decorated
with a fresh plucked rose, according to the
universal
custom of the country.
It is true, her complexion was tinged by the
ardour of a southern sun, but it served to give
richness to the mantling bloom of her cheek, and
to heighten the lustre of her melting eyes.
Ruyz de Alarcon beheld all this with a single
glance, for it became him not to tarry; he
merely
murmured his acknowledgments, and then
bounded lightly up the spiral staircase in quest of
his falcon. He soon returned with the truant
bird upon his fist. The damsel, in the mean
time, had seated herself by the fountain in the
hall, and was winding silk; but in her agitation
she let fall the reel upon the pavement. The
page sprang, picked it up, then dropping
gracefully
on one knee presented it to her, but,
seizing
the hand extended to receive it, imprinted
on it a kiss more fervent and devout than he had
ever imprinted on the fair hand of his
sovereign
.
Ave Maria! Seor! exclaimed the damsel,
blushing still deeper with confusion and surprise,
for never before had she received such a
salutation
.
The modest page made a thousand apologies,
assuring her it was the way, at court, of
expressing
the most profound homage and respect.
Her anger, if anger she felt, was easily
pacified
;
but her agitation and embarrassment
continued
,
11 *
and she sat blushing deeper and deeper,
with her eyes cast down upon her work,
entangling
the silk which she attempted to wind.
The cunning page saw the confusion in the
opposite
camp, and would fain have profited by it,
but the fine speeches he would have uttered died
upon his lips; his attempts at gallantry were
awkward
and ineffectual; and, to his surprise, the
adroit page who had figured with such grace
and effrontery among the most knowing and
experienced ladies of the court, found himself
awed and abashed in the presence of a simple
damsel of fifteen.
In fact, the artless maiden in her own modesty
and innocence, had guardians more effectual than
the bolts and bars prescribed by her vigilant aunt.
Still, where is the female bosom proof against the
first whisperings of love? The little damsel, with
all her artlessness, instinctively comprehended all
that the faltering tongue of the page failed to
express
,
and her heart was fluttered at beholding,
for the first time, a lover at her feet,and such a
lover!
The diffidence of the page, though genuine,
was short-lived, and he was recovering his usual
case and confidence, when a shrill voice was
heard at a distance.
My aunt is returning from mass! cried the
damsel in affright. I pray you, Seor, depart.
Not until you grant me that rose from your
hair, as a remembrance.
She hastily untwisted the rose from her raven
locks. Take it, cried she, agitated and
blushing
,
but pray begone.
The page took the rose, and at the same time
covered with kisses the fair hand that gave it.
Then placing the flower in his bonnet, and taking
the falcon upon his fist, he bounded off through
the garden, bearing away with him the heart of
the gentle Jacinta.
When the vigilant aunt arrived at the tower,
she remarked the agitation of her niece, and an
air of confusion in the hall; but a word of
explanation
sufficed. A ger-falcon had pursued his
prey into the hall.
Mercy on us! To think of a falcon flying
into
the tower. Did ever one hear of so saucy a
hawk? Why the very bird in the cage is not
safe.
The vigilant Fredegonda was one of the most
wary of ancient spinsters. She had a becoming
terror and distrust of what she denominated the
opposite sex, which had gradually increased
through a long life of celibacy. Not that the
good lady had ever suffered from their wiles;
nature
having set up a safeguard in her face, that
forbade all trespass upon her premises; but ladies
who have least cause to fear for themselves, are
most ready to keep a watch over their more
tempting neighbours. The niece was the orphan
of an officer who had fallen in the wars. She had
been educated in a convent, and had recently
been transferred from her sacred asylum to the
immediate guardianship of her aunt; under
whose overshadowing care she vegetated in
obscurity
,
like an opening rose blooming beneath a
briar. Nor, indeed, is this comparison entirely
accidental, for to tell the truth her fresh and
dawning beauty had caught the public eye, even
in her seclusion, and, with that poetical turn
common
to the people of Andalusia, the peasantry of
the neighbourhood had given her the appellation
of The Rose of the Alhambra.
The wary aunt continued to keep a faithful
watch over her tempting little niece as long as the
court continued at Granada, and flattered herself
that her vigilance had been successful. It is true,
the good lady was now and then discomposed by
the tinkling of guitars, and chanting of love
ditties
from the moonlit groves beneath the tower,
but she would exhort her niece to shut her ears
against such idle minstrelsy, assuring her that it
was one of the arts of the opposite sex, by which
simple maids were often lured to their undoing;
alas, what chance with a simple maid has a
dry lecture against a moonlight serenade!
At length king Philip cut short his sojourn
at Granada, and suddenly departed with all his
train. The vigilant Fredegonda watched the
royal pageant as it issued forth from the gate of
Justice, and descended the great avenue leading
to the city. When the last banner disappeared
from her sight, she returned exulting to her
tower, for all her cares were over. To her
surprise
,
a light Arabian steed pawed the ground at
the wicket gate of the garden,to her horror
she saw through the thickets of roses, a youth,
in gaily embroidered dress, at the feet of neice.
At the sound of her footsteps he gave a tender
adieu, bounded lightly over the barrier of reeds
and myrtles, sprang upon his horse, and was
out of sight in an instant.
The tender Jacinta in the agony of her grief
lost all thought of her aunt's displeasure.
Throwing herself into her arms, she broke forth
into sobs and tears.
Ay di mi! cried she, he is gone! he is
gone! and I shall never see him more.
Gone! who is gone! what youth is this I
saw at your feet?
A queen's page, aunt, who came to bid me
farewell.
A queen's page, child! echoed the vigilant
Fredegonda faintly, and when did you become
acquainted with a queen's page?
The morning that the ger-falcon flew into the
tower. It was the queen's ger-falcon, and he
came in pursuit of it.
Ah, silly, girl! know that there are no
ger-falcons half so dangerous as these prankling
pages, and it is precisely such simple birds as
thee that they pounce upon.
The aunt was at first indignant at learning
that, in despite of her boasted vigilance, a tender
intercourse had been carried on by the youthful
lovers, almost beneath her eye; but when she
found that her simple-hearted niece, though thus
exposed, without the protection of bolt or bar, to
all the machinations of the opposite sex, had come
forth unsinged from the fiery ordeal, she
consoled
herself with the persuasion that it was
owing to the chaste and cautious maxims in which
she had, as it were, steeped her to the very
lips.
While the aunt laid this soothing unction to
her pride, the niece treasured up the oft repeated
vows of fidelity of the page. But what is the
love of restless roving man? a vagrant stream
that dallies for a time with each flower upon its
banks, then passes on and leaves them all in tears.
Days, weeks, months elapsed, and nothing
more was heard of the page. The pomegranate
ripened, the vine yielded up its fruit, the
autumnal
rains descended in torrents from the
mountains
;
the Sierra Nevada became covered with
a snowy mantle, and wintry blasts howled through
the halls of the Alhambra: still he came not.
The winter passed away. Again the genial
spring burst forth with song, and blossoms, and
balmy zephyr; the snows melted from the
mountains, until none remained, but on the lofty
summit of the Nevada, glistening through the
sultry summer air: still nothing was heard of the
forgetful page.
In the meantime, the poor little Jacinta grew
pale and thoughtful. Her former occupations
and amusements were abandoned; her silk lay
entangled
,
her guitar unstrung, her flowers were
neglected, the notes of her bird unheeded, and
her eyes, once so bright, were dimmed with
secret
weeping. If any solitude could be devised
to foster the passion of a lovelorn damsel, it
would be such a place as the Alhambra, where
every thing seems disposed to produce tender
and romantic reveries. It is a very Paradise for
lovers; how hard then to be alone in such a
Paradise
;
and not merely alone, but forsaken!
Alas, silly child, would the staid and
immaculate
Fredegonda say, when she found her niece
in one of her desponding moods, did I not
warn thee against the wiles and deceptions of
these men? What couldst thou expect, too, from
one of a haughty and aspiring family, thou, an
orphan, the descendant of a fallen and
impoverished
line; be assured, if the youth were true, his
father, who is one of the proudest nobles about the
court, would prohibit his union with one so
humble
and portionless as thou. Pluck up thy
resolution
,
therefore, and drive these idle notions
from thy mind.
The words of the immaculate Fredegonda
only served to increase the melancholy of her
niece, but she sought to indulge it in private.
At a late hour one midsummer night, after her
aunt had retired to rest, she remained alone in
the hall of the tower, seated beside the alabaster
fountain. It was here that the faithless page had
first knelt and kissed her hand, it was here that
he had often vowed eternal fidelity. The poor
little damsel's heart was overladen with sad and
tender recollections, her tears began to flow,
and slowly fell, drop by drop, into the fountain.
By degrees the crystal water became agitated,
and, bubblebubblebubble, boiled up and was
tossed about until a female figure, richly clad in
Moorish robes, slowly rose to view.
Jacinta was so frightened, that she fled from the
hall, and did not venture to return. The next
morning, she related what she had seen to her
aunt, but the good lady treated it as a fantasy
of her troubled mind, or supposed she had fallen
asleep and dreamt beside the fountain. Thou
hast been thinking of the story of the three
Moorish princesses that once inhabited the
tower, continued she, and it has entered into
thy dreams.
VOL. II. 12
What story, aunt? I know nothing of it.
Thou hast certainly heard of the three
princesses
,
Zaida, Zorayda, and Zorahayda, who were
confined in this tower by the king their father,
and agreed to fly with three Christian cavaliers.
The two first accomplished their escape, but the
third failed in resolution and remained, and it is
said died in this tower.
I now recollect to have heard of it, said
Jacinta, and to have wept over the fate of the
gentle Zorahayda.
Thou mayst well weep over her fate,
continued
the aunt, for the lover of Zorahayda
was thy ancestor. He long bemoaned his
Moorish
love, but time cured him of his grief, and he
married a Spanish lady, from whom thou art
descended
.
Jacinta ruminated upon these words. That
what I have seen is no fantasy of the brain, said
she to herself, I am confident. If indeed it
be the sprite of the gentle Zorahayda, which I
have heard lingers about this tower, of what
should I be afraid? I'll watch by the fountain
to-night, perhaps the visit will be repeated.
Towards midnight, when every thing was
quiet, she again took her seat in the hall. As the
bell on the distant watch-tower of the Alhambra
struck the midnight hour, the fountain was again
agitated, and bubblebubblebubble, it tossed
about the waters until the Moorish female again
rose to view. She was young and beautiful; her
dress was rich with jewels, and in her hand she
held a silver lute. Jacinta trembled and was
faint, but was reassured by the soft and plaintive
voice of the apparition, and the sweet expression
of her pale melancholy countenance.
Daughter of Mortality, said she, what
aileth thee? Why do thy tears trouble my
fountain
,
and thy sighs and plaints disturb the quiet
watches of the night?
I weep because of the faithlessness of man:
and I bemoan my solitary and forsaken state.
Take comfort, thy sorrows may yet have an
end. Thou beholdest a Moorish princess, who,
like thee, was unhappy in her love. A Christian
knight, thy ancestor, won my heart, and would
have borne me to his native land, and to the
bosom
of his church. I was a convert in my heart,
but I lacked courage equal to my faith, and
lingered
till too late. For this, the evil genii are
permitted to have power over me, and I remain
enchanted in this tower, until some pure
Christian
will deign to break the magic spell. Wilt
thou undertake the task?
I will! replied the damsel, trembling.
Come hither, then, and fear not: dip thy
hand in the fountain, sprinkle the water over me,
and baptize me after the manner of thy faith; so
shall the enchantment be dispelled, and my
troubled
spirit have repose.
The damsel advanced with faltering steps,
dipped her hand in the fountain, collected water
in the palm, and sprinkled it over the pale face
of the phantom.
The latter smiled with ineffable benignity.
She dropped her silver lute at the feet of Jacinta,
crossed her white arms upon her bosom, and
melted
from sight, so that it seemed merely as if
a shower of dewdrops had fallen into the
fountain
.
Jacinta retired from the hall, filled with awe
and wonder. She scarcely closed her eyes that
night, but when she awoke at daybreak out of a
troubled slumber, the whole appeared to her like
a distempered dream. On descending into the
hall, however, the truth of the vision was
established
;
for, beside the fountain she beheld the
silver
lute glittering in the morning sunshine.
She hastened to her aunt, related all that had
befallen her, and called her to behold the lute as
a te timonial of the reality of her story. If the
good lady had any lingering doubts, they were
removed when Jacinta touched the instrument,
for she drew forth such ravishing tones as to thaw
even the frigid bosom of the immaculate
Fredegonda
,
that region of eternal winter, into a genial
flow. Nothing but supernatural melody could
have produced such an effect.
The extraordinary power of the lute became
every day more and more apparent. The
wayfarer
passing by the tower was detained, and, as it
were, spell-bound, in breathless ecstasy. The
very birds gathered in the neighbouring trees,
and, hushing their own strains, listened in
charmed
silence. Rumour soon spread the news
abroad. The inhabitants of Granada thronged to
the Alhambra, to catch a few notes of the
transcendant
music that floated about the tower of
Las Infantas.
The lovely little minstrel was at length drawn
forth from her retreat. The rich and powerful
of the land contended who should entertain and
do honour to her; or rather, who should secure
the charms of her lute, to draw fashionable throngs
to their saloons. Wherever she went, her
vigilant
12 *
aunt kept a dragon-watch at her elbow,
awing
the throngs of impassioned admirers who
hung in raptures on her strains. The report of
her wonderful powers spread from city to city:
Malaga, Seville, Cordova, all became successively
mad on the theme; nothing was talked of
throughout
Andalusia, but the beautiful minstrel of the
Alhambra. How could it be otherwise among a
people so musical and gallant as the Andalusians,
when the lute was magical in its powers, and the
minstrel inspired by love.
While all Andalusia was thus music-mad, a
different
mood prevailed at the court of Spain.
Philip V. as is well known, was a miserable
hypochondriac
,
and subject to all kinds of fancies.
Sometimes he would keep to his bed for weeks
together, groaning under imaginary complaints.
At other times he would insist upon abdicating
his throne, to the great annoyance of his royal
spouse, who had a strong relish for the splendours
of a court and the glories of a crown, and guided
the sceptre of her imbecile lord with an expert
and steady hand.
Nothing was found to be so efficacious in
dispelling
the royal megrims as the powers of
music
;
the queen took care, therefore, to have the
best performers, both vocal and instrumental, at
hand, and retained the famous Italian singer
Farinelli
about the court as a kind of royal physician.
At the moment we treat of, however, a freak
had come over the mind of this sapient and
illustrious
Bourbon, that surpassed all former
vagaries
.
After a long spell of imaginary illness,
which set all the strains of Farinelli, and the
consultations
of a whole orchestra of court fiddlers at
defiance, the monarch fairly, in idea, gave up the
ghost, and considered himself absolutely dead.
This would have been harmless enough, and
even convenient both to his queen and courtiers,
had he been content to remain in the quietude
befitting a dead man; but, to their annoyance, he
insisted upon having the funeral ceremonies
performed
over him; and, to their inexpressible
perplexity
,
began to grow impatient, and to revile
bitterly at them for negligence and disrespect in
leaving him unburied. What was to be done? To
disobey the king's positive commands was
monstrous
in the eyes of the obsequious courtiers of a
punctilious court,but to obey him, and bury
him alive, would be downright regicide!
In the midst of this fearful dilemma, a rumour
reached the court of the female minstrel, who
was turning the brains of all Andalusia. The
queen despatched missives in all haste, to
summon
her to St. Ildefonso, where the court at that
time resided.
Within a few days, as the queen with her maids
of honour was walking in those stately gardens,
intended, with their avenues, and terraces, and
fountains, to eclipse the glories of Versailles, the
far-famed minstrel was conducted into her
presence
.
The imperial Elizabetta gazed with
surprize
at the youthful and unpretending
appearance
of the little being that had set the world
madding. She was in her picturesque
Andalusian
dress; her silver lute was in her hand, and
she stood with modest and downcast eyes, but
with a simplicity and freshness of beauty that still
bespoke her The Rose of the Alhambra.
As usual, she was accompanied by the ever
vigilant
Fredegonda, who gave the whole history
of her parentage and descent to the inquiring
queen. If the stately Elizabetta had been
interested
by the appearance of Jacinta, she was still
more pleased when she learnt that she was of a
meritorious, though impoverished line, and that
her father had bravely fallen in the service of the
crown. If thy powers equal their renown,
said she, and thou canst cast forth this evil
spirit that possesses thy sovereign, thy fortune
shall henceforth be my care, and honours and
wealth attend thee.
Impatient to make trial of her skill, she led the
way at once to the apartment of the moody
monarch
.
Jacinta followed with downcast eyes
through files of guards and crowds of courtiers.
They arrived at length at a great chamber hung
in black. The windows were closed, to exclude
the light of day; a number of yellow wax tapers,
in silver sconces, diffused a lugubrious light, and
dimly revealed the figures of mutes in mourning
dresses, and courtiers, who glided about with
noiseless step and woe-begone visage. On the
midst of a funeral bed or bier, his hands folded on
his breast, and the tip of his nose just visible, lay
extended this would-be-buried monarch.
The queen entered the chamber in silence, and,
pointing to a footstool in an obscure corner,
beckoned
to Jacinta to sit down and commence.
At first she touched her lute with a faltering
hand, but gathering confidence and animation as
she proceeded, drew forth such soft, aerial
harmony
,
that all present could scarce believe it mortal.
As to the monarch, who had already considered
himself in the world of spirits, he set it down for
some angelic melody, or the music of the spheres.
By degrees the theme was varied, and the voice
of the minstrel accompanied the instrument. She
poured forth one of the legendary ballads
treating
of the ancient glories of the Alhambra, and
the achievements of the Moors. Her whole soul
entered into the theme, for with the recollections
of the Alhambra was associated the story of her
love; the funereal chamber resounded with the
animating strain. It entered into the gloomy
heart of the monarch. He raised his head and
gazed around; he sat up on his couch; his eye
began to kindle; at length, leaping upon the floor,
he called for sword and buckler.
The triumph of music, or rather of the
enchanted
lute, was complete; the demon of
melancholy
was cast forth; and, as it were, a dead man
brought to life. The windows of the apartment
were thrown open; the glorious effulgence of
Spanish sunshine burst into the late lugubrious
chamber; all eyes sought the lovely enchantress,
but the lute had fallen from her hand; she had
sank upon the earth, and the next moment was
clasped to the bosom of Ruyz de Alarcon.
The nuptials of the happy couple were shortly
after celebrated with great splendour,but hold,
I hear the reader ask how did Ruyz de Alarcon
account for his long neglect? Oh,that was all
owing to the opposition of a proud pragmatical
old father,besides, young people, who really
like one another, soon come to an amicable
understanding
,
and bury all past grievances
whenever
they meet.
But how was the proud pragmatical old father
reconciled to the match?
Oh, his scruples were easily overruled by a
word or two from the queen,especially as
dignities
and rewards were showered upon the
blooming
favourite of royalty. Besides, the lute of
Jacinta, you know, possessed a magic power, and
could control the most stubborn head and hardest
heart.
And what became of the enchanted lute?
Oh, that is the most curious matter of all, and
plainly proves the truth of all the story. That
lute remained for some time in the family, but
was purloined and carried off, as was supposed,
by the great singer Farinelli, in pure jealousy.
At his death it passed into other hands in Italy,
who were ignorant of its mystic powers, and
melting down the silver, transferred the strings
to an old Cremona fiddle. The strings still retain
something of their magic virtues. A word in
the reader's ear, but let it go no further,that
fiddle is now bewitching the whole world,it is
the fiddle of Paganini!
VOL. II. 13
THE VETERAN.
Among
the curious acquaintances I have made
in my rambles about the fortress, is a brave and
battered old Colonel of Invalids, who is nestled
like a hawk in one of the Moorish towers. His
history, which he is fond of telling, is a tissue of
those adventures, mishaps, and vicissitudes that
render the life of almost every Spaniard of note
as varied and whimsical as the pages of Gil Blas.
He was in America at twelve years of age, and
reckons among the most signal and fortunate events
of his life, his having seen General Washington.
Since then he has taken a part in all the wars of
his country; he can speak experimentally of most
of the prisons and dungeons of the Peninsula, has
been lamed of one leg, crippled in his hand, and
so cut up and carbonadoed, that he is a kind of
walking monument of the troubles of Spain, on
which there is a scar for every battle and broil, as
every year was notched upon the tree of
Robinson
Crusoe. The greatest misfortune of the brave
old cavalier, however, appears to have been
his having commanded at Malaga during a time
of peril and confusion, and been made a general
by the inhabitants to protect them from the
invasion
of the French.
This has entailed upon him a number of just
claims upon government that I fear will employ
him until his dying day in writing and printing
petitions and memorials, to the great disquiet of
his mind, exhaustion of his purse, and penance of
his friends; not one of whom can visit him
without
having to listen to a mortal document of half
an hour in length, and to carry away half a dozen
pamphlets in his pocket. This, however, is the
case throughout Spain: every where you meet
with some worthy wight brooding in a corner,
and nursing up some pet grievance and cherished
wrong. Beside, a Spaniard who has a lawsuit,
or a claim upon government, may be considered
as furnished with employment for the remainder
of his life.
I visited the veteran in his quarters in the
upper
part of the Terre del Vino, or Wine Tower.
His room was small but snug, and commanded a
beautiful view of the Vega. It was arranged with
a soldier's precision. Three muskets and a brace
of pistols, all bright and shining, were suspended
against the wall, with a sabre and a cane
hanging
side by side, and above these two cocked
hats, one for parade, and one for ordinary use.
A small shelf, containing some half dozen books,
formed his library, one of which, a little old
mouldy volume of philosophical maxims, was
his favourite reading. This he thumbed and
pondered over day by day; applying every
maxim to his own particular case, provided it had
a little tinge of wholesome bitterness, and treated
of the injustice of the world.
Yet he is social and kind-hearted, and,
provided
he can be diverted from his wrongs and
his philosophy, is an entertaining companion.
I like these old weather-beaten sons of fortune,
and enjoy their rough campaigning anecdotes.
In the course of my visit to the one in question,
I learnt some curious facts about an old military
commander of the fortress, who seems to have
resembled him in some respects, and to have had
similar fortunes in the wars. These particulars
have been augmented by inquiries among some
of the old inhabitants of the place, particularly
the father of Mateo Ximenes, of whose traditional
stories the worthy I am about to introduce to the
reader is a favourite hero.
13 *
THE GOVERNOR AND THE NOTARY.
In
former times there ruled, as governor of the
Alhambra, a doughty old cavalier, who, from
having lost one arm in the wars, was commonly
known by the name of El Gobernador Manco, or
the one armed governor. He in fact prided
himself
upon being an old soldier, wore his
mustachios
curled up to his eyes, a pair of
campaigning
boots, and a toledo as long as a spit, with his
pocket handkerchief in the basket-hilt.
He was, moreover, exceedingly proud and
punctilious, and tenacious of all his privileges and
dignities. Under his sway, the immunities of the
Alhambra, as a royal residence and domain, were
rigidly exacted. No one was permitted to enter
the fortress with firearms, or even with a sword
or staff, unless he were of a certain rank, and
every horseman was obliged to dismount at the
gate and lead his horse by the bridle. Now, as
the hill of the Alhambra rises from the very
midst of the city of Granada, being, as it were, an
excrescence of the capital, it must at all times be
somewhat irksome to the captain general who
commands the province, to have thus an
imperium
in imperio, a petty independent post, in the
very core of his domains. It was rendered the
more galling in the present instance, from the
irritable
jealousy of the old governor, that took fire
on the least question of authority and jurisdiction,
and from the loose vagrant character of the
people
that had gradually nestled themselves within
the fortress as in a sanctuary, and from thence
carried on a system of roguery and depredation
at the expense of the honest inhabitants of the
city. Thus there was a perpetual feud and
heart-burning
between the captain general and the
governor; the more virulent on the part of the
latter, inasmuch as the smallest of two
neighbouring
potentates is always the most captious about
his dignity. The stately palace of the captain
general stood in the Plaza Nueva, immediately
at the foot of the hill of the Alhambra, and here
was always a bustle and parade of guards, and
domestics
,
and city functionaries. A beetling
bastion
of the fortress overlooked the palace and the
public square in front of it; and on this bastion
the old governor would occasionally strut
backwards
and forwards, with his toledo girded by
his side, keeping a wary eye down upon his
rival
,
like a hawk reconnoitering his quarry from
his nest in a dry tree.
Whenever he descended into the city, it was
in grand parade, on horseback, surrounded by his
guards, or in his state coach, an ancient and
unwieldy
Spanish edifice of carved timber and gilt
leather, drawn by eight mules, with running
foot-men
,
outriders, and lacqueys, on which occasions
he flattered himself he impressed every beholder
with awe and admiration as vicegerent of the king,
though the wits of Granada, particularly those
who loitered about the palace of the captain
general
,
were apt to sneer at his petty parade, and,
in allusion to the vagrant character of his
subjects
,
to greet him with the appellation of the
King of the beggars.
One of the most fruitful sources of dispute
between
these two doughty rivals, was the right
claimed by the governor to have all things
passed
free of duty through the city, that were
intended
for the use of himself or his garrison. By
degrees, this privilege had given rise to extensive
smuggling. A nest of contrabandistas took up
their abode in the hovels of the fortress and the
numerous caves in its vicinity, and drove a
thriving
business under the connivance of the soldiers
of the garrison.
The vigilance of the captain general was
aroused
.
He consulted his legal adviser and factotum,
a shrewd, meddlesome, Escribano or notary, who
rejoiced in an opportunity of perplexing the
old potentate of the Alhambra, and involving him
in a maze of legal subtilities. He advised the
captain
general to insist upon the right of examining
every convoy passing through the gates of his
city, and he penned a long letter for him, in
vindication
of the right. Governor Manco was a
straight-forward, cut-and-thrust old soldier, who
hated an Escribano worse than the devil, and this
one in particular, worse than all other
Escribanoes
.
What! said he, curling up his mustachios
fiercely, does the captain general set his man of
the pen to practise confusions upon me? I'll let
him see that an old soldier is not to be baffled by
schoolcraft.
He seized his pen, and scrawled a short letter
in a crabbed hand, in which, without deigning to
enter into argument, he insisted on the right of
transit free of search, and denounced vengeance
on any custom-house officer who should lay his
unhallowed hand on any convoy protected by the
flag of the Alhambra.
While this question was agitated between the
two pragmatical potentates, it so happened that a
mule laden with supplies for the fortress arrived
one day at the gate of Xenil, by which it was to
traverse a suburb of the city on its way to the
Alhambra. The convoy was headed by a testy
old corporal, who had long served under the
governor
,
and was a man after his own heart; as
trusty and staunch as an old toledo blade. As
they approached the gate of the city, the
corporal
placed the banner of the Alhambra on
the pack saddle of the mule, and, drawing
himself
up to a perfect perpendicular, advanced
with his head dressed to the front, but with the
wary side glance of a cur passing through hostile
grounds, and ready for a snap and a snarl.
Who goes there? said the centinel at the
gate.
Soldier of the Alhambra, said the corporal
without turning his head.
What have you in charge?
Provisions for the garrison.
Proceed.
The corporal marched straight forward,
followed
by the convoy, but had not advanced many
paces, before a poss of custom-house officers
rushed out of a small toll-house.
Hallo, there! cried the leader: Muleteer,
halt and open those packages.
The corporal wheeled round, and drew
himself
up in battle array. Respect the flag of the
Alhambra, said he; these things are for the
governor.
A fig for the governor, and a fig for his flag.
Muleteer halt, I say.
Stop the convoy at your peril! cried the
corporal, cocking his musket. Muleteer
proceed
.
The muleteer gave his beast a hearty thwack;
the custom-house officer sprang forward, and seized
the halter; whereupon the corporal levelled his
piece and shot him dead.
The street was immediately in an uproar.
The old corporal was seized, and after
undergoing
sundry kicks and cuffs, and cudgellings,
which are generally given impromptu, by the
mob in Spain, as a foretaste of the after penalties
of the law, he was loaded with irons, and
conducted
to the city prison; while his comrades
were permitted to proceed with the convoy, after
it had been well rummaged, to the Alhambra.
The old governor was in a towering passion,
when he heard of this insult to his flag and
capture
of his corporal. For a time he stormed
about the Moorish halls, and vapoured about the
bastions, and looked down fire and sword upon
the palace of the captain general. Having
vented
the first ebullition of his wrath, he despatched
a message demanding the surrender of the
corporal
,
as to him alone belonged the right of
sitting
in judgment on the offences of those under
his command. The captain general, aided by
the pen of the delighted Escribano, replied at
great length, arguing that as the offence had been
committed within the walls of his city, and
against one of his civil officers, it was clearly
within his proper jurisdiction. The governor
rejoined by a repetition of his demand; the
captain
general gave a sur-rejoinder of still greater
length, and legal acumen; the governor became
hotter and more peremptory in his demands, and
the captain general cooler and more copious in his
replies; until the old lion-hearted soldier
absolutely
roared with fury, at being thus entangled
in the meshes of legal controversy.
While the subtle Escribano was thus amusing
himself at the expense of the governor, he was
conducting the trial of the corporal; who,
mewed
up in a narrow dungeon of the prison, had
merely a small grated window at which to show
his iron-bound visage, and receive the
consolations
of his friends; a mountain of written
testimony
was diligently heaped up, according to
Spanish form, by the indefatigable Escribano; the
corporal was completely overwhelmed by it.
He was convicted of murder, and sentenced to be
hanged.
It was in vain the governor sent down
remonstrance
and menace from the Alhambra. The
fatal
day was at hand, and the corporal was put
in
capilla
, that is to say, in the chapel of the prison;
as is always done with culprits the day before
execution, that they may meditate on their
approaching
end, and repent them of their sins.
Seeing things drawing to an extremity, the old
governor determined to attend to the affair in
person
.
For this purpose he ordered out his
carriage
of state, and, surrounded by his guards,
rumbled down the avenue of the Alhambra into
VOL. II. 14
the city. Driving to the house of the Escribano,
he summoned him to the portal.
The eye of the old governor gleamed like a
coal at beholding the smirking man of the law
advancing with an air of exultation.
What is this I hear, cried he, that you are
about to put to death one of my soldiers?
All according to law,all in strict form of
justice, said the self-sufficient Escribano,
chuckling
and rubbing his hands. I can show your
excellency the written testimony in the case.
Fetch it hither, said the governor.
The Escribano bustled into his office, delighted
with having another opportunity of displaying
his ingenuity at the expense of the hard-headed
veteran. He returned with a satchel full of
papers
,
and began to read a long deposition with
professional volubility. By this time, a crowd
had collected, listening with outstretched necks
and gaping mouths.
Pry'thee man, get into the carriage out of this
pestilent throng, that I may the better hear thee,
said the governor.
The Escribano entered the carriage, when, in
a twinkling, the door was closed, the coachman
smacked his whip, mules, carriage, guards and
all dashed off at a thundering rate, leaving the
crowd in gaping wonderment, nor did the
governor
pause until he had lodged his prey in one of
the strongest dungeons of the Alhambra.
He then sent down a flag of truce in military
style, proposing a cartel or exchange of prisoners,
the corporal for the notary. The pride of the
captain
general was piqued, he returned a
contemptuous
refusal, and forthwith caused a gallows,
tall and strong, to be erected in the centre of the
Plaza Neuva, for the execution of the corporal.
O ho! is that the game? said governor
Manco
:
he gave orders, and immediately a gibbet
was reared on the verge of the great beetling
bastion
that overlooked the Plaza. Now, said he,
in a message to the captain general, hang my
soldier when you please; but at the same time
that he is swung off in the square, look up to see
your Escribano dangling against the sky.
The captain general was inflexible; troops
were paraded in the square; the drums beat; the
bell tolled; an immense multitude of amateurs
had collected to behold the execution; on the
other hand, the governor paraded his garrison
on the bastion, and tolled the funeral dirge of the
notary from the Torre de la Campana, or tower
of the bell.
The notary's wife pressed through the crowd
with a whole progeny of little embryo
Escribanoes
at her heels, and throwing herself at the feet
of the captain general, implored him not to
sacrifice
the life of her husband, and the welfare of
herself and her numerous little ones to a point of
pride; for you know the old governor too
well, said she, to doubt that he will put his
threat in execution if you hang the soldier.
The captain general was overpowered by her
tears and lamentations, and the clamours of her
callow brood. The corporal was sent up to the
Alhambra under a guard, in his gallows garb,
like a hooded friar; but with head erect and a
face of iron. The Escribano was demanded in
exchange, according to the cartel. The once
bustling
and self-sufficient man of the law was drawn
forth from his dungeon, more dead than alive.
All his flippancy and conceit had evaporated; his
hair, it is said, had nearly turned gray with
affright
,
and he had a downcast, dogged look, as if
he still felt the halter round his neck.
The old governor stuck his one arm a-kimbo,
and for a moment surveyed him with an iron
smile. Henceforth, my friend, said he,
moderate
your zeal in hurrying others to the
gallows
;
be not too certain of your own safety,
even though you should have the law on your
side; and, above all, take care how you play off
your schoolcraft another time upon an old
soldier
.
14 *
GOVERNOR MANCO AND THE SOLDIER.
When
governor Manco, or the one armed,
kept up a show of military state in the
Alhambra
,
he became nettled at the reproaches
continually
cast upon his fortress of being a nestling
place of rogues and contrabandistas. On a
sudden
,
the old potentate determined on reform, and
setting vigorously to work, ejected whole nests
of vagabonds out of the fortress, and the gipsy
caves with which the surrounding hills are
honey-combed
.
He sent out soldiers, also, to patrol the
avenues and footpaths, with orders to take up all
suspicious persons.
One bright summer morning, a patrol consisting
of the testy old corporal who had distinguished
himself in the affair of the notary, a trumpeter
and two privates were seated under the garden
wall of the Generalife, beside the road which
leads down from the mountain of the Sun, when
they heard the tramp of a horse, and a male
voice singing in rough, though not unmusical
tones, an old Castilian campaigning song.
Presently they beheld a sturdy, sun-burnt
fellow
,
clad in the ragged garb of a foot-soldier,
leading
a powerful Arabian horse caparisoned in the
ancient Morisco fashion.
Astonished at the sight of a strange soldier
descending
,
steed in hand, from that solitary
mountain
,
the corporal stepped forth and challenged
him.
Who goes there?
A friend.
Who, and what are you?
A poor soldier, just from the wars, with a
cracked crown and empty purse for a reward.
By this time they were enabled to view him
more narrowly. He had a black patch across his
forehead, which, with a grizzled beard, added to
a certain dare-devil cast of countenance, while a
slight squint threw into the whole an occasional
gleam of roguish good humour.
Having answered the questions of the patrol,
the soldier seemed to consider himself entitled to
make others in return.
May I ask, said he, what city is this
which I see at the foot of the hill?
What city! cried the trumpeter; come,
that's too bad. Here's a fellow lurking about the
mountain of the Sun, and demands the name of
the great city of Granada.
Granada! Madre de Dios! can it be
possible
!
Perhaps not! rejoined the trumpeter, and
perhaps you have no idea that yonder are the
towers of the Alhambra?
Son of a trumpet, replied the stranger, do
not trifle with me; if this be indeed the
Alhambra
,
I have some strange matters to reveal to the
governor.
You will have an opportunity, said the
corporal
,
for we mean to take you before him.
By this time the trumpeter had seized the
bridle
of the steed, the two privates had each
secured
an arm of the soldier, the corporal put himself
in front, gave the word, forward, march! and
away they marched for the Alhambra.
The sight of a ragged foot-soldier and a fine
Arabian horse brought in captive by the patrol,
attracted the attention of all the idlers of the
fortress
,
and of those gossip groups that generally
assemble about wells and fountains at early dawn.
The wheel of the cistern paused in its rotations;
the slipshod servant-maid stood gaping with
pitcher
in hand, as the corporal passed by with his
prize. A motley train gradually gathered in the
rear of the escort. Knowing nods, and winks, and
conjectures passed from one to another. It is a
deserter, said one; a contrabandista, said another;
a bandalero, said a third, until it was affirmed
that a captain of a desperate band of robbers had
been captured by the prowess of the corporal and
his patrol. Well, well, said the old crones
one to another, captain or not, let him get out
of the grasp of old governor Manco if he can,
though he is out one-handed.
Governor Manco was seated in one of the
inner
halls of the Alhambra, taking his morning's
cup of chocolate in company with his confessor,
a fat Franciscan friar from the neighbouring
convent
.
A demure, dark-eyed damsel of Malaga,
the daughter of his housekeeper, was attending
upon him.
The world hinted that the damsel, who, with
all her demureness, was a sly, buxom baggage,
had found out a soft spot in the iron heart of the
old governor, and held complete control over
him,but let that pass; the domestic affairs of
these mighty potentates of the earth should not
be too narrowly scrutinized.
When word was brought that a suspicious
stranger had been taken lurking about the
fortress
,
and was actually in the outer court, in
durance of the corporal, waiting the pleasure of
his excellency, the pride and stateliness of office
swelled the bosom of the governor. Giving back
his chocolate cup into the hands of the demure
damsel, he called for his basket-hilted sword,
girded it to his side, twirled up his mustachios,
took his seat in a large high-backed chair,
assumed
a bitter and forbidding aspect, and ordered the
prisoner into his presence. The soldier was
brought in, still closely pinioned by his captors,
and guarded by the corporal. He maintained,
however, a resolute, self-confident air, and
returned
the sharp, scrutinizing look of the governor
with an easy squint, which by no means pleased
the punctilious old potentate.
Well, culprit! said the governor, after he
had regarded him for a moment in silence, what
have you to say for yourself? who are you?
A soldier, just from the wars, who has
brought away nothing but scars and bruises.
A soldier? humph! a foot-soldier by your
garb. I understand you have a fine Arabian horse.
I presume you brought him too from the wars,
beside your scars and bruises.
May it please your excellency, I have
something
strange to tell about that horse. Indeed, I
have one of the most wonderful things to relate
something too that concerns the security of this
fortress, indeed of all Granada. But it is a matter
to be imparted only to your private ear, or in
presence of such only as are in your
confidence
.
The governor considered for a moment, and
then directed the corporal and his men to
withdraw
,
but to post themselves outside of the door,
and be ready at call. This holy friar, said he,
is my confessor, you may say any thing in his
presenceand this damsel, nodding towards the
handmaid, who had loitered with an air of great
curiosity, this damsel is of great secrecy and
discretion, and to be trusted with any thing.
The soldier gave a glance between a squint
and a leer at the demure handmaid. I am
perfectly
willing, said he, that the damsel should
remain.
When all the rest had withdrawn, the soldier
commenced his story. He was a flucnt,
smooth-tongued
varlet, and had a command of language
above his apparent rank.
May it please your excellency, said he, I
am, as I before observed, a soldier, and have seen
some hard service, but my term of enlistment
being
expired, I was discharged not long since from
the army at Valladolid, and set out on foot for
my native village in Andalusia. Yesterday
evening
,
the sun went down as I was traversing a
great dry plain of old Castile.
Hold! cried the governor, what is this
you say? Old Castile is some two or three
hundred
miles from this.
Even so, replied the soldier coolly, I told
your excellency I had strange things to relate
but not more strange than trueas your
excellency
will find, if you will deign me a patient
hearing.
Proceed, culprit, said the governor,
twirling
up his mustachios.
As the sun went down, continued the
soldier
,
I cast my eyes about in search of some
quarters for the night, but far as my sight could
reach, there was no signs of habitation. I saw
that I should have to make my bed on the naked
plain, with my knapsack for a pillow; but your
excellency is an old soldier, and knows that to
one who has been in the wars, such a night's
lodging
is no great hardship.
The governor nodded assent, as he drew his
pocket handkerchief out of the basket-hilt of his
sword, to drive away a fly that buzzed about his
nose.
Well, to make a long story short, continued
the soldier, I trudged forward for several miles,
until I came to a bridge over a deep ravine,
through which ran a little thread of water, almost
dried up by the summer heat. At one end of
the bridge was a Moorish tower, the upper part
all in ruins, but a vault in the foundations quite
entire. Here, thinks I, is a good place to make
a halt. So I went down to the stream, took a
hearty drink, for the water was pure and sweet,
and I was parched with thirst, then opening my
wallet, I took out an onion and a few crusts,
which were all my provisions, and seating
myself
on a stone on the margin of the stream, began
to make my supper; intending afterwards to
quarter myself for the night in the vault of the
tower, and capital quarters they would have been
VOL. II. 15
for a campaigner just from the wars, as your
excellency, who is an old soldier, may suppose.
I have put up gladly with worse in my
time, said the governor, returning his pocket
handkerchief into the hilt of his sword.
While I was quietly craunching my crust,
pursued the soldier, I heard something stir
within the vault; I listened: it was the tramp of
a horse. By and by a man came forth from a
door in the foundation of the tower, close by the
water's edge, leading a powerful horse by the
bridle. I could not well make out what he was
by the starlight. It had a suspicious look to be
lurking among the ruins of a tower in that wild
solitary place. He might be a mere wayfarer
like myself; he might be a contrabandista; he
might be a bandalero! What of that,thank
heaven and my poverty, I had nothing to lose,
so I sat still and craunched my crusts
He led his horse to the water close by where
I was sitting, so that I had a fair opportunity of
reconnoitering him. To my surprise, he was
dressed in a Moorish garb, with a cuirass of
steel, and a polished skullcap, that I
distinguished
by the reflection of the stars upon it.
His horse, too, was harnessed in the Morisco
fashion, with great shovel stirrups. He led
him, as I said, to the side of the stream, into
which the animal plunged his head almost to
the eyes, and drank until I thought he would
have burst.
`Comrade,' said I, `your steed drinks well;
it's a good sign when a horse plunges his muzzle
bravely into the water.'
`He may well drink,' said the stranger,
speaking with a Moorish accent; `it is a good
year since he had his last draught.'
`By Santiago,' said I, `that beats even the
camels that I have seen in Africa. But come,
you seem to be something of a soldier, won't you
sit down, and take part of a soldier's fare?'In
fact I felt the want of a companion in this lonely
place, and was willing to put up with an infidel.
Besides, as your excellency well knows, a soldier
is never very particular about the faith of his
company, and soldiers of all countries are
comrades
on peaceable ground.
The governor again nodded assent.
Well, as I was saying, I invited him to share
my supper, such as it was, for I could not do less
in common hospitality.
`I have no time to pause for meat or drink,'
said he, `I have a long journey to make before
morning.'
`In which direction?' said I.
`Andalusia,' said he.
`Exactly my route,' said I. `So as you
won't stop and eat with me, perhaps you'll let
me mount and ride with you. I see your horse
is of a powerful frame: I'll warrant he'll carry
double.'
`Agreed,' said the trooper; and it would not
have been civil and soldierlike to refuse,
especially
as I had offered to share my supper with
him. So up he mounted, and up I mounted
behind him.
`Hold fast,' said he, `my steed goes like the
wind.'
`Never fear me,' said I, and so off we set.
From a walk the horse soon passed to a trot,
from a trot to a gallop, and from a gallop to a
harum-scarum scamper. It seemed as if rocks,
trees, houses, every thing, flew hurry-scurry
behind us.
`What town is this?' said I.
`Segovia,' said he; and before the words
were out of his mouth, the towers of Segovia
were out of sight. We swept up the
Guadarama
mountains, and down by the Escurial;
and we skirted the walls of Madrid, and we
scoured away across the plains of La Mancha.
In this way we went, up hill and down dale,
by towns and cities all buried in deep sleep, and
across mountains, and plains, and rivers, just
glimmering in the starlight.
To make a long story short, and not to
fatigue your excellency, the trooper suddenly
pulled up on the side of a mountain. `Here we
are,' said he, `at the end of our journey.'
I looked about but could see no signs of
habitation
:
nothing but the mouth of a cavern: while
I looked, I saw multitudes of people in Moorish
dresses, some on horseback, some on foot,
arriving
as if borne by the wind from all points of
the compass, and hurrying into the mouth of the
cavern like bees into a hive. Before I could ask
a question, the trooper struck his long Moorish
spurs into the horse's flanks, and dashed in with
the throng We passed along a steep winding
way that descended into the very bowels of the
mountain. As we pushed on, a light began to
glimmer up by little and little, like the first
glimmerings
of day, but what caused it, I could not
discover. It grew stronger and stronger, and
15*
enabled me to see every thing around. I now
noticed as we passed along, great caverns opening
to the right and left, like halls in an arsenal. In
some there were shields, and helmets, and
cuirasses
,
and lances, and scimetars hanging against the
walls; in others, there were great heaps of
warlike
munitions and camp equipage lying upon the
ground.
It would have done your excellency's heart
good, being an old soldier, to have seen such
grand provision for war. Then in other caverns
there were long rows of horsemen, armed to the
teeth, with lances raised and banners unfurled, all
ready for the field; but they all sat motionless in
their saddles like so many statues. In other
halls, were warriors sleeping on the ground
beside
their horses, and foot soldiers in groups,
ready to fall into the ranks. All were in old
fashioned Moorish dresses and armour.
Well, your excellency, to cut a long story
short, we at length entered an immense cavern,
or I might say palace, of grotto work, the walls
of which seemed to be veined with gold and
silver
,
and to sparkle with diamonds and sapphires,
and all kinds of precious stones. At the upper
end sat a Moorish king on a golden throne, with
his nobles on each side, and a guard of African
blacks with drawn scimetars. All the crowd that
continued to flock in, and amounted to thousands
and thousands, passed one by one before his
throne, each paying homage as he passed. Some
of the multitude were dressed in magnificent
robes, without stain or blemish, and sparkling
with jewels; others in burnished and enamelled
armour; while others were in mouldered and
mildewed garments, and in armour all battered
and dinted, and covered with rust.
I had hitherto held my tongue, for your
excellency
well knows, it is not for a soldier to
ask many questions when on duty, but I could
keep silence no longer.
Pry'thee comrade,' said I, `what is the
meaning of all this?'
`This,' said the trooper, `is a great and
powerful
mystery. Know, O Christian, that you see
before you the court and army of Boabdil, the last
king of Granada.'
`What is this you tell me!' cried I. `Boabdil
and his court were exiled from the land hundreds
of years agone, and all died in Africa.'
`So it is recorded in your lying chronicles,'
replied the Moor, `but know that Boabdil and
the warriors who made the last struggle for
Granada
were all shut up in this mountain by
powerful
enchantment. As to the king and army that
marched forth from Granada at the time of the
surrender, they were a mere phantom train, or
spirits and demons permitted to assume those
shapes to deceive the Christian sovereigns. And
furthermore let me tell you, friend, that all Spain
is a country under the power of enchantment.
There is not a mountain-cave, not a lonely
watch-tower
in the plains, nor ruined castle on the hills,
but has some spell-bound warriors sleeping from
age to age within its vaults, until the sins are
expiated
for which Allah permitted the dominion
to pass for a time out of the hands of the faithful.
Once every year, on the eve of St. John, they are
released from enchantment from sunset to sunrise,
and permitted to repair here to pay homage to
their sovereign; and the crowds which you
beheld
swarming into the cavern are Moslem
warriors
from their haunts in all parts of Spain; for
my own part, you saw the ruined tower of the
bridge in old Castile, where I have now
wintered
and summered for many hundred years, and
where I must be back again by day-break. As to
the battalions of horse and foot which you beheld
drawn up in array in the neighbouring caverns,
they are the spell-bound warriors of Granada.
It is written in the book of fate, that when the
enchantment is broken, Boabdil will descend
from the mountains at the head of this army,
resume
his throne in the Alhambra and his sway of
Granada, and gathering together the enchanted
warriors from all parts of Spain, will reconquer
the peninsula, and restore it to Moslem rule.'
`And when shall this happen?' said I.
`Allah alone knows. We had hoped the day
of deliverance was at hand; but there reigns at
present a vigilant governor in the Alhambra, a
staunch old soldier, the same called governor
Manco; while such a warrior holds command of
the very outpost, and stands ready to check the
first irruption from the mountain, I fear Boabdil
and his soldiery must be content to rest upon
their arms.'
Here the governor raised himself somewhat
perpendicularly, adjusted his sword, and
twirled
up his mustachios.
To make a long story short, and not to
fatigue
your excellency, the trooper having given
me this account, dismounted from his steed.
`Tarry here,' said he, `and guard my steed,
while I go and bow the knee to Boabdil.' So
saying, he strode away among the throng that
pressed forward to the throne.
What's to be done? thought I, when thus
left to myself. Shall I wait here until this
infidel
returns to whisk me off on his goblin steed,
the Lord knows where? or shall I make the most
of my time, and beat a retreat from this
hobgoblin
community?A soldier's mind is soon made
up, as your excellency well knows. As to the
horse, he belonged to an avowed enemy of the
faith and the realm, and was a fair prize
according
to the rules of war. So hoisting myself from
the crupper into the saddle, I turned the reins,
struck the Moorish stirrups into the sides of the
steed, and put him to make the best of his way
out of the passage by which we had entered. As
we scoured by the halls where the Moslem
horsemen
sat in motionless battalions, I thought I
heard the clang of armour, and a hollow murmur
of voices. I gave the steed another taste of the
stirrups, and doubled my speed. There was now
a sound behind me like a rushing blast; I heard
the clatter of a thousand hoofs; a countless throng
overtook me, I was borne along in the press, and
hurled forth from the mouth of the cavern, while
thousands of shadowy forms were swept off in
every direction by the four winds of heaven.
In the whirl and confusion of the scene, I
was thrown from the saddle, and fell senseless to
the earth. When I came to myself I was lying on
the brow of a hill, with the Arabian steed
standing
beside me, for in falling my arm had slipped
within the bridle, which, I presume, prevented
his whisking off to old Castile.
Your excellency may easily judge of my
surprize
on looking round, to behold hedges of aloes
and Indian figs, and other proofs of a southern
climate, and see a great city below me with
towers and palaces, and a grand cathedral. I
descended
the hill cautiously, leading my steed, for
I was afraid to mount him again, lest he should
play me some slippery trick. As I descended, I
met with your patrol, who let me into the secret
that it was Granada that lay before me: and that
I was actually under the walls of the Alhambra,
the fortress of the redoubted governor Manco,
the terror of all enchanted Moslems. When I
heard this, I determined at once to seek your
excellency
,
to inform you of all that I had seen,
and to warn you of the perils that surround and
undermine you, that you may take measures in
time to guard your fortress, and the kingdom
itself
,
from this intestine army that lurks in the
very bowels of the land.
And pry'thee friend, you who are a veteran
campaigner, and have seen so much service, said
the governor, how would you advise me to go
about to prevent this evil?
It is not for an humble private of the ranks,
said the soldier modestly, to pretend to instruct
a commander of your excellency's sagacity; but
it appears to me that your excellency might cause
all the caves and entrances into the mountain, to
be walled up with solid mason work, so that
Boabdil
and his army might be completely corked
up in their subterranean habitation. If the good
father too, added the soldier, reverently
bowing
to the friar, and devoutly crossing himself,
would consecrate the barricadoes with his
blessing
,
and put up a few crosses and reliques, and
images of saints, I think they might withstand
all the power of infidel enchantments.
They doubtless would be of great avail, said
the friar.
The governor now placed his arm akimbo,
with his hand resting on the hilt of his toledo,
fixed his eye upon the soldier, and gently
wagging
his head from one side to the other:
So friend, said he, then you really
suppose
I am to be gulled with this cock-and-bull
story about enchanted mountains, and enchanted
Moors. Hark ye, culprit!not another word.
An old soldier you may be, but you'll find you
have an older soldier to deal with; and one not
easily outgeneralled. Ho! guard there!put this
fellow in irons.
The demure handmaid would have put in a
word in favour of the prisoner, but the governor
silenced her with a look.
As they were pinioning the soldier, one of the
guards felt something of bulk in his pocket, and
drawing it forth, found a long leathern purse that
appeared to be well filled. Holding it by one
corner, he turned out the contents on the
table
before the governor, and never did
free-booter's
bag make more gorgeous delivery. Out
tumbled rings and jewels, and rosaries of pearls,
and sparkling diamond crosses, and a profusion
of ancient golden coin, some of which fell
jingling
to the floor, and rolled away to the uttermost
parts of the chamber.
For a time the sanctions of justice were
suspended
:
VOL. II. 16
there was a universal scramble after the
glittering fugitives. The governor alone, who
was imbued with true Spanish pride, maintained
his stately decorum, though his eye betrayed a
little anxiety until the last coin and jewel was
restored to the sack.
The friar was not so calm, his whole face
glowed like a furnace, and his eyes twinkled and
flashed at sight of the rosaries and crosses.
Sacrilegious wretch that thou art, exclaimed
he, what church or sanctuary hast thou been
plundering of these sacred reliques?
Neither one nor the other, holy father. If
they be sacrilegious spoils, they must have been
taken in times long past by the infidel trooper
I have mentioned. I was just going to tell his
excellency, when he interrupted me, that, on
taking
possession of the trooper's horse, I
unhooked
a leathern sack which hung at the saddle bow,
and which, I presume, contained the plunder of
his campaignings in days of old, when the Moors
overran the country.
Mighty well,at present, you will make up
your mind to take up your quarters in a chamber
of the Vermilion towers, which, though not
under
a magic spell, will hold you as safe as any
cave of your enchanted Moors.
Your excellency will do as you think
proper
,
said the prisoner coolly. I shall be
thankful to your excellency for any
accommodation
in the fortress. A soldier who has been in the
wars, as your excellency well knows, is not
particular
about his lodgings; and provided I have a
snug dungeon and regular rations, I shall manage to
make myself comfortable. I would only entreat,
that while your excellency is so careful about me,
you would have an eye to your fortress, and think
on the hint I dropped about stopping up the
entrances
to the mountain.
Here ended the scene. The prisoner was
conducted
to a strong dungeon in the Vermilion
towers, the Arabian steed was led to his
excellency's
stable, and the trooper's sack was deposited
in his excellency's strong box. To the latter, it
is true, the friar made some demur, questioning
whether the sacred reliques, which were
evidently
sacrilegious spoils, should not be placed in
custody
of the church; but as the governor was
peremptory
on the subject, and was absolute lord
in the Alhambra, the friar discreetly dropped
the discussion, but determined to convey
intelligence
of the fact to the church dignitaries in
Granada.
To explain these prompt and rigid measures
on the part of old governor Manco, it is proper
to observe, that about this time the Alpuxarra
mountains in the neighbourhood of Granada were
terribly infested by a gang of robbers, under the
command of a daring chief, named Manuel
Borasco
,
who were accustomed to prowl about the
country
,
and even to enter the city in various disguises
to gain intelligence of the departure of convoys
of merchandise, or travellers with well lined
purses, whom they took care to waylay in
distant
and solitary passes of their road. These
repeated and daring outrages had awakened the
attention of government, and the commanders
of the various posts had received instructions to
be on the alert, and to take up all suspicious
stragglers. Governor Manco was particularly
zealous, in consequence of the various stigmas
that had been cast upon his fortress, and he now
doubted not that he had entrapped some
formidable
desperado of this gang.
In the mean time the story took wind, and
became
the talk not merely of the fortress, but of
the whole city of Granada. It was said that the
noted robber, Manuel Borasco, the terror of the
Alpuxarras, had fallen into the clutches of old
governor Manco, and been cooped up by him in
a dungeon of the Vermilion towers, and every one
who had been robbed by him flocked to
recognize
the marauder. The Vermilion towers, as is
well known, stand apart from the Alhambra, on
a sister hill separated from the main fortress by
the ravine, down which passes the main avenue.
There were no outer walls, but a centinel
patroled
before the tower. The window of the
chamber
in which the soldier was confined was
strongly
grated, and looked upon a small esplanade.
Here the good folks of Granada repaired to gaze
at him, as they would at a laughing hyena
grinning
through the cage of a menagerie. Nobody,
however, recognized him for Manuel Borasco,
for that terrible robber was noted for a ferocious
physiognomy, and had by no means the
good-humoured
squint of the prisoner. Visitors came
not merely from the city, but from all parts of the
country, but nobody knew him, and there began
to be doubts in the minds of the common people,
whether there might not be some truth in his
story. That Boabdil and his army were shut up
16 *
in the mountain, was an old tradition which
many of the ancient inhabitants had heard from
their fathers. Numbers went up to the
mountain
of the Sun, or rather of St. Elena in search of
the cave mentioned by the soldier; and saw and
peeped into the deep dark pit, descending, no
one knows how far, into the mountain, and which
remains there to this day, the fabled entrance
to the subterranean abode of Boabdil.
By degrees, the soldier became popular with
the common people. A freebooter of the
mountains
is by no means the opprobrious character in
Spain that a robber is in any other country; on
the contrary, he is a kind of chivalrous personage
in the eyes of the lower classes. There is always
a disposition, also, to cavil at the conduct of those
in command, and many began to murmur at the
high-handed measures of old governor Manco,
and to look upon the prisoner in the light of a
martyr.
The soldier, moreover, was a merry, waggish
fellow, that had a joke for every one who came
near his window, and a soft speech for every
female. He had procured an old guitar also, and
would sit by his window and sing ballads and
love ditties to the delight of the women of the
neighbourhood, who would assemble on the
esplanade
in the evenings, and dance boleros to his
music. Having trimmed off his rough beard, his
sunburnt face found favour in the eyes of the fair,
and the demure handmaid of the governor
declared
that his squint was perfectly irresistible. This
kind-hearted damsel had, from the first, evinced a
deep sympathy in his fortunes, and having in
vain tried to mollify the governor, had set to
work privately to mitigate the rigour of his
dispensations
.
Every day she brought the prisoner
some crumbs of comfort which had fallen from
the governor's table, or been abstracted from his
larder, together with, now and then, a consoling
bottle of choice Val de Peas, or rich Malaga.
While this petty treason was going on in the
very centre of the old governor's citadel, a storm
of open war was brewing up among his external
foes. The circumstance of a bag of gold and
jewels having been found upon the person of the
supposed robber, had been reported with many
exaggerations in Granada. A question of
territorial
jurisdiction was immediately started by the
governor's inveterate rival, the captain general.
He insisted that the prisoner had been captured
without the precincts of the Alhambra, and
within
the rules of his authority. He demanded his
body therefore, and the spolia opima taken with
him. Due information having been carried
likewise
by the friar to the grand Inquisitor, of the
crosses, and the rosaries, and other reliques
contained in the bag, he claimed the culprit, as
having been guilty of sacrilege, and insisted that
his plunder was due to the church, and his body
to the next Auto da Fe. The feuds ran high; the
governor was furious, and swore, rather than
surrender
his captive, he would hang him up
within
the Alhambra, as a spy caught within the
purlieus
of the fortress.
The captain general threatened to send a body
of soldiers to transfer the prisoner from the
Vermilion
towers to the city. The grand Inquisitor
was equally bent upon despatching a number of
the familiars of the holy office. Word was brought
late at night to the governor, of these
machinations
.
Let them come, said he, they'll find
me beforehand with them. He must rise bright
and early who would take in an old soldier. He
accordingly issued orders to have the prisoner
removed at daybreak to the Donjon Keep within
the walls of the Alhambra: and d'ye hear,
child, said he to his demure handmaid, tap
at my door, and wake me before cock-crowing,
that I may see to the matter myself.
The day dawned, the cock crowed, but
nobody
tapped at the door of the governor. The sun
rose high above the mountain-tops, and glittered
in at his casement ere the governor was
awakened
from his morning dreams by his veteran
corporal
,
who stood before him with terror stamped
upon his iron visage.
He's off! he's gone! cried the corporal,
gasping for breath.
Who's off!who's gone!
The soldierthe robberthe devil, for aught
I know. His dungeon is empty, but the door
locked. No one knows how he has escaped out
of it.
Who saw him last?
Your handmaid,she brought him his
supper
.
Let her be called instantly.
Here was new matter of confusion. The
chamber
of the demure damsel was likewise empty;
her bed had not been slept in; she had doubtless
gone off with the culprit, as she had appeared,
for some days past, to have frequent
conversations
with him.
This was wounding the old governor in a
tender
part, but he had scarce time to wince at it,
when new misfortunes broke upon his view. On
going into his cabinet, he found his strong box
open, the leathern purse of the trooper abstracted,
and with it a couple of corpulent bags of
doubloons
.
But how, and which way had the fugitives
escaped
?
A peasant who lived in a cottage by the
road side leading up into the Sierra, declared that
he had heard the tramp of a powerful steed, just
before daybreak, passing up into the mountains.
He had looked out at his casement, and could
just distinguish a horseman, with a female seated
before him.
Search the stables, cried governor Manco.
The stables were searched; all the horses were in
their stalls, excepting the Arabian steed. In his
place was a stout cudgel tied to the manager, and
on it a label bearing these words, A gift to
governor
Manco, from an old soldier.
LEGEND
OF
THE TWO DISCREET STATUES.
There
lived once, in a waste apartment of
the Alhambra, a merry little fellow named Lope
Sanchez, who worked in the gardens, and was as
brisk and blithe as a grasshopper, singing all day
long. He was the life and soul of the fortress;
when his work was over, he would sit on one of
the stone benches of the esplanade and strum his
guitar, and sing long ditties about the Cid, and
Bernardo del Carpio, and Fernando del Pulgar,
and other Spanish heroes, for the amusement of
the old soldiers of the fortress, or would strike
up a merrier tune, and set the girls dancing
boleros
and fandangos.
Like most little men, Lope Sanchez had a
strapping buxom dame for a wife, who could
almost
have put him in her pocket; but he lacked
the usual poor man's lot,instead of ten children
he had but one. This was a little black-eyed
girl, about twelve years of age, named Sanchica,
who was as merry as himself, and the delight of
his heart. She played about him as he worked in
the gardens, danced to his guitar as he sat in the
shade, and ran as wild as a young fawn about the
groves, and alleys, and ruined halls of the
Alhambra
.
It was now the eve of the blessed St. John,
and the holiday-loving gossips of the Alhambra,
men, women, and children, went up at night to
the mountain of the Sun, which rises above the
Generalife, to keep their midsummer vigil on its
level summit. It was a bright moonlight night,
and all the mountains were gray and silvery, and
the city, with its domes and spires, lay in
shadows
below, and the Vega was like a fairy land,
with haunted streams gleaming among its dusky
groves. On the highest part of the mountain they
lit up a bale fire, according to an old custom of
the country handed down from the Moors. The
inhabitants of the surrounding country were
keeping
VOL. II. 17
a similar vigil, and bale fires here and there
in the Vega, and along the folds of the mountains,
blazed up palely in the moonlight.
The evening was gaily passed in dancing to the
guitar of Lope Sanchez, who was never so
joyous
as when on a holiday revel of the kind.
While the dance was going on, the little
Sanchica
with some of her playmates sported among
the ruins of an old Moorish fort that crowns the
mountain, when, on gathering pebbles in the
fosse, she found a small hand, curiously carved
of jet, the fingers closed, and the thumb firmly
clasped upon them. Overjoyed with her good
fortune, she ran to her mother with her prize.
It immediately became a subject of sage
speculation
,
and was eyed by some with superstitious
distrust. Throw it away, said one, it is
Moorish,depend upon it there's mischief and
witchcraft in it. By no means, said another,
you may sell it for something to the jewellers
of the Zacatin. In the midst of this discussion
an old tawny soldier drew near, who had served
in Africa, and was as swarthy as a Moor. He
examined
the hand with a knowing look. I have
seen things of this kind, said he, among the
Moors of Barbary. It is of great virtue to guard
against the evil eye, and all kinds of spells and
enchantments. I give you joy, friend Lope, this
bodes good luck to your child.
Upon hearing this, the wife of Lope Sanchez
tied the little hand of jet to a riband, and hung
it round the neck of her daughter.
The sight of this talisman called up all the
favourite
superstitions about the Moors. The dance
was neglected, and they sat in groups on the
ground, telling old legendary tales handed down
from their ancestors. Some of their stories turned
upon the wonders of the very mountain upon
which they were seated, which is a famous
hobgoblin
region.
One ancient crone gave a long account of the
subterranean palace in the bowels of that
mountain
,
where Boabdil and all his Moslem court
are said to remain enchanted. Among yonder
ruins, said she, pointing to some crumbling
walls and mounds of earth on a distant part of the
mountain, there is a deep black pit that goes
down, down into the very heart of the mountain.
For all the money in Granada, I would not look
down into it. Once upon a time, a poor man of
the Alhambra, who tended goats upon this
mountain
,
scrambled down into that pit after a kid that
had fallen in. He came out again, all wild and
staring, and told such things of what he had seen,
that every one thought his brain was turned. He
raved for a day or two about hobgoblin Moors
that had pursued him in the cavern, and could
hardly be persuaded to drive his goats up again
to the mountain. He did so at last, but, poor
man, he never came down again. The
neighbours
found his goats browsing about the
Moorish
ruins, and his hat and mantle lying near the
mouth of the pit, but he was never more heard
of.
The little Sanchica listened with breathless
attention
to this story. She was of a curious
nature
,
and felt immediately a great hankering to
peep into this dangerous pit. Stealing away from
her companions, she sought the distant ruins, and
after groping for some time among them, came
to a small hollow or basin, near the brow of the
mountain, where it swept steeply down into the
valley of the Darro. In the centre of this basin
yawned the mouth of the pit. Sanchica ventured
to the verge and peeped in. All was black as
pitch, and gave an idea of immeasurable depth.
Her blood ran coldshe drew backthen
peeped
againthen would have run awaythen took
another peepthe very horror of the thing was
delightful to her. At length she rolled a large
stone, and pushed it over the brink. For some
time it fell in silence; then struck some rocky
projection with a violent crash, then rebounded
from side to side, rumbling and tumbling, with a
noise like thunder, then made a final splash into
water, far, far below, and all was again silent.
The silence, however, did not long continue.
It seemed as if something had been awakened
within this dreary abyss. A murmuring sound
gradually rose out of the pit like the hum and
buzz of a bee-hive. It grew louder and louder:
there was the confusion of voices as of a distant
multitude, together with the faint din of arms,
clash of cymbals, and clangour of trumpets, as if
some army were marshalling for battle in the
very bowels of the mountain.
The child drew off with silent awe, and
hastened
back to the place where she had left her
parents
and their companions. All were gone.
The bale fire was expiring, and its last wreath of
smoke curling up in the moonshine. The
distant
fires that had blazed along the mountains, and
in the Vega were all extinguished; every thing
seemed to have sunk to repose. Sanchica called
17 *
her parents and some of her companions by name,
but received no reply. She ran down the side
of the mountain, and by the gardens of the
Generalife
,
until she arrived in the alley of trees
leading
to the Alhambra, where she seated herself
on a bench of a woody recess to recover breath.
The bell from the watch-tower of the Alhambra
told midnight. There was a deep tranquillity, as
if all nature slept; excepting the low tinkling
sound of an unseen stream that ran under the
covert
of the bushes. The breathing sweetness of
the atmosphere was lulling her to sleep, when
her eye was caught by something glittering at a
distance, and to her surprise, she beheld a long
cavalcade of Moorish warriors pouring down the
mountain side, and along the leafy avenues.
Some were armed with lances and shields;
others with scimetars and battle-axes, and with
polished cuirasses that flashed in the moonbeams.
Their horses pranced proudly, and champed upon
the bit, but their tramp caused no more sound
than if they had been shod with felt, and the
riders were all as pale as death. Among them
rode a beautiful lady with a crowned head and
long golden locks entwined with pearls. The
housings of her palfrey were of crimson
velvet
embroidered with gold, and swept the earth;
but she rode all disconsolate, with eyes ever fixed
upon the ground.
Then succeeded a train of courtiers
magnificently
arrayed in robes and turbans of divers
colours, and amidst these, on a cream coloured
charger, rode king Boabdil el Chico, in a royal
mantle covered with jewels, and a crown
sparkling
with diamonds. The little Sanchica knew
him by his yellow beard, and his resemblance to
his portrait, which she had often seen in the
picture
gallery of the Generalife. She gazed in
wonder and admiration at this royal pageant as it
passed glistening among the trees, but though
she knew these monarchs, and courtiers, and
warriors
,
so pale and silent, were out of the common
course of nature, and things of magic or
enchantment
,
yet she looked on with a bold heart, such
courage did she derive from the mystic talisman
of the hand which was suspended about her neck.
The cavalcade having passed by, she rose and
followed. It continued on to the great gate of
Justice, which stood wide open; the old invalid
centinels on duty, lay on the stone benches of
the Barbican, buried in profound and apparently
charmed sleep, and the phantom pageant swept
noiselessly by them with flaunting banner and
triumphant state. Sanchica would have followed,
but, to her surprise, she beheld an opening in the
earth within the Barbican, leading down
beneath
the foundations of the tower. She entered
for a little distance, and was encouraged to
proceed
by finding steps rudely hewn in the rock,
and a vaulted passage here and there lit up by a
silver lamp, which, while it gave light, diffused
likewise a grateful fragrance. Venturing on, she
came at last to a great hall wrought out of the
heart of the mountain, magnificently furnished in
the Moorish style, and lighted up by silver and
crystal lamps. Here on an ottoman sat an old
man in Moorish dress, with a long white beard,
nodding and dozing, with a staff in his hand, which
seemed ever to be slipping from his grasp; while
at a little distance, sat a beautiful lady, in ancient
Spanish dress, with a coronet all sparkling with
diamonds, and her hair entwined with pearls,
who was softly playing on a silver lyre. The
little Sanchica now recollected a story she had
heard among the old people of the Alhambra,
concerning a Gothic princess confined in the
centre
of the mountain by an old Arabian magician,
whom she kept bound up in magic sleep by the
power of music.
The lady paused with surprise, at seeing a
mortal in that enchanted hall. Is it the eve of
the blessed St. John? said she.
It is, replied Sanchica.
Then for one night the magic charm is
suspended
.
Come hither, child, and fear not, I am a
Christian like thyself, though bound here by
enchantment
.
Touch my fetters with the talisman
that hangs about thy neck, and for this night I
shall be free.
So saying, she opened her robes and displayed
a broad golden band round her waist, and a
golden
chain that fastened her to the ground. The
child hesitated not to apply the little hand of jet
to the golden band, and immediately the chain
fell to the earth. At the sound the old man
awoke, and began to rub his eyes, but the lady ran
her fingers over the chords of the lyre, and again
he fell into a slumber and began to nod, and his
staff to falter in his hand. Now, said the lady,
touch his staff with the talismanic hand of jet.
The child did so, and it fell from his grasp, and
he sunk in a deep sleep on the ottoman. The
lady gently laid the silver lyre on the ottoman,
leaning it against the head of the sleeping
magician
,
then touching the chords until they vibrated
in his ear, O potent spirit of harmony, said
she, continue thus to hold his senses in
thraldom
till the return of day. Now follow me,
my child, continued she, and thou shalt
behold
the Alhambra as it was in the days of its
glory, for thou hast a magic talisman that reveals
all enchantments. Sanchica followed the lady in
silence. They passed up through the entrance
of the cavern into the Barbican of the gate of
Justice, and thence to the Plaza de las Algibes, or
esplanade within the fortress. This was all filled
with Moorish soldiery, horse and foot, marshalled
in squadrons, with banners displayed. There
were royal guards also at the portal, and rows of
African blacks with drawn scimetars. No one
spoke a word, and Sanchica passed on fearlessly
after her conductor. Her astonishment increased
on entering the royal palace, in which she had
been reared. The broad moonshine lit up all the
halls, and courts, and gardens, almost as brightly
as if it were day; but revealed a far different
scene from that to which she was accustomed.
The walls of the apartments were no longer
stained and rent by time. Instead of cobwebs,
they were now hung with rich silks of
Damascus
,
and the gildings and Arabesque paintings,
were restored to their original brilliancy and
freshness. The halls, instead of being naked and
unfurnished, were set out with divans and
ottomans
of the rarest stuffs, embroidered with pearls,
and studded with precious gems, and all the
fountains in the courts and gardens were playing.
The kitchens were again in full operation;
cooks were busied preparing shadowy dishes, and
roasting and boiling the phantoms of pullets and
partridges; servants were hurrying to and fro
with silver dishes heaped up with dainties, and
arranging a delicious banquet. The court of
Lions
was thronged with guards, and courtiers, and
alfaquis, as in the old times of the Moors; and
at the upper end, in the saloon of judgment, sat
Boabdil on his throne, surrounded by his court,
and swayed a shadowy sceptre for the night.
Notwithstanding all this throng and seeming
bustle, not a voice or footstep was to be heard;
nothing interrupted the midnight silence but the
plashing of the fountains. The little Sanchica
followed her conductress in mute amazement
about the palace, until they came to a portal
opening
to the vaulted passages beneath the great
tower of Comares. On each side of the portal
sat the figure of a nymph, wrought out of
alabaster
.
Their heads were turned aside, and their
regards
fixed upon the same spot within the vault.
The enchanted lady paused, and beckoned the
child to her. Here, said she, is a great
secret
,
which I will reveal to thee in reward for
thy faith and courage. These discreet statues
watch over a mighty treasure hidden in old times
by a Moorish king. Tell thy father to search the
spot on which their eyes are fixed, and he will
find what will make him richer than any man in
Granada. Thy innocent hands alone, however,
gifted as thou art also with the talisman, can
remove
the treasure. Bid thy father use it
discreetly
,
and devote a part of it to the performance of
daily masses for my deliverance from this unholy
enchantment.
When the lady had spoken these words, she led
the child onward to the little garden of Lindaraxa,
which is hard by the vault of the statues. The
moon trembled upon the waters of the solitary
fountain in the centre of the garden, and shed a
tender light upon the orange and citron trees.
The beautiful lady plucked a branch of myrtle
and wreathed it round the head of the child. Let
this be a memento, said she, of what I have
revealed to thee, and a testimonial of its truth.
My hour is comeI must return to the
enchanted
hall; follow me not, lest evil befall thee;
farewell
,
remember what I have said, and have masses
performed for my deliverance. So saying,
the lady entered a dark passage leading beneath
the towers of Comares, and was no longer to be
seen.
The faint crowing of a cock was now heard
from the cottages below the Alhambra, in the
valley of the Darro, and a pale streak of light
began to appear above the eastern mountains. A
slight wind arose; there was a sound like the
rustling of dry leaves through the courts and
corridors
,
and door after door shut to with a jarring
sound. Sanchica returned to the scenes she had
so lately beheld thronged with the shadowy
multitude
,
but Boabdil and his phantom court were
gone.
The moon shone into empty halls and galleries,
stripped of their transient splendour, stained and
dilapidated by time, and hung with cobwebs; the
bat flitted about in the uncertain light, and the
frog croaked from the fish-pond.
VOL. II. 18
Sanchica now made the best of her way to a
remote staircase that led up to the humble
apartment
occupied by her family. The door as usual
was open, for Lope Sanchez was too poor to need
bolt or bar: she crept quietly to her pallet, and,
putting the myrtle wreath beneath her pillow,
soon fell asleep.
In the morning she related all that had befallen
her to her father. Lope Sanchez, however,
treated
the whole as a mere dream, and laughed at
the child for her credulity. He went forth to his
customary labours in the garden, but had not
been there long when his little daughter came
running to him almost breathless. Father!
father
!
cried she, behold the myrtle wreath
which the Moorish lady bound round my head.
Lope Sanchez gazed with astonishment, for the
stalk of the myrtle was of pure gold, and every
leaf was a sparkling emerald! Being not much
accustomed to precious stones, he was ignorant
of the real value of the wreath, but he saw enough
to convince him that it was something more
substantial
than the stuff that dreams are generally
made of, and that at any rate the child had dreamt
to some purpose. His first care was to enjoin
the most absolute secrecy upon his daughter; in
this respect, however, he was secure, for she had
discretion far beyond her years or sex. He then
repaired to the vault where stood the statues of
the two alabaster nymphs. He remarked that
their heads were turned from the portal, and that
the regards of each were fixed upon the same
point in the interior of the building. Lope
Sanchez
could not but admire this most discreet
contrivance
for guarding a secret. He drew a line
from the eyes of the statues to the point of
regard
,
made a private mark on the wall, and then
retired.
All day, however, the mind of Lope Sanchez
was distracted with a thousand cares. He could
not help hovering within distant view of the two
statues, and became nervous from the dread
that the golden secret might be discovered.
Every footstep that approached the place, made
him tremble. He would have given any thing
could he but turn the heads of the statues,
forgetting
that they had looked precisely in the same
direction for some hundreds of years, without
any person being the wiser. A plague upon
them, he would say to himself, they'll betray
all. Did ever mortal hear of such a mode of
guarding a secret! Then, on hearing any one
advance he would steal off, as though his very
lurking near the place would awaken suspicions.
Then he would return cautiously, and peep from
a distance to see if every thing was secure, but
the sight of the statues would again call forth his
indignation. Aye, there they stand, would
he say, always looking, and looking, and
looking
,
just where they should not. Confound them!
they are just like all their sex; if they have not
tongues to tattle with, they'll be sure to do it
with their eyes!
At length, to his relief, the long anxious day
drew to a close. The sound of footsteps was no
longer heard in the echoing halls of the
Alhambra
;
the last stranger passed the threshold, the
great portal was barred and bolted, and the bat,
and the frog, and the hooting owl gradually
resumed
their nightly vocations in the deserted
palace
.
Lope Sanchez waited, however, until the night
was far advanced, before he ventured with his
little
daughter to the hall of the two nymphs. He
found them looking as knowingly and
mysteriously
as ever, at the secret place of deposit. By
your leaves, gentle ladies, thought Lope
Sanchez
as he passed between them, I will relieve
you from this charge that must have set so heavy
in your minds for the last two or three
centuries
.
He accordingly went to work at the part
of the wall which he had marked, and in a little
while laid open a concealed recess, in which
stood two great jars of porcelain. He
attempted
to draw them forth, but they were
immovable
until touched by the innocent hand of
his little daughter. With her aid he dislodged
them from their niche, and found, to his great
joy, that they were filled with pieces of Moorish
gold, mingled with jewels and precious stones.
Before daylight he managed to convey them to
his chamber, and left the two guardian statues
with their eyes still fixed on the vacant wall.
Lope Sanchez had thus on a sudden become a
rich man, but riches, as usual, brought a world
of cares, to which he had hitherto been a
stranger
.
How was he to convey away his wealth
with safety? How was he even to enter upon the
enjoyment of it without awakening suspicion?
Now too, for the first time in his life, the dread
of robbers entered into his mind. He looked
with terror at the insecurity of his habitation,
and went to work to barricado the doors and
windows
;
yet after all his precautions, he could not
18 *
sleep soundly. His usual gaiety was at an end;
he had no longer a joke or a song for his
neighbours
,
and, in short, became the most miserable
animal in the Alhambra. His old comrades
remarked
this alteration; pitied him heartily, and
began to desert him, thinking he must be falling
into want, and in danger of looking to them for
assistance; little did they suspect that his only
calamity was riches.
The wife of Lope Sanchez shared his anxiety;
but then she had ghostly comfort. We ought
before this to have mentioned, that Lope being
rather a light, inconsiderate little man, his wife
was accustomed, in all grave matters, to seek the
council and ministry of her confessor, Fray
Simon
,
a sturdy, broad-shouldered, blue-bearded,
bullet-headed friar of the neighbouring convent
of San Francisco, who was, in fact, the spiritual
comforter of half the good wives of the
neighbourhood
.
He was, moreover, in great esteem among
divers sisterhoods of nuns, who requited him for
his ghostly services by frequent presents of those
little dainties and nicknacks manufactured in
convents, such as delicate confections, sweet
biscuits
,
and bottles of spiced cordials, found to be
marvellous restoratives after fasts and vigils.
Fray Simon thrived in the exercise of his
functions
.
His oily skin glistened in the sunshine as
he toiled up the hill of the Alhambra on a sultry
day. Yet notwithstanding his sleek condition,
the knotted rope round his waist showed the
austerity
of his self discipline; the multitude doffed
their caps to him as a mirror of piety, and even
the dogs scented the odour of sanctity that
exhaled
from his garments, and howled from their
kennels as he passed.
Such was Fray Simon, the spiritual counsellor
of the comely wife of Lope Sanchez, and as the
father confessor is the domestic confidant of
women
in humble life in Spain, he was soon made
acquainted, in great secrecy, with the story of the
hidden treasure.
The friar opened eyes and mouth, and crossed
himself a dozen times at the news. After a
moment's
pause, Daughter of my soul! said he,
know that thy husband has committed a
double
sin, a sin against both state and church! The
treasure he has thus seized upon for himself,
being
found in the royal domains, belongs of course
to the crown; but being infidel wealth, rescued,
as it were, from the very fangs of Satan, should
be devoted to the church. Still, however, the
matter may be accommodated. Bring hither the
myrtle wreath.
When the good father beheld it, his eyes
twinkled
more than ever, with admiration of the size
and beauty of the emeralds. This, said he,
being the first fruits of this discovery, should
be dedicated to pious purposes. I will hang it
up as a votive offering before the image of San
Francisco in our chapel, and will earnestly pray
to him, this very night, that your husband be
permitted
to remain in quiet possession of your
wealth.
The good dame was delighted to make her
peace with heaven at so cheap a rate, and the
friar, putting the wreath under his mantle,
departed
with saintly steps towards his convent.
When Lope Sanchez came home, his wife told
him what had passed. He was excessively
provoked
,
for he lacked his wife's devotion, and had
for some time groaned in secret at the domestic
visitations of the friar. Woman, said he,
what hast thou done! Thou hast put every
thing at hazard by thy tattling.
What! cried the good woman, would you
forbid my disburthening my conscience to my
confessor?
No, wife! confess as many of your own sins
as you please; but as to this money-digging, it is
a sin of my own, and my conscience is very easy
under the weight of it.
There was no use, however, in complaining;
the secret was told, and, like water spilled on the
sand, was not again to be gathered. Their only
chance was, that the friar would be discreet.
The next day, while Lope Sanchez was abroad,
there was an humble knocking at the door, and
Fray Simon entered with meek and demure
countenance.
Daughter, said he, I have prayed
earnestly
to San Francisco, and he has heard my
prayer. In the dead of the night the saint
appeared
to me in a dream, but with a frowning
aspect
.
`Why,' said he, `dost thou pray to me to
dispense with this treasure of the Gentiles, when
thou seest the poverty of my chapel. Go to the
house of Lope Sanchez, crave in my name a
portion
of the Moorish gold to furnish two
candle-sticks
for the main altar, and let him possess the
residue in peace.'
When the good woman heard of this vision,
she crossed herself with awe, and going to the
secret
place where Lope had hid the treasure, she
filled a great leathern purse with pieces of
Moorish
gold, and gave it to the friar. The pious
monk bestowed upon her in return, benedictions
enough, if paid by heaven, to enrich her race to
the latest posterity; then slipping the purse into
the sleeve of his habit, he folded his hands upon
his breast, and departed with an air of humble
thankfulness.
When Lope Sanchez heard of this second
donation
to the church, he had well nigh lost his
senses. Unfortunate man, cried he, what
will become of me? I shall be robbed by
piece-meal
;
I shall be ruined and brought to
beggary
!
It was with the utmost difficulty that his wife
could pacify him by reminding him of the
countless
wealth that yet remained; and how
considerate
it was for San Francisco to rest contented
with so very small a portion.
Unluckily, Fray Simon had a number of poor
relations to be provided for, not to mention some
half dozen sturdy, bullet-headed orphan children
and destitute foundlings, that he had taken under
his care. He repeated his visits, therefore, from
day to day, with salutations on behalf of Saint
Dominick, Saint Andrew, Saint James, until poor
Lope was driven to despair, and found that,
unless
he got out of the reach of this holy friar, he
should have to make peace offerings to every
saint in the kalendar. He determined, therefore,
to pack up his remaining wealth, beat a secret
retreat
in the night, and make off to another part
of the kingdom.
Full of his project, he bought a stout mule
for the purpose, and tethered it in a gloomy
vault, underneath the tower of the Seven Floors.
The very place from whence the Bellado or
goblin
horse without a head, is said to issue forth at
midnight and to scour the streets of Granada,
pursued by a pack of hell-hounds. Lope Sanchez
had little faith in the story, but availed himself
of the dread occasioned by it, knowing that no
one would be likely to pry into the subterranean
stable of the phantom steed. He sent off his
family in the course of the day, with orders to
wait for him at a distant village of the Vega. As
the night advanced, he conveyed his treasure to
the vault under the tower, and having loaded his
mule, he led it forth, and cautiously descended
the dusky avenue.
Honest Lope had taken his measures with the
utmost secrecy, imparting them to no one but the
faithful wife of his bosom. By some miraculous
revelation, however, they became known to Fray
Simon; the zealous friar beheld these infidel
treasures
on the point of slipping for ever out of his
grasp, and determined to have one more dash at
them for the benefit of the church and San
Francisco. Accordingly, when the bells had
rung for animas, and all the Alhambra was quiet,
he stole out of his convent, and, descending
through the gate of Justice, concealed himself
among the thickets of roses and laurels that
border
the great avenue. Here he remained,
counting
the quarters of hours as they were sounded on
the bell of the watch-tower, and listening to the
dreary hootings of owls, and the distant barking
of dogs from the gipsy caverns.
At length, he heard the tramp of hoofs, and,
through the gloom of the overshadowing trees,
imperfectly beheld a steed descending the
avenue
.
The sturdy friar chuckled at the idea of
the knowing turn he was about to serve honest
Lope. Tucking up the skirts of his habit, and
wriggling like a cat watching a mouse, he waited
until his prey was directly before him, when
darting forth from his leafy covert, and putting
one hand on the shoulder, and the other on the
crupper, he made a vault that would not have
disgraced
the most experienced master of
equitation
,
and alighted well forked astride the steed.
Aha! said the sturdy friar, we shall now
see who best understands the game.
He had scarce uttered the words, when the
mule began to kick and rear and plunge, and then
set off at full speed down the hill. The friar
attempted
to check him, but in vain. He bounded
from rock to rock, and bush to bush; the friar's
habit was torn to ribands, and fluttered in the
wind, his shaven poll received many a hard
knock from the branches of the trees, and many
a scratch from the brambles. To add to his
terror
and distress, he found a pack of seven hounds
in full cry at his heels, and perceived, too late,
that he was actually mounted upon the terrible
Bellado!
Away they went, according to the ancient
phrase, pull devil, pull friar, down the great
avenue, across the Plaza Nueva, along the
Zacatin
,
around the Vivarambla,never did
huntsman
and hound make a more furious run, or more
infernal uproar.
In vain did the friar invoke every saint in the
kalendar, and the holy virgin into the bargain;
VOL. II. 19
every time he mentioned a name of the kind, it
was like a fresh application of the spur, and made
the Bellado bound as high as a house. Through
the remainder of the night was the unlucky Fray
Simon, carried hither and thither and whither
he would not, until every bone in his body ached,
and he suffered a loss of leather too grievous to
be mentioned. At length, the crowing of a cock
gave the signal of returning day. At the sound,
the goblin steed wheeled about, and galloped
back for his tower. Again he scoured the
Vivarambla
,
the Zacatin, the Plaza Nueva, and the
avenue of fountains, the seven dogs yelling and
barking, and leaping up, and snapping at the heels
of the terrified friar. The first streak of day had
just appeared as they reached the tower; here the
goblin steed kicked up his heels, sent the friar a
somerset through the air, plunged into the dark
vault followed by the infernal pack, and a
profound
silence succeeded to the late deafening
clamour.
Was ever so diabolical a trick played off upon
holy friar? A peasant going to his labours at
early
dawn, found the unfortunate Fray Simon lying
under a fig-tree at the foot of the tower, but so
bruised and bedeviled, that he could neither
speak nor move. He was conveyed with all care
and tenderness to his cell, and the story went that
he had been waylaid and maltreated by robbers.
A day or two elapsed before he recovered the
use of his limbs: he consoled himself in the
meantime
,
with the thoughts that though the mule
with the treasure had escaped him, he had
previously
had some rare pickings at the infidel
spoils. His first care on being able to use his
limbs, was to search beneath his pallet, where he
had secreted the myrtle wreath and the leathern
pouches of gold, extracted from the piety of
dame Sanchez. What was his dismay at finding
the wreath, in effect, but a withered branch of
myrtle, and the leathern pouches filled with sand
and gravel!
Fray Simon, with all his chagrin, had the
discretion
to hold his tongue, for to betray the
secret
might draw on him the ridicule of the public,
and the punishment of his superior; it was not
until many years afterwards, on his death-bed,
that he revealed to his confessor his nocturnal
ride on the Bellado.
Nothing was heard of Lope Sanchez for a long
time after his disappearance from the Alhambra.
His memory was always cherished as that of a
merry companion, though it was feared, from the
care and melancholy showed in his conduct
shortly before his mysterious departure, that
poverty and distress had driven him to some
extremity
.
Some years afterwards, one of his old
companions, an invalid soldier, being at Malaga,
was knocked down and nearly run over by a
coach and six. The carriage stopped; an old
gentleman
magnificently dressed, with a bag-wig and
sword, stepped out to assist the poor invalid.
What was the astonishment of the latter to
behold
in this grand cavalier, his old friend Lope
Sanchez, who was actually celebrating the
marriage
of his daughter Sanchica, with one of the
first grandees in the land.
The carriage contained the bridal party.
There was dame Sanchez now grown as round
as a barrel, and dressed out with feathers and
jewels, and necklaces of pearls, and necklaces of
diamonds, and rings on every finger, and
altogether
a finery of apparel that had not been seen
since the days of Queen Sheba. The little
Sanchica had now grown to be a woman, and
for grace and beauty might have been mistaken
for a duchess, if not a princess outright. The
bridegroom sat beside her, rather a withered,
spindle-shanked little man, but this only proved
him to be of the true blue blood, a legitimate
Spanish grandee being rarely above three cubits
in stature. The match had been of the mother's
making.
Riches had not spoiled the heart of honest
Lope. He kept his old comrade with him
for several days; feasted him like a king, took
him to plays and bull-fights, and at length sent
him away rejoicing, with a big bag of money
for himself, and another to be distributed among
his ancient messmates of the Alhambra.
Lope always gave out that a rich brother had
died in America, and left him heir to a copper
mine, but the shrewd gossips of the Alhambra,
insist that his wealth was all derived from his
having discovered the secret guarded by the two
marble nymphs of the Alhambra. It is
remarked
,
that these very discreet statues continue even
unto the present day with their eyes fixed most
significantly on the same part of the wall, which
leads many to suppose there is still some hidden
treasure remaining there, well worthy the
attention
of the enterprizing traveller. Though
19 *
others, and particularly all female visitors
regard
them with great complacency, as lasting
monuments of the fact, that women can keep a
secret.
MAHAMAD ABEN ALAHMAR;
THE
FOUNDER OF THE ALHAMBRA.
Having
dealt so freely in the marvellous
legends
of the Alhambra, I feel as if bound to give
the reader a few facts concerning its sober
history
,
or rather the history of those magnificent
princes, its founder and finisher, to whom Europe
is indebted for so beautiful and romantic an oriental
monument. To attain these facts, I descended
from this region of fancy and fiction, where every
thing is liable to take an imaginative tint, and
carried my researches among the dusty tomes of
the old Jesuit's library in the university. This
once boasted repository of erudition is now a
mere shadow of its former self, having been
stripped
of its manuscripts and rarest works by the
French, while masters of Granada. Still it
contains
,
among many ponderous tomes of polemics
of the Jesuit fathers, several curious tracts of
Spanish literature, and above all, a number of
those antiquated, dusty, parchment-bound
chronicles
,
for which I have a peculiar veneration.
In this old library I have passed many
delightful
hours of quiet, undisturbed, literary foraging,
for the keys of the doors and bookcases were
kindly entrusted to me, and I was left alone to
rummage at my leisurea rare indulgence in
those sanctuaries of learning, which too often
tantalize
the thirsty student with the sight of sealed
fountains of knowledge.
In the course of these visits I gleaned the
following
particulars concerning the historical
characters
in question.
The Moors of Granada regarded the Alhambra
as a miracle of art, and had a tradition that the
king who founded it dealt in magic, or at least
was deeply versed in alchymy, by means of
which, he procured the immense sums of gold
expended in its erection. A brief view of his
reign will show the real secret of his wealth.
The name of this monarch, as inscribed on
the walls of some of the apartments, was Aben
Abd'allah, (i. e. the father of Abdallah,) but he
is commonly known in Moorish history as
Mahamad
Aben Alahmar, (or Mahamad son of
Alahmar
,)
or simply Aben Alahmar, for the sake of
brevity.
He was born in Arjona, in the year of the
Hegira
,
591, of the Christian era, 1195, of the
noble family of the Beni Nasar, or children
of Nasar, and no expense was spared by his
parents
to fit him for the high station to which the
opulence and dignity of his family entitled him.
The Saracens of Spain were greatly advanced in
civilization. Every principal city was a seat of
learning and the arts, so that it was easy to
command
the most enlightened instructors for a youth
of rank and fortune. Aben Alahmar, when he
arrived at manly years, was appointed Alcayde
or governor of Arjona and Jaen, and gained great
popularity by his benignity and justice. Some
years afterwards, on the death of Aben Hud, the
Moorish power of Spain was broken into factions,
and many places declared for Mahamad Aben
Alahmar. Being of a sanguine spirit and lofty
ambition, he seized upon the occasion, made a
circuit
through the country, and was every where
received with acclamation. It was in the year
1238 that he entered Granada amidst the
enthusiastic
shouts of the multitude. He was
proclaimed
king with every demonstration of joy, and
soon became the head of the Moslems in Spain,
being the first of the illustrious line of Beni
Nasar
that had sat upon the throne.
His reign was such as to render him a blessing
to his subjects. He gave the command of his
various
cities to such as had distinguished
themselves
by valour and prudence, and who seemed
most acceptable to the people. He organized
a vigilant police, and established rigid rules for
the administration of justice. The poor and the
distressed always found ready admission to his
presence, and he attended personally to their
assistance
and redress. He erected hospitals for the
blind, the aged, and infirm, and all those
incapable
of labour, and visited them frequently, not
on set days, with pomp and form, so as to give
time for every thing to be put in order and every
abuse concealed, but suddenly and unexpectedly,
informing himself by actual observation and close
inquiry of the treatment of the sick, and the
conduct of those appointed to administer to their
relief.
He founded schools and colleges, which he
visited
in the same manner, inspecting personally
the instruction of the youth. He established
butcheries
and public ovens, that the people might
be furnished with wholesome provisions at just
and regular prices. He introduced abundant
streams of water into the city, erecting baths and
fountains, and constructing aqueducts and canals
to irrigate and fertilize the Vega. By these
means, prosperity and abundance prevailed in
this beautiful city, its gates were thronged with
commerce, and its warehouses filled with the
luxuries
and merchandize of every clime and
country
.
While Mahamad Aben Alahmar was ruling his
fair domains thus wisely and prosperously, he
was suddenly menaced by the horrors of war.
The Christians at that time, profiting by the
dismemberment
of the Moslem power, were rapidly
regaining their ancient territories. James the
Conqueror had subjected all Valentia, and
Ferdinand
the Saint was carrying his victorious
armies
into Andalusia. The latter invested the
city of Jaen, and swore not to raise his camp
until
he had gained possession of the place.
Mahamad
Aben Alahmar was conscious of the
insufficiency
of his means to carry on a war with the
potent sovereign of Castile. Taking a sudden
resolution, therefore, he repaired privately to the
Christian camp, and made his unexpected
appearance
in the presence of king Ferdinand. In
me, said he, you behold Mahamad, king of
Granada. I confide in your good faith, and put
myself under your protection. Take all I
possess
,
and receive me as your vassal. So saying,
he knelt and kissed the king's hand in token of
submission.
King Ferdinand was touched by this instance
of confiding faith, and determined not to be
out-done
in generosity. He raised his late rival from
the earth and embraced him as a friend, nor
would he accept the wealth he offered, but
received
him as a vassal, leaving him sovereign of
his dominions, on condition of paying a yearly
tribute, attending the cortes as one of the nobles
of the empire, and serving him in war with a
certain number of horsemen.
It was not long after this that Mahamad was
VOL. II. 20
cailed upon for his military services, to aid king
Ferdinand in his famous siege of Seville. The
Moorish king sallied forth with five hundred
chosen
horsemen of Granada, than whom none in
the world knew better how to manage the steed,
or wield the lance. It was a melancholy and
humiliating
service, however, for they had to draw the
sword against their brethren of the faith.
Mahamad
gained a melancholy distinction by his
prowess in this renowned conquest, but more true
honour by the humanity which he prevailed
upon Ferdinand to introduce into the usages of
war. When in 1248, the famous city of Seville
surrendered to the Castilian monarch, Mahamad
returned sad and full of care to his dominions.
He saw the gathering ills that menaced the
Moslem
cause, and uttered an ejaculation often used
by him in moments of anxiety and trouble:
How straitened and wretched would be our
life, if our hope were not so spacious and
extensive
.
[1]
[1]
Que angoste y miserabile seria nuestra vida, sino fuera
tan dilatada y espaciosa nuestra esperanza!
When the melancholy conqueror approached
his beloved Granada, the people thronged forth
to see him with impatient joy, for they loved
him as a benefactor. They had erected arches of
triumph in honour of his martial exploits, and
wherever he passed he was hailed with
acclamations
,
as
El Galib
, or the conqueror; Mahamad
shook his head when he heard the appellation,
Wa le Galib il Al
, exclaimed he: (there is
no conqueror but God!) From that time forward,
he adopted this exclamation as a motto. He
inscribed
it on an oblique band across his escutcheon,
and it continued to be the motto of his
descendants
.
Mahamad had purchased peace by submission to
the Christian yoke, but he knew that where the
elements were so discordant, and the motives for
hostility so deep and ancient, it could not be
secure
or permanent. Acting therefore upon an
old maxim, arm thyself in peace, and clothe
thyself
in summer, he improved the present interval
of tranquillity by fortifying his dominions and
replenishing his arsenals, and by promoting
those useful arts which give wealth and real
power to an empire. He gave premiums and
privileges to the best artizans; improved the
breed of horses and other domestic animals;
encouraged
husbandry; and increased the natural
fertility of the soil twofold by his protection,
making the lonely valleys of his kingdom to
bloom like gardens. He fostered also the growth
and fabrication of silk, until the looms of
Granada
surpassed even those of Syria in the fineness
and beauty of their productions. He, moreover,
caused the mines of gold and silver, and other
metals found in the mountainous regions of his
dominions, to be diligently worked, and was the
first king of Granada who struck money of gold
and silver with his name, taking great care that
the coins should be skilfully executed.
It was about this time, towards the middle of
the thirteenth century, and just after his return
from the siege of Seville, that he commenced
the splendid palace of the Alhambra:
superintending
the building of it in person, mingling
frequently among the artists and workmen, and
directing their labours.
Though thus magnificent in his works, and
great in his enterprises, he was simple in his
person
,
and moderate in his enjoyments. His dress
was not merely void of splendour, but so plain
as not to distinguish him from his subjects. His
harem boasted but few beauties, and these he
visited but seldom, though they were entertained
with great magnificence. His wives were
daughters
of the principal nobles, and were treated by
him as friends and rational companions; what is
more, he managed to make them live as friends
with one another.
He passed much of his time in his gardens;
especially in those of the Alhambra, which he
had stored with the rarest plants, and the most
beautiful and aromatic flowers. Here he
delighted
himself in reading histories, or in causing
them to be read and related to him; and
sometimes
,
in intervals of leisure, employed himself
in the instruction of his three sons, for whom he
had provided the most learned and virtuous
masters
.
As he had frankly and voluntarily offered
himself
a tributary vassal to Ferdinand, so he always
remained loyal to his word, giving him repeated
proofs of fidelity and attachment. When that
renowned monarch died in Seville, in 1254,
Mahamad Aben Alahmar, sent ambassadors to
condole with his successor, Alonzo X. and with
them a gallant train of a hundred Moorish
cavaliers
20 *
of distinguished rank, who were to attend,
each bearing a lighted taper round the royal
bier, during the funeral ceremonies. This grand
testimonial of respect, was repeated by the
Moslem
monarch during the remainder of his life, on
each anniversary of the death of King Fernando
el Santo, when the hundred Moorish knights
repaired from Granada to Seville, and took their
stations with lighted tapers in the centre of the
sumptuous cathedral round the cenotaph of the
illustrious deceased.
Mahamad Aben Alahmar, retained his
faculties
and vigour to an advanced age. In his
seventy-ninth year, he took the field on
horse-back
,
accompanied by the flower of his chivalry,
to resist an invasion of his territories. As the
army sallied forth from Granada, one of the
principal
adalides or guides, who rode in the
advance
,
accidentally broke his lance against the arch
of the gate. The counsellors of the king,
alarmed
by this circumstance, which was considered
an evil omen, entreated him to return. Their
supplications were in vain. The king persisted,
and at noon-tide the omen, say the Moorish
chroniclers
,
was fatally fulfilled. Mahamad was
suddenly
struck with illness, and had nearly fallen
from his horse. He was placed on a litter, and
borne back towards Granada, but his illness
increased
to such degree, that they were obliged to
pitch his tent in the Vega. His physicians were
filled with consternation, not knowing what
remedy
to prescribe. In a few hours he died vomiting
blood, and in violent convulsions. The Castilian
prince, Don Philip, brother of Alonzo X. was by
his side when he expired. His body was
embalmed
,
enclosed in a silver coffin, and buried in
the Alhambra, in a sepulchre of precious marble,
amidst the unfeigned lamentations of his subjects,
who bewailed him as a parent.
Such was the enlightened patriot prince, who
founded the Alhambra, whose name remains
emblazoned
among its most delicate and graceful
ornaments, and whose memory is calculated to
inspire the loftiest associations in those who tread
these fading scenes of his magnificence and
glory. Though his undertakings were vast, and
his expenditures immense, yet his treasury
was always full; and this seeming
contradiction
gave rise to the story that he was versed
in magic art and possessed of the secret for
transmuting
baser metals into gold.
Those who have attended to his domestic
policy, as here set forth, will easily
understand
the natural magic and simple alchymy
which made his ample treasury to overflow.
JUSEF ABUL HAGIAS,
THE
FINISHER OF THE ALHAMBRA.
Beneath
the governor's apartment in the
Alhambra
,
is the royal Mosque, where the Moorish
monarchs performed their private devotions.
Though consecrated as a Catholic chapel, it still
bears traces of its Moslem origin; the Saracenic
columns with their gilded capitals, and the latticed
gallery for the females of the harem may yet be
seen, and the escutcheons of the Moorish kings
are mingled on the walls with those of the
Castilian
sovereigns.
In this consecrated place perished the
illustrious
Jusef Abul Hagias, the high-minded prince
who completed the Alhambra, and who, for his
virtues and endowments, deserves almost equal
renown with its magnanimous founder. It is with
pleasure I draw forth from the obscurity in which
it has too long remained, the name of another of
those princes of a departed and almost forgotten
race, who reigned in elegance and splendour in
Andalusia, when all Europe was in comparative
barbarism.
Jusef Abul Hagias, (or, as it is sometimes
written
,
Haxis,) ascended the throne of Granada in
the year 1333, and his personal appearance and
mental qualities were such as to win all hearts,
and to awaken anticipations of a beneficent and
prosperous reign. He was of a noble presence
and great bodily strength, united to manly
beauty
.
His complexion was exceeding fair, and,
according
to the Arabian chroniclers, he heightened
the gravity and majesty of his appearance by
suffering
his beard to grow to a dignified length,
and dying it black. He had an excellent
memory
,
well stored with science and erudition; he
was of a lively genius, and accounted the best
poet of his time, and his manners were gentle,
affable
,
and urbane.
Jusef possessed the courage common to all
generous
spirits, but his genius was more calculated
for peace than war, and, though obliged to take up
arms repeatedly in his time, he was generally
unfortunate
.
He carried the benignity of his nature
into warfare, prohibiting all wanton cruelty, and
enjoining mercy and protection towards women
and children, the aged and infirm, and all friars
and persons of holy and recluse life. Among
other ill-starred enterprizes, he undertook a great
campaign in conjunction with the king of
Morocco
,
against the kings of Castile and Portugal, but
was defeated in the memorable battle of Salado;
a disastrous reverse which had nearly proved a
death blow to the Moslem power in Spain.
Jusef obtained a long truce after this defeat,
during which time he devoted himself to the
instruction
of his people, and the improvement of
their morals and manners. For this purpose he
established schools in all the villages, with simple
and uniform systems of education; he obliged
every hamlet of more than twelve houses to have
a Mosque, and prohibited various abuses and
indecorums
,
that had been introduced into the
ceremonies
of religion, and the festivals and public
amusements of the people. He attended
vigilantly
to the police of the city, establishing
nocturnal
guards and patrols, and superintending all
municipal concerns.
His attention was also directed towards
finishing
the great architectural works commenced by
his predecessors, and erecting others on his own
plans. The Alhambra, which had been founded
by the good Aben Alahmar, was now completed.
Jusef constructed the beautiful gate of Justice,
forming the grand entrance to the fortress,
which he finished in 1348. He likewise adorned
many of the courts and halls of the palace, as may
be seen by the inscriptions on the walls, in which
his name repeatedly occurs. He built also the
noble Alcazar, or citadel of Malaga; now
unfortunately
a mere mass of crumbling ruins, but
which, probably, exhibited in its interior similar
elegance and magnificence with the Alhambra.
The genius of a sovereign stamps a character
upon his time. The nobles of Granada, imitating
the elegant and graceful taste of Jusef, soon filled
the city of Granada with magnificent palaces; the
halls of which paved in Mosaic, the walls and
ceilings wrought in fret work, and delicately
gilded
and painted with azure, vermilion, and other
brilliant colours, or minutely inlaid with cedar
VOL. II. 21
and other precious woods; specimens of which
have survived in all their lustre the lapse of
several
centuries.
Many of the houses had fountains, which
threw up jets of water to refresh and cool the air.
They had lofty towers also, of wood or stone,
curiously
carved and ornamented, and covered with
plates of metal that glittered in the sun. Such was
the refined and delicate taste in architecture that
prevailed among this elegant people; insomuch,
that to use the beautiful simile of an Arabian
writer
,
Granada, in the days of Jusef, was as a
silver
vase filled with emeralds and jacinths.
One anecdote will be sufficient to show the
magnanimity
of this generous prince. The long
truce which had succeeded the battle of Salado,
was at an end, and every effort of Jusef to renew
it was in vain. His deadly foe, Alfonso XI. of
Castile, took the field with great force, and laid
siege to Gibraltar. Jusef reluctantly took up
arms, and sent troops to the relief of the place;
when, in the midst of his anxiety, he received
tidings that his dreaded foe had suddenly fallen
a victim to the plague. Instead of manifesting
exultation on the occasion, Jusef called to mind
the great qualities of the deceased, and was
touched with a noble sorrow. Alas! cried
he, the world has lost one of its most excellent
princes; a sovereign who knew how to honour
merit, whether in friend or foe!
The Spanish chroniclers themselves bear
witness
to this magnanimity. According to their
accounts
,
the Moorish cavaliers partook of the
sentiment
of their king, and put on mourning for the
death of Alfonso. Even those of Gibraltar, who
had been so closely invested, when they knew
that the hostile monarch lay dead in his camp,
determined among themselves that no hostile
movement should be made against the
Christians
.
The day on which the camp was broken up,
and the army departed, bearing the corpse of
Alfonso, the Moors issued in multitudes from
Gibraltar, and stood mute and melancholy,
watching the mournful pageant. The same
reverence
for the deceased was observed by all the
Moorish commanders on the frontiers, who
suffered
the funeral train to pass in safety, bearing
the corpse of the Christian sovereign from
Gibraltar
to Seville.
[2]
[2]
Y los Moros que estaban en la villa y Castillo de
Gibraltar
despues que sopieron que el Rey Don Alonzo era
muerto, ordenaron entresi que ninguno non fuesse osado de
fazer ningun movimiento contra los Christianos, nin mover
pelear contra ellos, estovieron todos quedos y dezian entre
ellos que aquel dia muriera un noble rey y gran principe del
mundo!
Jusef did not long survive the enemy he had
so generously deplored. In the year 1354, as he
was one day praying in the royal mosque of the
Alhambra, a maniac rushed suddenly from
behind
,
and plunged a dagger in his side. The
cries of the king brought his guards and courtiers
to his assistance. They found him weltering in
his blood, and in convulsions. He was borne to
the royal apartments, but expired almost
immediately
.
The murderer was cut to pieces, and
his limbs burnt in public, to gratify the fury of
the populace.
The body of the king, was interred in a
superb
sepulchre of white marble, a long epitaph
in letters of gold upon an azure ground recorded
his virtues. Here lies a king and martyr of
an illustrious line; gentle, learned and virtuous;
renowned for the graces of his person and his
manners; whose clemency, piety, and
benevolence
,
were extolled throughout the kingdom of
Granada. He was a great prince, an illustrious
captain; a sharp sword of the Moslems; a
valiant
standard-bearer among the most potent
monarchs, &c.
The Mosque still remains, which once
resounded
with the dying cries of Jusef, but the
monument which recorded his virtues, has long
since disappeared. His name, however, remains
inscribed among the ornaments of the Alhambra,
and will be perpetuated in connexion with this
renowned
pile, which it was his pride and delight
to beautify.
THE END.